Praise for Good Energy
“A tour de force on how metabolism underpins most major diseases and
what we can do to feel better and live longer. Everyone will benefit from
reading Good Energy.”
—Mark Hyman, MD, author of the #1 New York Times bestselling Young Forever

“In Good Energy, Dr. Means makes a bold case for why food—and
particularly regenerative agriculture—must be at the very center of health
care. Dr. Means makes it clear that we can’t drug our way out of a broken
food system.”
—Will Harris, regenerative agriculture leader and owner of White Oak Pastures

“In Good Energy, Casey and Calley Means powerfully explain how we can
use metabolic health tools and strategies to support our own health and that
of our children and families.”
—Kelly LeVeque, nutritionist and author of Body Love

“Good Energy should be required reading for every medical student and
healthcare practitioner. As a system and as individuals, we must adopt a
metabolic, mitochondria-focused lens for health and vitality. Autoimmunity
—along with many other chronic illnesses—is closely tied to metabolic
dysfunction and insulin resistance. Foundational to better energy and health
outcomes is getting metabolic health and blood sugar under control. Dr.
Means shows readers how.”
—Terry Wahls, MD, author of The Wahls Protocol

“Dr. Casey Means brilliantly illuminates the pivotal role of disturbed
metabolism in setting the stage for chronic degenerative diseases, and offers
a comprehensive road map for enhancing and maintaining metabolic health.
This book is a must-read for health care professionals and individuals alike

who are seeking to understand and improve their overall health. With her
insightful and loving guidance, Dr. Means is handing us the keys to the
kingdom for prolonging our health span, making this book a gamechanging, invaluable resource in our journey toward lasting wellness.”
—David Perlmutter, MD, author of the #1 New York Times bestselling Grain Brain and
Drop Acid

“There’s no life without energy. Our mitochondria know how to capture
chemical energy and optimize it. But what if our cells are poisoned? Think
cyanide; think heavy metals. Now think alcohol, sugar, trans fats, all the
environmental toxins that inhibit your mitochondria from their capacity. Dr.
Casey Means brings the problem of cellular energy front and center to
explain what’s really wrong in chronic disease, why medicines won’t fix it,
why she walked away from a promising surgical career, how to remake our
entire health and health care paradigm to save lives and money, and who’s
blocking it. Part memoir, part manifesto, this book proves there isn’t
another voice in the zeitgeist as cogent, urgent, and powerful as Casey’s.
The gauntlet’s been thrown down—consider yourself warned.”
—Robert H. Lustig, MD, author of Metabolical and professor emeritus of pediatrics,
UCSF

an imprint of Penguin Random House LLC
penguinrandomhouse.com
Copyright © 2024 by Casey Means and Calley Means
Penguin Random House supports copyright. Copyright fuels creativity, encourages diverse voices,
promotes free speech, and creates a vibrant culture. Thank you for buying an authorized edition of
this book and for complying with copyright laws by not reproducing, scanning, or distributing any
part of it in any form without permission. You are supporting writers and allowing Penguin Random
House to continue to publish books for every reader. Please note that no part of this book may be
used or reproduced in any manner for the purpose of training artificial intelligence technologies or
systems.
Library of Congress Cataloging-in-Publication Data
Names: Means, Casey, author. | Means, Calley, author.
Title: Good energy: the surprising connection between metabolism and limitless health / Casey
Means, MD, with Calley Means.
Description: New York: Avery, an imprint of Penguin Random House, [2024] | Includes index.
Identifiers: LCCN 2023043612 (print) | LCCN 2023043613 (ebook) | ISBN 9780593712641
(hardcover) | ISBN 9780593712665 (epub)
Subjects: LCSH: Metabolic syndrome—Diet therapy—Popular works. | Energy metabolism—
Popular works. | Self-care, Health—Popular works. | Aging—Nutritional aspects—Popular works. |
Diet therapy—Popular works
Classification: LCC RC662.4 .M425 2024 (print) | LCC RC662.4 (ebook) | DDC 616.3/990654—
dc23/eng/20231227
LC record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2023043612
LC ebook record available at https://lccn.loc.gov/2023043613
Cover design: Caroline Johnson
Cover image: Xorosho / iStock / Getty Images Plus
Book design by Silverglass Studio, adapted for ebook by Kelly Brennan
All names and identifying characteristics have been changed to protect the privacy of the individuals
involved.
Neither the publisher nor the author is engaged in rendering professional advice or services to the
individual reader. The ideas, procedures, and suggestions contained in this book are not intended as a
substitute for consulting with your physician. All matters regarding your health require medical
supervision. Neither the author nor the publisher shall be liable or responsible for any loss or damage
allegedly arising from any information or suggestion in this book.
The recipes contained in this book have been created for the ingredients and techniques indicated.
The publisher is not responsible for your specific health or allergy needs that may require
supervision. Nor is the publisher responsible for any adverse reactions you may have to the recipes

contained in the book, whether you follow them as written or modify them to suit your personal
dietary needs or tastes.
While the author has made every effort to provide accurate telephone numbers, internet addresses,
and other contact information at the time of publication, neither the publisher nor the author assumes
any responsibility for errors or for changes that occur after publication. Further, the publisher does
not have any control over and does not assume any responsibility for author or third-party websites or
their content.
pid_prh_6.3_148646823_c0_r2

CONTENTS
Dedication
Introduction: Everything Is Connected
PART 1
THE TRUTH ABOUT ENERGY
Chapter 1

Siloed Health vs. Energy-Centric Health
Chapter 2

Bad Energy Is the Root of Disease
Chapter 3

Trust Yourself, Not Your Doctor
PART 2
CREATING GOOD ENERGY
Chapter 4

Your Body Has the Answers: How to Read Your Blood Tests and Get
Actionable Insights from Wearables
Chapter 5

The Six Principles of Good Energy Eating

Chapter 6

Creating a Good Energy Meal
Chapter 7

Respecting Your Biological Clock: Light, Sleep, and Meal Timing
Chapter 8

Replenishing What Modernity Took Away: Movement, Temperature, and
Nontoxic Living
Chapter 9

Fearlessness: The Highest Level of Good Energy
PART 3
THE GOOD ENERGY PLAN
PART 4
GOOD ENERGY RECIPES

Acknowledgments
Index
About the Authors

For Gayle Means
Born 1949, died 2021 of pancreatic cancer (a preventable metabolic
condition)

INTRODUCTION

Everything Is Connected
I weighed eleven pounds, nine ounces at birth. My mom’s doctors
congratulated her for producing one of the largest babies in the hospital’s
history.
My mom had trouble losing the baby weight and continued to battle her
weight for years after. Her primary care doctor told her this was normal.
She just had a baby and was getting older, after all. They told her to “eat
healthier.”
In her forties, her cardiologist diagnosed her with elevated blood
pressure. The doctor said this was very common for women her age and
prescribed an angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitor to help relax
her arteries.
In her fifties, her internal medicine doctor informed her she had high
cholesterol (or more technically, high triglycerides, low HDL, and high
LDL cholesterol). She was prescribed a statin and told this was almost a rite
of passage for a person her age: statins are one of the most prescribed drugs
in U.S. history, with over 221 million prescriptions doled out annually.
In her sixties, her endocrinologist said she had developed prediabetes.
The doctor stressed that this, too, was very common and not of much
concern. It’s a “pre-disease,” after all, right—and one that 50 percent of
American adults qualify for. She left the office with her prescription of
metformin, a drug that is prescribed over 90 million times per year in the
United States.
In January 2021, when my mom was seventy-one years old, she was
taking her daily hike with my dad near their home in Northern California.
Suddenly, she felt a deep pain in her belly and experienced uncharacteristic
fatigue. Concerned, she visited her primary care doctor, who conducted a
CT scan and ran lab work.
One day later, she received a text message with her results: stage 4
pancreatic cancer.

Thirteen days later, she was dead.
Her oncologists at Stanford Hospital called her pancreatic cancer
“unlucky.” My mom—who at the time of her cancer diagnosis was seeing
five separate specialists prescribing five separate medications—was
frequently complimented by her doctors in the decade running up to her
diagnosis for being “healthy” compared to most women her age. And,
statistically, she was: the average American over sixty-five sees twentyeight doctors in their lifetime. Fourteen prescriptions are written per
American per year.
Obviously, something isn’t right when it comes to the health trends of
our children, our parents, and ourselves.
Among teens, 18 percent have fatty liver disease, close to 30 percent are
prediabetic, and more than 40 percent are overweight or obese. Fifty years
ago, pediatricians might go an entire career without seeing these conditions
among their patients. Today, young adults exist in a culture where
conditions such as obesity, acne, fatigue, depression, infertility, high
cholesterol, or prediabetes are common.
Six out of ten adults are living with a chronic illness. About 50 percent
of Americans will deal with mental illness sometime in life. Seventy-four
percent of adults are overweight or have obesity. Rates of cancer, heart
disease, kidney disease, upper respiratory infections, and autoimmune
conditions are all going up at the exact time we are spending more and
more to treat them. In the face of these trends, American life expectancy has
been declining for the most sustained period since 1860.
We are convinced these increasing rates of conditions—both mental and
physical—are part of being human. And we are told we can treat the
increasing rates of chronic conditions with “innovations’’ from modern
medicine. In the decades leading up to my mom’s cancer diagnosis, she was
informed her rising cholesterol, waistline, fasting glucose, and blood
pressure levels were conditions that she could “manage” for life with a pill.
But instead of isolated conditions, all of the symptoms my mom
experienced leading to her death were warning signs of the same thing:
dysregulation in how her cells were producing and using energy. Even my

enormous size at birth—which medically fit the criteria for fetal
macrosomia (literally “big-bodied baby”)—was a robust indicator of energy
dysfunction in her cells and almost certainly a sign of undiagnosed
gestational diabetes.
But through decades of symptoms, my mom—and most other adults in
the modern world—are simply prescribed pills and not set on a path of
curiosity about how these conditions are connected and how the root cause
can be reversed.
There is a better way, and it starts with understanding that the biggest lie
in health care is that the root cause of why we’re getting sicker, heavier,
more depressed, and more infertile is complicated.
This sounds radical until you realize that virtually no animals in the wild
suffer from widespread chronic disease. There aren’t rampant obesity, heart
disease, or type 2 diabetes rates among lions or giraffes. But preventable
lifestyle conditions are responsible for 80 percent of modern human deaths.
Depression, anxiety, acne, infertility, insomnia, heart disease, erectile
dysfunction, type 2 diabetes, Alzheimer’s disease, cancer, and most other
conditions that torture and shorten our lives are actually rooted in the same
thing. And the ability to prevent and reverse these conditions—and feel
incredible today—is under your control and simpler than you think.

Good Energy
I want to share a vision of health that is big and bold. It predicates health
and longevity on something simple, powerful, and absolutely fundamental.
A single physiological phenomenon that can change almost everything
about how you feel and function today and in the future. It’s called Good
Energy, and the reason it has such a life-changing impact is that it governs
the very essence of what (quite literally) makes you tick: whether your cells
have the energy to do their jobs of keeping you nourished, clear-minded,
hormonally balanced, immune protected, heart-healthy, structurally sound
—and so much more. Having Good Energy is the core underlying

physiological function that, more than any other process in your body,
determines your predilection to great mental and physical health or to poor
health and disease.
Good Energy is also known as metabolic health. Metabolism refers to
the set of cellular mechanisms that transform food into energy that can
power every single cell in the body. You might not have thought much
about whether you have Good Energy or not. When cellular energy
production is working well, you don’t have to “think” about it or be
conscious of it. It just is. Your body has an exquisite set of mechanisms that
make Good Energy happen every second of every day; these cellular
mechanisms create sustained and balanced energy, distribute it to every cell
in your body, and clean up the residues from the process that would
otherwise clog up the system.
When you hold the keys to this one critical bodily process, you can be
an outlier—a truly positive kind of outlier. You can feel vital and enlivened
and function with clarity of mind. You can enjoy balanced weight, a painfree body, healthy skin, and a stable mood. If you’re of childbearing age
and hoping to have kids, you can enjoy the natural state of fertility that is
your birthright. If you’re getting older, you can live relieved of the nagging
anxiety that precipitous physical or mental decline awaits you or that you’ll
develop a disease that “runs in the family.”
When you lose the keys to Good Energy, however, so much starts to go
wrong. Organs, tissues, and glands are, after all, mere collections of cells.
Lose the capacity for properly and safely powering those cells and—no real
surprise—the organs made up of them start to struggle and fail. This means
that just about any disease can arise as a result—and today, given the
pressures that Good Energy is under, that’s exactly what is occurring.
The problem, simply stated, is a mismatch. The metabolic processes that
run our bodies evolved over hundreds of thousands of years in a synergistic
relationship with the environment around us. But those environmental
conditions around the cells of our bodies have profoundly and rapidly
changed in recent decades. Starting with our diet, yet including our
movement patterns, our sleep patterns, our stress levels, and exposure to

nonnatural chemicals, things are not as they once were. The environment
for the cells of the average modern human is now radically different from
what the cells expect and need. This evolutionary mismatch is tipping
normal metabolic function into dysfunction: Bad Energy. And when small
cellular disturbances happen in every cell, at every moment, the effect is
outsized—rippling up into the tissues, organs, and systems of your body
and negatively influencing how you feel, think, function, look, age, and
even how well you combat pathogens and avoid chronic disease. In fact,
almost every chronic health symptom that Western medicine addresses is
the result of our cells being beleaguered by how we’ve come to live. It’s a
terrible trickle-up: Bad Energy leads to broken cells, broken organs, broken
bodies, and the pain you feel.
We have two hundred different types of cells in the human body, and
when Bad Energy shows up in different cell types, different symptoms can
arise. For instance, if an ovarian theca cell is experiencing Bad Energy, it
looks like infertility in the form of polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS). If a
blood vessel–lining cell is experiencing Bad Energy, it can look like erectile
dysfunction, heart disease, high blood pressure, retinal problems, or chronic
kidney disease (all issues resulting from poor blood flow to different
organs). If a liver cell is experiencing Bad Energy, it can look like
nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD). In the brain, Bad Energy can
look like depression, stroke, dementia, migraine, or chronic pain, depending
on where these dysfunctional cellular processes are most prominently
showing up. Recently, research has clearly shown us that every one of these
conditions—and dozens more—is linked directly to metabolic issues, a
problem with how our cells make energy: Bad Energy. The way we practice
medicine, however, has not caught up with this root-cause understanding.
We still “treat” the organ-specific results of the Bad Energy, not the Bad
Energy itself. And we will never improve the failing health of our modern
population if we don’t address the correct issue (metabolic dysfunction),
which is why the more we spend on health care, and the more we work as
physicians, and the more access to health care and medications we provide
to patients, the worse the outcomes get.

Compared to one hundred years ago, we are consuming astronomically
more sugar (i.e., up to 3,000 percent more liquid fructose), working in more
sedentary jobs, and sleeping 25 percent less. We’re also exposed to over
eighty thousand synthetic chemicals in our food, water, and air. As a result
of all these factors and many others, our cells have stopped being able to
make energy the way they should. Many aspects of our industrialized life
over the past century share a unique and synergistic ability to attack the
machinery inside the cells that produce chemical energy. The result: cellular
dysfunction throughout our bodies, showing up as the explosion of chronic
symptoms and diseases we are facing today.
Our body has simple ways to show us whether we have brewing
metabolic dysfunction: increasing waist size, suboptimal cholesterol levels,
high fasting glucose, and elevated blood pressure. My mom experienced all
of them, and 93 percent of Americans are in the danger zone on at least one
key metabolic marker.
Aside from some significant excess belly fat, my mom appeared healthy
on the outside. She was vibrant, happy, and energetic, and actually looked
years younger than her age. This is a funny thing about metabolic
dysfunction: it doesn’t necessarily show up everywhere all at once, and it
can look very different in different individuals, based on which cell types
show the manifestations most obviously.
Her case is only one example of something that is happening every day
to millions of people and families. I am writing this book because her story
is relevant to everyone. Disease isn’t some random occurrence that might
happen in the future. It is a result of the choices you make and how you feel
today. If you are battling annoying and seemingly nonlethal health issues—
like fatigue, brain fog, anxiety, arthritis, infertility, erectile dysfunction, or
chronic pain—an underlying contributor to these conditions is generally the
same thing that will lead to a “major” illness sometime later in life if
nothing changes in how you care for your body. This information stings and
can be scary, but it’s crucial to convey: if you ignore the minor issues as
signs of Bad Energy brewing inside your body today, you could get much
louder signals in the future.

Waking Up
For most of my adult life, I was a vocal advocate for the modern health care
system and collected credentials to rise within its ranks: a research
internship at the National Institutes of Health (NIH) at age sixteen,
president of my Stanford class at eighteen, best undergraduate human
biology thesis award at age twenty-one, top of my Stanford Medical School
class at twenty-five, a surgical resident in ear, nose, and throat (ENT)
surgery at Oregon Health & Science University (OHSU) by age twenty-six,
and winner of ENT research awards at thirty. I had been published in
premier medical journals, presented my research at national conferences,
spent thousands of lonely nights studying, and was the pride of my family.
It was my entire identity.
But five years into surgical residency, I met Sophia.
Recurrent sinus infections had plagued this fifty-two-year-old woman,
leading to a persistent foul smell in her nose and difficulty breathing. Over
the past year, her physicians had prescribed steroid nasal sprays, antibiotics,
oral steroid medication, and medicated nasal rinses. She’d undergone CT
scans, in-office nasal endoscopy procedures, and a nasal polyp biopsy. Her
recurrent infections caused her to miss work and lose sleep, and she was
overweight and had prediabetes. She had also been taking medication for
high blood pressure and dealt with back pain and depression, which she
attributed to her health issues and getting older. She saw a different doctor
and received a separate treatment plan for each issue.
None of Sophia’s sinus medications were successfully solving the
problem, so she came to my department for surgery. In 2017, I was a young
doctor starting my fifth and final year of surgery training.
After Sophia was wheeled into the operating room, I inserted a rigid
camera into her nose and used a small instrument to break up the bones and
swollen tissue and vacuum them out of the sinus passages just millimeters
from her brain. In the postoperative area, the anesthesiologists struggled to

control her blood sugar and blood pressure with an insulin drip and
intravenous antihypertensives.
“You saved me,” she said while grasping my hand after the procedure.
But looking into her eyes after the surgery, I didn’t feel proud. I felt
defeated.
At best, I had relieved the downstream symptoms of her chronic nasal
inflammation, but I had done absolutely nothing to cure the underlying
dynamics causing that inflammation. I also did absolutely nothing to help
with her other health conditions. I knew she would return with many other
symptoms and continue going through the revolving doors of several
specialists for her health issues that weren’t my focus. Was she leaving this
post-op area “healthy” after I’d permanently altered her nasal anatomy?
What were the chances that the factors driving her prediabetes, excess fat,
depression, and high blood pressure (all conditions that I knew had some
relationship to inflammation) had absolutely nothing to do with the
recurrent inflammation in her nose?
Sophia was my second sinusitis surgery of the day, the fifth of my week.
I’d performed hundreds of these operations during residency on angry,
inflamed sinus tissue. But so many patients kept returning to the hospital for
follow-up sinus procedures and treatments for other diseases—with
diabetes, depression, anxiety, cancer, heart disease, dementia, hypertension,
and obesity among the most common.
Despite surgically treating inflamed tissues of the head and neck day in
and day out, not once—ever—was I taught what causes the inflammation in
the human body or about its connection to the inflammatory chronic
diseases so many Americans are facing today. Not once was I prompted to
ask, Huh, why all the inflammation? My gut told me that all of Sophia’s
conditions could be related, but instead of tapping into that curiosity, I
always stayed in the lane of my specialty, followed the guidelines, and
reached for my prescription pad and scalpel.
Soon after my encounter with Sophia, I felt an overwhelming conviction
that I couldn’t cut into another patient until I figured out why—despite the

monumental size and scope of our health care system—the patients and
people around me were sick in the first place.
I wanted to understand why so many conditions were rising
exponentially and in clear patterns indicating potential connections. And
most important, I needed to figure out whether there was anything I could
do as a physician to keep my patients out of the operating room. I had
become a doctor to generate foundational, vibrant health for my patients—
not to drug, cut, and bill as many bodies as I possibly could each day.
It was increasingly becoming clear to me that although I was surrounded
by practitioners who got into medicine to help patients, the reality is that
every institution that impacts health—from medical schools to insurance
companies to hospitals to pharma companies—makes money on
“managing” disease, not curing patients. These incentives were clearly
creating an invisible hand that was guiding good people into allowing bad
outcomes.
Striving to reach the top of the medical field had been my laser-focused
path. If I stopped operating on patients, I had no backup plan and half a
million dollars had gone toward my education. At that time, I still couldn’t
imagine what I’d do other than be a surgeon.
But these considerations all seemed so inconsequential compared to the
one blaring fact I couldn’t get out of my head: The patients aren’t getting
better.
In September 2018, on my thirty-first birthday and just months shy of
completing my five-year residency, I walked into the chairman’s office at
OHSU and quit. With a wall full of awards and honors for my clinical and
research performance and with prominent hospital systems pursuing me for
mid-six-figure faculty roles, I walked out of the hospital and embarked on a
journey to understand the real reasons why people get sick and to figure out
how to help patients restore and sustain their health.
The insights I learned on this quest couldn’t save my mom—her cancer
had likely been growing quietly in her body long before I left conventional
medical practice. I am writing this book because millions of people can

improve and extend their lives right now with simple principles doctors
aren’t taught in medical school.
I am also convinced our lack of understanding about the root cause of
disease represents a larger spiritual crisis. We have become disconnected
from the awe about our bodies and life, separated from the production of
the foods we eat, made more sedentary by our work and school, and
detached from our core biological needs, like sunlight, quality sleep, and
clean water and air. This has put our bodies into a state of confusion and
fear. Our cells are dysregulated at scale, which of course impacts our brains
and bodies, which determine our perception of the world. The medical
system has capitalized on this fear and offers “solutions” to symptoms of
this dysfunction. That’s why the medical system is the largest and fastestgrowing industry in the United States. We are locked into a reductionist,
fragmented view of the body that breaks us into dozens of separate parts.
This view does not foster human flourishing. In reality, the body is an aweinspiring and interconnected entity that is constantly regenerating and
exchanging energy and matter with the external environment every time we
eat, breathe, or bask in sunlight!
There is no question that the American medical system has produced
miracles in the past 120 years, but we have lost our way when it comes to
preventing and reversing metabolic conditions that account for over 80
percent of health care costs and deaths today. The situation is dire, but this
is a book of optimism and practicality. The fact that we can vigorously
criticize and reform our health care system is one of its strengths.
Throughout prior crucible moments, human ingenuity has created
advancements and systems changes that few could imagine. The next
revolution in health will come from understanding how the root of almost
every disease relates to energy, and how less specialization, rather than
more, is the answer. We will see that our ailments are connected rather than
siloed, a reality that research is only recently allowing us to see clearly, now
that we have tools and technology to truly understand what’s happening
inside our cells at the molecular level. And when we shift our framework to
this energy-centric paradigm, we will rapidly heal our system and our

bodies. Fortunately, improving Good Energy is easier and simpler than it
seems—and you can take steps to prioritize it in your life. This book will
show you how.
Part 1 explains the science of how our metabolism is at the root of
disease and the incentives that lead our current system to ignore it. Part 2
provides mindsets and tactics you can start implementing to feel better
today. Part 3 brings all of these concepts together into an actionable plan,
and Part 4 presents thirty-three recipes that include Good Energy eating
principles. Throughout the book, I’ll use stories from my experience inside
and outside the system and insights from metabolic health leaders.
Good Energy is the goal, and the state of mind—and what it can create
—is incredible . . . a world where we are eating beautiful food, moving our
bodies, interacting with nature, taking pleasure in the world around us, and
feeling fulfilled, vibrant, and alive. The view is exciting, because living
with Good Energy means good food, happy people, real connections, and
expanding into the most beautiful expression of our precious lives.
It’s true that the challenges we’re up against on the quest for upleveling
our health are enormous. Yet I have seen that all of this can start to change
right now. It starts when you simply ask one question: What would it feel
like to have Good Energy? I invite you to ask that question now: What
would it feel like to have your body functioning optimally, for your body to
just be at ease enjoying this human experience, for your mind to be working
clearly and creatively, and to feel that your life is established on a steady
and strong source of inner power? Imagine a powerful life force from
within that allows you to take on each day with pleasure, energy, gratitude,
and joy. Take a moment. Really feel it. Imagine it. Let yourself.
My hope for this book is to change your life by enabling you to feel
better today and prevent disease tomorrow. It all begins by understanding
and acting upon the science of Good Energy.
To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

PA R T 1

THE TRUTH ABOUT ENERGY

CHAPT ER

1

Siloed Health vs. Energy-Centric Health

At the end of medical school, I had to choose one of forty-two specialties:
one part of the body to devote my life to.
Separation defines modern medicine. Starting from my first year of
medical education, I funneled from a broad perspective on the body to
increasingly narrower and narrower ones. When I picked a premed major in
college, I left the study of physics and chemistry behind to focus solely on
biology. In med school, I memorized all the facts on human biology, no
longer focusing on other biologic systems like plants and animals. As a
resident, I was focused on performing surgeries on one specific area: the
head and neck, and thought little about the rest of the body.
Had I completed five years of that training, I would have been eligible to
zero in even further on a subspecialty within that specialty. I could have
become a rhinologist (focused solely on the nose), a laryngologist (focused
solely on the larynx), an otologist (focused solely on the three tiny bones of
the inner ear, plus the cochlea and eardrum), or a specialist in head and neck
cancer (among other options). The primary goal for my career would have
been to become better and better at treating a smaller and smaller part of the
body.
If I were really good at what I did, maybe the medical establishment
would even name a disease of a body part after me, as they did for the dean
of Stanford Medical School—a world-renowned otologist named Dr. Lloyd
B. Minor, who focused his entire career on about three square inches of the

body. In the condition named after him, Minor’s syndrome, microscopic
changes in the inner ear bones are thought to lead to various balance and
otologic symptoms. Dean Minor represented a physician’s ultimate model
of success: stay focused on your specialty and climb the ladder. You also
protect yourself that way: for the average clinician, staying in your lane
ensures you don’t incur liability for incorrectly treating something out of
your scope of practice.
By my fifth year, I was the chief resident in otology, a subspecialty of
head and neck surgery, focusing on those three square inches of the body
around the ear that control hearing and balance. I frequently saw patients
like Sarah, a thirty-six-year-old woman who visited the otology clinic
gripped with intractable migraine, with attacks occurring more than ten
times per month. Since dizziness and auditory symptoms can be a feature of
this debilitating neurological condition, sufferers often find their way to this
specialized department as they make their way through a labyrinth of
providers. After a decade of bad migraine episodes, Sarah’s world had
shrunk dramatically in scope. As she was living on disability and largely
housebound, her existence revolved around her condition. She was so lightsensitive that she always wore wraparound sunglasses and walked with a
cane due to her inflammatory arthritis. A support dog always stood by her
side.
Reviewing her hundred pages of faxed medical charts, I discovered she
had seen eight medical specialists in the past year to address a larger cluster
of persistent and painful symptoms. A neurologist had prescribed
medications for her migraine attacks. A psychiatrist had prescribed a
selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI) for her depression. A
cardiologist had prescribed hypertension medication. A palliative care
specialist had prescribed additional remedies for the unremitting pain
throughout her joints. Despite all these interventions and medications, Sarah
was still suffering.
Carefully paging through the documents, I felt stunned. What could I
possibly offer this woman that she had not already tried?

As part of my routine migraine intake questions, I asked if she had had
any success with trying a migraine elimination diet. She had not heard of it.
That surprised me. Printed handouts on that very subject were readily
available in our clinics to give to patients like her. But nutritional
intervention hadn’t registered as important enough for my colleagues to
mention. Instead, she had been sent for testing, undergone expensive CT
scans, and was prescribed psychoactive and other medications—one on top
of the other. She visibly balked when I described the hopeful possibilities of
a diet that would eliminate migraine trigger foods. If such a mundane thing
as food could have helped, her body language suggested, the medical
professionals would have told her long ago. She wanted to try another
medication.
Sarah’s case was not the first time I had encountered such a scenario.
Patients often came in with stubborn cases of chronic disease, toting stacks
of paperwork. But Sarah was cruelly young for this amount of suffering,
and she’d bounced between so many different specialists so quickly that her
case made the system failure especially upsetting. She was sick and getting
sicker, living with not just one chronic illness but multiple ones.
Unbeknownst to her, but evident to me, her life span was almost certainly
shortening. She was frustrated with the care she’d received, yet she was still
reliant on it—clinging to it, even.
I tried to hide my discomfort. How could I dole out another prescription
without encouraging Sarah to try some simple strategies with significant
data to back them up? My stomach churned at the knowledge that another
prescription drug would not be the magic bullet that would radically change
her life. She and I could go through the charade of engendering hope in a
new medication, scheduling a follow-up six weeks out to see how it
worked, and leaving our meeting feeling satisfied that we’d done the best
we could. But at some level, we both knew a “medication deficiency” was
not why Sarah had illness expressed throughout her entire body.
I could do what the other doctors entrusted with her care had done—and
what I was explicitly expected to do: name the condition according to
symptom-based criteria, rule out serious life-threatening issues, attach a

prescription, input billing codes, and move on. That would be practicing
respectable medicine. But Sarah, and the other complex cases like hers,
made me want to work differently, to look upstream, and question why
those symptoms might be there.

PEELING BACK THE LAYERS: WHAT CAUSES DISEASE?
Invisible Inflammation: Everywhere, All at Once

When in doubt, always start by asking questions. And the obvious one in
Sarah’s case was the following: Were her different conditions so separate
after all, or did something connect them that my colleagues and I couldn’t
see?
Looking through her labs, I noticed one of her inflammatory markers
was high. I vaguely recalled learning in med school that this marker was
high in conditions like diabetes and obesity. I noted that Sarah also had
inflammatory arthritis. Chronic inflammation was at play here. So I asked
another question: Could inflammation have a role in causing migraine?
Surprisingly, a quick PubMed search offered over a thousand scientific
papers connecting the two.
I knew well that inflammation refers to the swelling, heat, redness, pus,
or pain created when immune cells rush to a site of injury or infection. All
these symptoms are helpful: they indicate that a robust and coordinated
defense is occurring to contain, resolve, and heal damaged or endangered
tissue. The immune system is always looking for anything foreign,
unwanted, or injurious and will jump to respond this way within seconds of
detecting something wrong. After the problem is resolved, the immune
system turns off the inflammation, and everything returns to normal. The
heat, redness, swelling, and pain go away.
But Sarah’s physical checkup and other lab markers were confounding.
She had no injury, no overt infection I could see. Nothing was temporary
about the phenomenon in this case. Her inflammatory response was
switched on—and left on—to the point that it was causing collateral

damage to her body. Why would the immune system stay so activated and
remain in such a persistent state of alarm and defense—chronically
inflamed—outside of acute situations, even to the extent of causing
collateral damage to the body’s tissues?
When I reflected on what I was treating as an ENT surgeon, something
struck me: it was almost all inflammation. In medicine, the suffix -itis
means inflammation, and our practice was made up of sinusitis, tonsillitis,
pharyngitis, laryngitis, otitis, chondritis, thyroiditis, tracheitis, adenoiditis,
rhinitis, epiglottitis, sialadenitis, parotitis, cellulitis, mastoiditis,
osteomyelitis, vestibular neuritis, labyrinthitis, glossitis, and more. I was an
inflammation physician, and I didn’t even realize it! As an ENT, my job
revolved around putting out inflammation wherever it appeared in the ear,
nose, or throat. Often the process included using oral, nasal, intravenous,
inhaled, and topical anti-inflammatory medications: Flonase spray,
compounded steroid nasal irrigations, prednisone creams, IV Solu-Medrol,
and inhaled nebulizers of steroids—all kinds of things to address the
immune system getting so revved up in these bodies.
Suppose the medications failed, as was the case with my sinusitis patient
Sophia. In that case, we might go to the next level in surgery: creating holes
in a patient’s body to reduce obstruction caused by inflammation and let
inflammatory fluid drain. Sometimes we would intervene mechanically to
force the anatomy out of the way of swelling. We might insert tubes through
the eardrum to let fluid drain, drill through the skull bones to release
trapped pus, or insert a balloon to enlarge an airway narrowed by chronic
inflammation.
The medications and surgery would temporarily turn the inflammation
off or minimize its effects—like subduing the invader with a tactical jujitsu
move to the floor—but the tissues would often swell again or the pus would
collect once more in whatever area was blocked. It wasn’t in our job
description as medical professionals to look for why inflammation kept
returning.
But once I began peeling back the onion, the whys wouldn’t stop. Why
were the immune systems of my patients like Sophia and Sarah so

chronically revved up? Why were cells that should be healthy sending out
“fear” signals to recruit helper immune cells to come to their aid? I couldn’t
see or detect an obvious threat like a cut or an infection, nor could my
patients. So why were these cells so frightened on the microscopic level?
I reflected on Sarah’s labs and the inflammatory marker that I knew was
strongly associated with chronic diseases like diabetes, obesity, and
autoimmune diseases. And suddenly it struck me. Could all her symptoms
—not just those under my purview as an ENT—be driven by inflammation?
Is one mechanism driving so many different disease states? Was every part
of her body responding fearfully to the same invisible threats? From my
point of view today, that truth seems utterly self-evident. Research has
shown that chronic inflammation is a crucial instigator of all kinds of
diseases and conditions outside of the ear, nose, and throat—from cancer
and cardiovascular disease to autoimmune diseases to respiratory infections
to gastrointestinal conditions to skin disorders to neurological disorders. Yet
it was not part of the institutional medical culture to focus on those
connections nor to go deeper to ask why all that inflammation is there.
Then I began to realize how much I knew. Ever since I had fulfilled my
required histology coursework and gazed at hundreds of slides of human
tissue and flesh under a microscope, I had been in awe of the nearly forty
trillion cells that make up the human body. I felt awe at their complexity
and tiny importance as life’s very foundation and how all that we are is a
collection of cells. They hold so much information inside. Each cell is a
little universe of buzzing work and activity. And the result of all that
activity, simply put, is our lives.
Our cells cannot talk or tell us what they fear. But incredibly, if we look
from the perspective of the cell, the answers to the whys are there—
complex, yes, but not nearly as baffling, complicated, or specialized as
some might want us to believe.
After I left my position as a chief resident at OHSU, an opportunity for
discovery opened before me. Free to fill the gaps my conventional
education had left—and feeling infinitely healthier and more energized—I
excitedly leaped into advanced training in nutritional biochemistry, cell

biology, systems and network biology, and functional medicine, expanding
and revolutionizing my understanding of health and disease. I got to know
dozens of physicians who, like me, had exited prestigious institutions in
pursuit of better medicine in the quest of learning to help patients actually
heal rather than be managed. Reinspired and reinvigorated, I soon opened a
small medical practice in the Pearl District neighborhood of Portland,
happily settling into a coworking space with sunny windows and many
plants. I let a few friends and colleagues know I was doing something
different: instead of offering sick care, I focused on generating health.
Instead of managing diseases from the pinnacle of medicine as an esteemed
surgeon, I would work to restore and maintain good health from the
pyramid’s base, via having deep conversations and creating personalized
plans. Together, my patients and I would build the foundations of a solid
and healthy body from the ground up. Word got out: my schedule was
quickly full.
Many patients came to see me with clusters of chronic and intractableseeming conditions like Sarah’s and Sophia’s. But this time, we started
treating the problem from a different place: the foundational cellular level. I
put the onus on giving the cells what they needed to do their jobs and
removing what was blocking them, with a focus on nutritional changes,
lifestyle changes, and overall cellular support. The results my patients
achieved were different, too—often, transformative. Stubborn problems—
weight gain, lousy sleep, unshakable pain, chronic conditions, high
cholesterol, and even reproductive issues—began to resolve, sometimes in
weeks, sometimes months. Inflammation began to disappear, never to
return. Patients often reduced, and even eliminated, their medication
regimen. Hope and optimism about what life could feel like returned in the
dedicated people I was fortunate to help. Often, the results came from doing
far less. They occurred from doing the opposite of what I had always
learned, which was to add the next medication and add the next
intervention.
I learned many things through practicing medicine in this new way. Not
the least was that inflammation—which leads to disease, pain, and suffering

—takes root because core dysfunctions occur inside our cells, impacting
how they function, signal, and replicate themselves. Something became
blatantly clear: if we truly want to restore general health in the body and
mind, we must look one layer deeper than the mechanism of inflammation
alone and into the very center of the cells themselves.
Trouble Where It’s Hard to See: Metabolism, Mitochondria, and
Malfunction

After years of my digging for it, the answer to what is causing inflammation
inside patients like Sarah turned out to be remarkably simple: the chronic
inflammation is often a response to our body’s cells feeling threatened by
being persistently underpowered due to Bad Energy processes. Immune
cells rush to areas of the body that are in danger, thus producing
inflammation.
An underpowered cell—metabolically dysfunctional, struggling to make
energy, and sputtering along through its daily work—is a cell that is
threatened and at risk. This flailing cell will send out chemical alarm signals
and recruit the immune system to help it. In their efforts to help, the
immune cells cause immense collateral damage—creating a literal war
within the body to protect itself from itself—that results in worse
symptoms. This is a key reason why chronic inflammation typically goes in
lockstep with metabolic dysfunction and widespread symptoms.
Diving into the world of cellular biology sounds like an intimidating
prospect. But there’s one simple measure that can powerfully reframe how
we understand health and disease: how well or poorly the mitochondria in
the cell are making energy.
Likely you have heard the word “mitochondria,” and perhaps you know
it from high school biology as “the powerhouse of the cell.” Mitochondria
convert food energy into cellular energy. These tiny organelles are
transformers: they take breakdown products of the food we eat and are
tasked to convert it into a currency of energy that our cells can use to do
their many jobs. Different types of cells in the body—liver, skin, brain,

ovarian, eye, and so forth—have vastly different amounts of mitochondria
inside them. Some cells have hundreds of thousands inside; others have just
a handful, depending on what kind of work that cell must do and what its
energy needs are to power that work.
When the body is in a healthy state, fatty acids from dietary fats, and
glucose (sugar) from dietary carbohydrates, are broken down in digestion.
Then they enter the bloodstream and are transported into individual cells.
Glucose is further broken down inside the cell. These molecules are
transported inside the mitochondria and through a series of chemical
reactions generate electrons (charged particles). These electrons get carried
and passed through specialized mitochondrial machinery to ultimately
synthesize adenosine triphosphate (ATP). This is the most important
molecule in the human body: it is the energy currency that “pays” for all the
activity inside our cells, and therefore pays for our lives.
There’s a lot of ATP, as it turns out. Trillions upon trillions of chemical
reactions happen in our bodies every second, the result of which bubbles up
into our lives! All these activities run on energy—namely, the ATP that the
mitochondria produce—and they require enough at all times. Without all
this hubbub, we’d fall apart, literally; we’d be decomposing on the ground
with no energetic force holding us together.
Even though ATP is a microscopic molecule, the average human
produces about eighty-eight cumulative pounds of it per day—constantly
making, using, and recycling it so fast that we never even notice. Each of
our thirty-seven trillion cells is like a little city—continually bustling with
action, transactions, and production—and contained by its cell membrane.
While the processes that our cells engage in every second are far too many
to count, the main things that a cell needs for optimal functioning can be
grouped into seven categories of activity, and all require ATP—and
therefore Good Energy—to occur properly.
1. Make Proteins: Cells are responsible for synthesizing approximately
seventy thousand different types of proteins needed for all aspects of
building and operating our bodies. Proteins come in all shapes, sizes,

and functions and have an array of responsibilities. They can be
receptors on the surface of cells, channels through which things like
glucose can flow into and out of the cell, structural scaffolding inside
the cell to give it shape and help it move, regulators that sit on the DNA
and activate or suppress genes, signaling molecules like hormones and
neurotransmitters that transmit information to other cells, and anchors
that keep neighboring cells attached together. Moreover, several
different proteins can bind together to form specialized machines in the
cell, such as the rotary turbine called ATP synthase that lives inside the
mitochondria and is the final step in making ATP. These are just a few
of the things that proteins do, but, simply put, they are structural,
mechanical, and signaling workhorses in the cell.
2. Repair, Regulate, and Replicate DNA: Cells are responsible for replicating
their DNA to ensure that each new cell has a complete copy of the
genetic material during the process of cell division. Cells also repair
any damage to the DNA to prevent mutations that could lead to cancer
and other diseases. In addition to this, cells have complex mechanisms
for modifying the folding and three-dimensional structure of the
genome through epigenetic changes, which regulate which genes are
expressed in a given cell type and at what time. Our cells are constantly
turning over and replacing themselves, and the DNA replication and
cell division processes allow for this.
3. Cell Signaling: Inside a cell, all activity is coordinated via cell signaling—
microscopic biochemical messages constantly being transported around
the inside and outside of the cell to give instructions and information
about what needs to be done, where things need to go, and what needs
to turn on and off. For instance, in the body’s effort to bring blood
sugar back down to normal after a meal, the body will produce insulin.
The insulin binds to the surface of cells, kicking off a series of signals
inside the cell that prompts the cell to send glucose channels to the cell
membrane to allow glucose to flow in. Cells also constantly
communicate with other cells in the body through various signaling
pathways, in which they receive and transmit information through

chemical signals, like hormones, neurotransmitters, and electrical
impulses.
4. Transport: Just as trucks transport cargo all over the country, cells must
move molecular materials all around the inside of the cell for things to
function properly. Each cell is capable of packaging, labeling, and
shipping molecules throughout its microscopic environment with
incredible precision. For instance, when the cell makes a batch of the
neurotransmitter serotonin (which helps regulate mood, among other
things), it packages it in a cellular bag called a vesicle and sends the
vesicle on a motor protein (like a little car) to the cell membrane to act
on neighboring neurons. This process creates your thoughts and
feelings. Some cells—like immune cells—must also transport
themselves around the body at times. When an immune cell is triggered
by an inflammatory chemical signal to go to the scene of a threatening
situation, it might launch itself out of the bone marrow into the
bloodstream, as if it were jumping on the freeway. Once it reaches the
organ in danger, it will crawl through the organ by extending fingerlike
projections until it reaches the site of threat where it needs to do its
work.
5. Homeostasis: Cells are constantly working to maintain healthy operating
conditions, like pH, salt concentration, gradients of charged molecules
that can generate electrical impulses, and temperature. This
maintenance of an optimal environment in which the body’s chemical
reactions can take place is called homeostasis.
6. Cell Waste Cleanup and Autophagy: Cells are also able to recycle their own
components through a process called autophagy (literally “selfeating”), which is a way for cells to clear out damaged parts and
proteins and recycle the raw materials. When the mitochondria undergo
this recycling and renewal, it is called mitophagy, a critical component
of maintaining healthy mitochondrial populations within cells. More
dramatically, cells can also incite their own death to make way for
healthier cells, a critical process called apoptosis.

7. Metabolism: And of course, the production of energy itself. Even this
requires energy to work!
Every one of these activities requires ATP—made by well-functioning
mitochondria—to occur. When the suitable materials are available in the
correct amounts, the mitochondria produce sufficient energy for the cell’s
activities. This trickles up to health throughout the body. Organs are, in
simple terms, aggregations of cells. Groups of healthy, energized cells that
can carry out all their duties become healthy organs that carry out their jobs.
Every cell has the blueprint it needs to work; it simply needs the resources.
But when the mitochondria do not have the right conditions or they get
inundated with the wrong materials in the wrong amounts, they don’t
produce enough ATP for the cells to do their jobs. This cellular level
problem of Bad Energy not only directly trickles up to problems in the
organs but leads cells to sound an alarm bell: Something’s not right, we need
help. Our immune system—always ready to help—is there in a flash.
But in this case, the problem is not an infection or a wound that immune
cells can mop up and be done with: it’s something more profound, a
fundamental problem with how the cells function. And it’s something the
immune cells can’t solve, because the thing that is robbing the mitochondria
of doing its job, resulting in cells not being able to do their work, is outside
of us. It’s the environment in which our bodies now exist, an environment
that—from our cells’ perspective—is virtually unrecognizable from a
hundred years ago.
Our modern diets and lifestyles are synergistically ravaging our
mitochondria. Our mitochondria and the greater cells that house them coevolved over eons in relationship with our environment. Their mechanisms
work in connection with a combination of inputs and information that come
from the outside world into our bodies and ultimately into them. Certain
kinds of nutrients, sunlight, and information from bacteria in the gut, among
other things, all help trigger or supply the cells and their powerhouses with
what they require to work. But many of those inputs and information
streams have changed radically, resulting in blocks to proper mitochondrial
function and downright damage to it.

A mighty immune cell trying to support a cell that is ailing and
threatened from its mitochondrial dysfunction is rendered completely
impotent. The immune cell cannot halt the damaging factors and the lack of
resources resulting from the unnatural environment of our modern industrial
world. An immune cell can’t stop you from drinking a soda, filter your
water, turn off the stress-inducing notifications on your phone, prevent you
from eating hormone-disrupting pesticides and microplastics, or get you to
go to sleep earlier. So the immune cell will use the tools at its disposal: it
will recruit more immune cells, send out more inflammatory signals, and
just keep fighting until things resolve. But the problems don’t resolve,
because the damaging environmental inputs never resolve. This is the root
of chronic inflammation.
A group of cells not working due to mitochondrial dysfunction and the
immune system’s overzealous—yet helpless—response to infiltrate that area
and support it results in organ dysfunction, which manifests as a symptom.
Most of the chronic symptoms we battle today are simply different
expressions of this same disaster happening in other parts of the body: the
mitochondria are hurt by the way we’re living, a poorly powered cell
becomes dysfunctional, the immune system tries to help but can’t, and, in
trying, the immune system makes the issue worse.
How exactly does the environment we live in today ravage our
mitochondria? The answer comes down to ten main factors (which we will
discuss more in Part 2), all of which are tightly interlinked:
1. Chronic Overnutrition: Chronic overnutrition, which refers to consuming
more calories and macronutrients than the body needs over an extended
period, can lead to mitochondrial dysfunction in several ways. We eat
approximately 20 percent more calories than we did one hundred years
ago, and 700 to 3,000 percent more fructose, all of which the body
must process. Imagine being asked to do 700 to 3,000 percent more
work than you normally do daily—you’d collapse! The cell simply
cannot process all the material coming in from too much food, so
things back up, damaging by-products are produced in excess, and

many processes in the cell, including the efforts of mitochondria, get
gummed up. This strain leads to the inside of the cell filling with toxic
fats, which block the cell’s ability to do its normal signaling and
activity. Additionally, when mitochondria are taxed with the burden of
trying to convert so much excess food to energy, they produce and
release reactive molecules called free radicals. Free radicals are
molecules with a negatively charged, highly reactive electron that seeks
to neutralize itself by binding to other structures in the mitochondria
and cell and, in doing so, causes significant damage. The body has
several mechanisms for safely neutralizing free radicals, including the
production of antioxidants, which bind and quell free radicals.
However, when the production of these damaging molecules exceeds
the body’s capacity to handle them, as is the case with chronic
overnutrition, a damaging imbalance called oxidative stress can occur
that hurts the mitochondria and surrounding cellular structures.
Normally, a low and controlled level of free radicals is healthy and they
act as signaling molecules in the cell. But when the level gets out of
control and oxidative stress takes hold, it’s a chain reaction of damage.
Healthy levels of free radicals represent a cozy campfire; oxidative
stress is a destructive forest fire.
A key reason why we are chronically consuming far too much food
energy is because of the wide accessibility of ultra-processed,
industrially manufactured foods, which impair our body’s selfregulatory satiety mechanisms and directly trigger hunger and cravings.
These ultra-processed industrial foods are chemically engineered to be
addictive and make up nearly 70 percent of calories that people in the
United States consume today.
2. Nutrient Deficiencies: The lack of certain micronutrients, such as vitamins
and minerals, can lead to mitochondrial dysfunction. The final steps in
making energy in the mitochondria involve electrons moving through
five protein structures called the electron transport chain, which
ultimately powers a small molecular motor that churns out ATP. These
five protein complexes all need micronutrients to activate them to

work, like little locks and keys. Unfortunately, we have the most
micronutrient-depleted diet we’ve ever had in history. As much as half
of all people in the United States are deficient in at least some critical
micronutrients. This is partly because of soil depletion (from modern
industrial farming practices like pesticide use and mechanized tilling)
and the lack of diversity in our diets. At least 75 percent of people are
not eating the recommended amounts of vegetables and fruits. Most of
our calories come from refined forms of commodity crops like wheat,
soy, and corn, all of which are micronutrient deficient and doubly cause
problems by flooding our bodies with a dense excess of carbohydrates
and inflammatory fats. For example, a deficiency in coenzyme Q10
(CoQ10), a micronutrient that is essential for the function of the
electron transport chain, has been shown in research studies to lead to
decreased ATP synthesis. Other micronutrients involved in key
mitochondrial processes involve selenium, magnesium, zinc, and
several B vitamins.
3. Microbiome Issues: A healthy, flourishing gut microbiome, fed with
microbiome-supportive foods and free of microbiome-harming
chemicals, produces thousands of “post-biotic” chemicals that travel
into our bodies from our gut and act as important signaling molecules,
some of which directly affect the mitochondria. Post-biotic molecules,
such as short-chain fatty acids (SCFAs), are essential for the proper
function of mitochondria and to protect mitochondria against oxidative
stress. When microbiome imbalance—called dysbiosis—takes hold, the
production of these helpful chemicals gets derailed, depriving
mitochondria of this signaling and support. Dysbiosis can be triggered
by excess refined sugar and ultra-processed foods, pesticides,
medications like nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory medications (NSAIDs,
like Advil), antibiotics, chronic stress, lack of sleep, alcohol
consumption, physical inactivity, smoking, and infections, among other
factors.
4. Sedentary Lifestyle: Lack of physical activity can lead to decreased
mitochondrial function and a reduction in the number and size of

mitochondria in cells. Movement is a powerful signal to the cells that
they need to produce more energy for the muscles to do work, and as
such, physical activity has a relationship with stimulating the function
and number of mitochondria in cells in a positive way through the
upregulation of several genes and hormonal pathways. Additionally,
exercise stimulates our body to generate antioxidant molecules. When
we’re sedentary, we have less protection from free radicals, which can
then damage the mitochondria, and the positive signals for the
mitochondria are absent, leading to worse mitochondrial function.
5. Chronic Stress: Prolonged stress can lead to mitochondrial dysfunction
through several mechanisms. The first is that it activates the release of
the stress hormone cortisol, which is a steroid hormone that can directly
damage the mitochondria. Cortisol is known to inhibit the expression of
genes involved in the production of new mitochondria, thus reducing
the number of mitochondria in the cell, leading to less energy
production. Excess cortisol also generates increased free radicals, in
part by inhibiting the production of antioxidants.
6. Medications and Drugs: Many medications hurt the function of
mitochondria. These include several antibiotics, chemotherapy drugs,
antiretroviral drugs, statins, beta-blockers, and high blood pressure
medications called calcium channel blockers. Alcohol,
methamphetamines, cocaine, heroin, and ketamine may also negatively
impact mitochondria.
7. Sleep Deprivation: Poor quality and quantity of sleep generate a wide
array of downstream effects that damage the mitochondria. Lack of
quality sleep leads to hormonal imbalances, including altered cortisol,
insulin, growth hormone, and melatonin levels, all of which interact
with the mitochondria. Additionally, sleep deprivation disrupts the
expression of genes involved in the production of new mitochondria
and replication of mitochondria. Like stress, sleep deprivation
generates increased free radicals, both by activating cellular machinery
that makes free radicals and by inhibiting the production of
antioxidants.

8. Environmental Toxins and Pollutants: Many synthetic industrial chemicals
that have entered our food supply, water, air, and consumer products
over the last century are wreaking havoc on our mitochondria. A nonexhaustive list includes pesticides; polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs);
phthalates found in plastics and scented products; perfluoroalkyl and
polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFASs) found in nonstick cookware, food
packaging, and many other consumer products; bisphenol A (BPA)
found in plastics and resins, dioxins, and others. Some natural
substances, like heavy metals, have made their way into our
environment and can directly impair the mitochondria as well. These
include lead, mercury, and cadmium. In addition to these, cigarette
smoke and vaping chemicals are some of the most potent toxins for our
mitochondria and biology. Have you ever wondered why cigarettes are
so terrible for our health? A key reason is that the chemicals in cigarette
smoke (like cyanide, aldehyde, and benzene) directly cause Bad
Energy: they impair mitochondrial function, mutate mitochondrial
DNA, and cause mitochondrial structural changes (like mitochondrial
swelling). Alcohol, too, can be considered a mitochondrial toxin and
has been shown to change mitochondrial shape and function, damage
mitochondrial DNA, generate oxidative stress, and impair the
generation of new mitochondria.
9. Artificial Light and Circadian Disruption: With the advent of portable digital
devices, we are being exposed to constant sources of artificial blue
light, which is now considered to be both a direct and indirect
contributor to mitochondrial dysfunction. Exposure to intense light at
unnatural times affects our circadian rhythms and the many metabolic
pathways that are meant to be activated in specific daily cycles that are
dictated by when our eyes (and therefore brains) are exposed to light.
Compounding this, we now spend little time outdoors, depriving
ourselves of viewing direct sunlight early in the morning, which is one
of the best signals we can give our brains to reinforce our natural
circadian rhythms.

10. “Thermoneutrality”: A hallmark of modern industrial life is spending most
of our time indoors at relatively consistent ambient temperatures, a
concept we’ll refer to as thermoneutrality. Interestingly, experiencing
swings in temperature is great for mitochondrial function, as cold
stimulates the body to generate more warmth by increasing
mitochondrial activity and stimulates more ATP generation and use.
Heat exposure has been shown to activate heat shock proteins (HSPs)
within cells, which can protect mitochondria from damage and help to
maintain their function. HSPs can also stimulate the production of new
mitochondria and improve their efficiency in producing ATP.
Blood Sugar and Insulin

When mitochondria are damaged by the factors listed above, they are not
able to do their job of converting food energy into cellular energy properly.
They become inefficient machines, causing things to back up, which is a big
problem.
Normally, fat and glucose breakdown products would be transported
into the mitochondria to be processed into ATP and be done with. In ideal,
healthy circumstances, our energy needs would roughly match our food
intake, our mitochondria would not be damaged by the ten environmental
factors outlined above, and the whole process would move along
seamlessly.
But that’s not what’s happening. With the mitochondria not working
properly, the conversion of fats and glucose to ATP becomes impaired, and
these raw materials are stored as damaging fats inside the cell. Any cell that
is not a fat cell that is filled with fats is a big problem, because the normal
cellular activities we outlined earlier, like cell signaling and the
transportation of items around the cell that allow for normal cellular
functioning, get blocked. It’s a traffic jam inside the cell caused by all this
excess fat. One of the cell-signaling pathways that is blocked when a cell is
filled with toxic fat is insulin signaling, which has a huge impact on the
levels of blood sugar circulating in the body.

Under normal circumstances, when there is a surge of sugar in the
bloodstream after eating and digesting a carbohydrate-rich meal, the
hormone insulin is released from the pancreas and floats around the body,
binding to insulin receptors on cells and signaling for those cells to bring
glucose channels from the inside of the cell to the cell membrane to let the
glucose flow inside. However, when a cell is filled with fat, this insulin
signaling process is impaired; glucose channels don’t get shuttled to the cell
membrane, and glucose doesn’t get let into the cell; it’s blocked. This
blocking, called insulin resistance, is a way the cell protects itself from
being overly bombarded with too much energy from food (glucose). The
cell “knows” that because of mitochondrial issues, it can’t convert that raw
material (glucose) to cellular energy, so it blocks the entry of glucose into
the cell. Insulin resistance causes glucose to remain in excess in the
bloodstream, where it causes a slew of problems.
That’s not the end of the story. The body is very smart. It knows that
excess blood sugar circulating around the bloodstream can cause problems,
so it tries extra hard to encourage the cells to take it up. It does this by
prompting the pancreas to produce much more insulin (leading to high
insulin levels in the blood) to overcome the insulin signaling block. And,
amazingly, this works—for a while. For years, the body can
overcompensate for its insulin resistance just by pumping out excess
insulin, bombarding the insulin receptors, and forcing glucose into cells.
During this period of overcompensation, blood sugar levels can appear to
be normal and healthy, when, in fact, severe dysfunction and insulin
resistance are at play. Over time, the overwhelmed cell—filled with fat and
dysfunctional mitochondria—just can’t keep stuffing glucose into itself.
This is when we start to see individuals have sharp rises in their blood sugar
levels and difficulty controlling their levels.
And therein lies the root of blood sugar problems, such as prediabetes
and type 2 diabetes, conditions that affect over 50 percent of adults and
nearly 30 percent of children in the United States. It’s a domino effect of
mitochondrial dysfunction—caused by several environmental factors—
which leads to a backup of glucose and fatty acids that convert to toxic fats

that fill the cell, thereby blocking insulin signaling, leading to a cell that
struggles to take in glucose from the bloodstream. Insulin resistance
ultimately leads to a rise in our day-to-day levels of blood sugar.
Adding fuel to the fire, the rising blood sugar levels can independently
stimulate the activation of the immune system and the generation of excess
free radicals, thus contributing to a tornado of dysfunction in the cells and
body. We’ve got mitochondrial dysfunction leading to inflammation and
excess free radicals, and we’ve got high blood sugar doing more of the
same. What’s more, chronically elevated blood sugar floating around the
bloodstream will lead to that excess sugar sticking to things—a process
called glycation. Structures in the body that get glycated with sugar won’t
work properly and are considered foreign to the immune system,
contributing even more to chronic inflammation.
A simple example of glycation causing dysfunction is in how it
generates wrinkles. Excess blood sugar sticks to the most abundant protein
in our skin, collagen. Normally, collagen gives our skin its structural
integrity. Glycation causes collagen to contort in shape and “cross-link,”
leading to wrinkles and the appearance of premature aging. Much more
serious and life-threatening effects of glycation can occur. For example,
glycation can cause issues with the lining of our blood vessels and
accelerate the process of vascular blockages called atherosclerosis, which
lead to heart attacks, stroke, peripheral vascular disease, retinopathy, kidney
disease, erectile dysfunction, and more.
About 74 percent of U.S. adults are overweight or obese, and 93.2
percent have metabolic dysfunction. These numbers sound high until you
realize how many levers of modern society are stacked against our
mitochondria and metabolism: too much sugar, too much stress, too much
sitting, too much pollution, too many pills, too many pesticides, too many
screens, too little sleep, and too little micronutrients. These trends—with
trillions of dollars behind them—are causing epidemic levels of
mitochondrial dysfunction and underpowered, sick, inflamed bodies.
The trifecta of cellular malfunction that is the root of virtually every
symptom and disease plaguing modern Americans may not be the stuff of

dinner table conversation. They may not be the most posted about topics on
Instagram. But you need to know what they are—because when you know
them, you get closer to understanding the root of the U.S. health care
epidemic, more so than almost any doctor, and closer to helping yourself
and your loved ones to heal, stay healthy, and be limitless during this
precious lifetime. The trifecta of dysfunction inside our bodies that
generates Bad Energy boils down to the following:
1. Mitochondrial Dysfunction: The cells can’t make energy properly because
they are overburdened with so much crap from the environment that
their energy factories—the mitochondria—are overtaxed and damaged,
leading to less ATP production and more fat stored inside cells, which
blocks normal cellular functions.
2. Chronic Inflammation: Mitochondrial dysfunction and low cellular energy
(ATP) production are perceived as a threat, so the body revs up a
fighting response. This response becomes chronic because the
perceived threat doesn’t go away unless the environment changes.
3. Oxidative Stress: The cells create damaging, reactive waste in the form of
free radicals while trying to process all the junk being thrown at them
from the environment and from damaged mitochondria. These free
radicals cause damage to cells, leading to dysfunction.

HOW TO MEASURE GOOD ENERGY
If you’re like the many thousands of people with whom I have shared this
information, you have probably come out of this dive into cellular biology
with one pressing question: How on earth do I know if those invisible
malfunctions are happening inside me?
It’s a great question. And luckily, we have some good answers. Simple
markers can show us “check engine” alerts. A most basic and accessible
way to see if you have a reasonable level of metabolic health is by checking
five markers that are almost always tested and tracked at your annual
checkup: blood sugar, triglycerides, high-density lipoprotein (HDL)

cholesterol, blood pressure, and waist circumference. When these markers
fall into an optimal range, in the absence of medication—see Chapter 4 for
exact specifications—you can deduce that your cellular energy production
is doing OK. Typically, you will feel vibrant, healthy, and pain-free. These
feelings, too, should tell you that your body has Good Energy, the
foundation of general good health.
When several of those markers fall outside the optimal range, however,
it’s a different story. The markers are signposts to the opposite state:
metabolic syndrome. Metabolic syndrome means cells are struggling to get
their jobs done because of problems in their energy production system.
Metabolic syndrome is clinically defined as having three or more of the
following traits:
Fasting glucose of 100 mg/dL or higher
A waistline of more than 35 inches for women and 40 inches for men
HDL cholesterol less than 40 mg/dL for men and 50 mg/dL for women
Triglycerides of 150 mg/dL or higher
Blood pressure of 130/85 mmHg or higher
The reason you want to know whether your markers have tipped into
suboptimal states is that it gives you a surefire clue that the Bad Energy
processes are happening inside the cells. And this needs to be corrected to
prevent or reverse the innumerable problems that can result from an
underpowered machine. You will learn much more about this in Part 2,
where I will show you how—despite the monumental challenges your cells
face on a daily basis—establishing (or reestablishing) proper functioning,
improving your biomarkers, building (or rebuilding) better health, and
recovering from (or preventing) the most common health issues and
diseases of our time is something that every person can do.
We’ve been taught that disease is often random (or hereditary), and my
definitive claim—that preventing some of the country’s largest killers is
within your control—probably sounds surprising. But when you dig into the

scientific literature, you can see a phenomenal picture: People with Good
Energy have a drastically lower risk of heart disease (#1 cause of death in
the United States), many leading forms of cancer (#2 cause of death), stroke
(#5 cause of death), Alzheimer’s disease (#7 cause of death), type 2 diabetes
(#8 cause of death), and liver disease (#10 cause of death). People with
Good Energy will be much more likely to recover from pneumonia (#9
cause of death), COVID-19 (#3 cause of death), and chronic lower
respiratory diseases (#6 cause of death). Studies show that 70 percent of
people with heart disease and 80 percent of those with Alzheimer’s have
dysfunctional blood glucose levels.
Poor energy metabolism, which is in part represented by elevated
glucose levels, is a target on your back for a slow and painful journey
toward death, a shorter life, innumerable brain and body symptoms, and
significantly higher costs. Even if you currently have more “minor”
symptoms, such as fatigue, infertility, and foggy thinking, the evidence is
clear: You can improve these issues by understanding the science of how
your body processes energy, by treating food as the information to optimize
this machine, and by utilizing some very simple behaviors in your daily life
as high-level biochemical information your cells require to thrive. You can
feel limitless, positive, sharp, powerful, and free.
But if you don’t heed the warnings these “minor” conditions are trying
to tell you, our Good Energy machinery will get worse over time, leading to
more serious symptoms. This is why it is tragic that patients are told
conditions like type 2 diabetes, heart disease, and obesity are totally
separate conditions. They are all warning signs of Bad Energy and can be
improved or reversed the same way.
Exiting the separatist, reductionist framework of medicine to take on
unifying cellular perspectives of health and disease felt like a sea change to
me. It probably feels that way as a patient as well. But now I feel like I have
a solid gold key in hand that opens what seemed like an impenetrable lock.
This key unlocks the possibility of your feeling and functioning better, even
when you’ve gotten stuck in long-standing, challenging, or even defeating
circumstances. This key holds a kind of superpower: one that can help all of

us, young and old alike, avert chronic diseases and symptoms of the mind
and body that have become tragically normalized today, and for people of
shockingly young ages. It is not normal for 74 percent of the country to be
overweight or obese, for fifty million people to have autoimmune diseases,
or for 25 percent of young adults to have fatty liver disease. It is not normal
for the leading cause of visits to the doctor to be vague feelings of “being
tired.”
You now have a powerful understanding of how nearly every common
symptom of the Western world is connected and how one of the biggest
misconceptions in medicine is that people in their twenties, thirties, and
forties are “healthy”—simply because they’re not overtly or egregiously
sick or overweight. (In fact, data suggests that most Americans in this age
group—regardless of weight—are not optimally healthy.) This superpower
is priceless in a world where the deck is stacked against us (and all forms of
life around us: plants, animals, and microorganisms alike), and where our
animating life force is being systematically and dramatically dimmed.
To understand why exactly that is, we need to zoom out from looking at
the interior of our cells to looking at something wide and far-reaching: the
metabolic spectrum of disease.
To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

2

Bad Energy Is the Root of Disease

At thirty-six, Lucy was increasingly frustrated by a cluster of health issues
impacting her well-being, confidence, and dreams for the future. In the
previous year, she’d seen a dermatologist to treat her adult acne, a
gastroenterologist to address her frequent bloating after meals, a
psychiatrist for her low mood and anxiety, and her primary care physician
for her insomnia. She and her husband had been trying for a baby for over
two years to no avail, making regular visits to her OB-GYN for
prescriptions to treat her polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS). She was about
to gear up for an expensive round of in vitro fertilization.
She was one of the first patients who sat across from me, looking for
answers, in the private practice I established after leaving residency.
Nothing had been working and she wanted to feel better, look better, and
start a family. She looked eager and slightly nervous, sitting in a
comfortable armchair in my plant-filled office, which intentionally looked
more like a peaceful living room than a clinical space. She had seen on my
website that I focused on addressing the root causes of illness rather than
just treating isolated symptoms, and something in her knew that she wanted
that.
By any statistical measure, Lucy was a typical American woman. After
all, she had no flagrant “lethal” disease and wasn’t at risk of being
immediately hospitalized or dying. She didn’t feel or look as good as she
thought she could, but wasn’t that the case for everyone? More than 19

percent of adult women take an antidepressant, and up to 26 percent of
women experience PCOS. Lucy’s conditions seem so common that she
always considered herself “healthy.” But she had a nagging feeling that
something wasn’t quite right and that she could live a life with more ease,
joy, and energy.
Over the course of a two-hour initial visit, Lucy and I began to peel back
the onion. Fatigue, acne, gastrointestinal upset, depression, insomnia, and
infertility seemed to Lucy and her doctors to be isolated issues. Noting
Lucy’s sense of defeat, I told her we would shift perspective and look at her
body differently. Her varied conditions, though occurring in different parts
of her body and having very different names, were more likely to be
branches of the same tree. Our work was to figure out what that tree was
and how to heal it.
In a routine doctor’s appointment, Lucy would have said she “eats and
sleeps well,” and the conversation about lifestyle would have been over. But
we dug deeper and found the following:
Sleep: Her husband was going to bed later than she did, and their cat

often jumped on the bed; both interrupted her sleep.
Food: Her diet consisted of many refined and ultra-processed foods, like
refined grain in tortillas, pita chips, and croutons, and added sugars in
granola bars, baked goods, and drinks.
Movement: She was doing yoga and going on weekend hikes, but these
were discrete bouts; she was otherwise sedentary, working a desk job.
She did no resistance training, and her body composition showed
minimal muscle.
Stress: She lacked community in a new city and felt somewhat lonely.
She felt daily low-grade stress from her job as a software engineer, her
parents’ aging, and her lack of ability to conceive.
Toxins: Her water was unfiltered, giving her a dose of chemicals and
toxins throughout the day. Her personal care products and home care

products contained several common toxins. She drank wine several
nights per week.
Light: She stared at blue light all day at her computer and then late into
the night in front of the TV, while she finished emails. The light bulbs
in her house weren’t helping, either. She spent most of her hours in her
apartment, office, or favorite yoga studio, enjoying little time outdoors.
We created a plan that incorporated seeing food as medicine, optimizing
sleep, reducing chronic stress, protecting her microbiome, reducing
environmental toxins, and maximizing sunlight during the day.
Over the next six months, nearly every symptom melted away: her
menstrual cycles normalized, the pain during her periods lightened
significantly, her mood lifted, and her digestive function improved. She was
able to taper off her medications, and—confident that her reproductive
hormones were coming back into balance—she postponed her first IVF
appointment. She hadn’t simply started to feel better, more energized, and
happier about herself today; she had also drastically reduced her chances of
developing chronic illness in the future.
I saw similar turnarounds in patients who implemented consistent
lifestyle changes in my practice. These changes were rooted in
understanding three simple truths:
1. Most chronic symptoms and diseases afflicting modern bodies are
connected by a shared root cause of cellular malfunction that often
results in Bad Energy. All symptoms are the direct result of dysfunction
in our cells; symptoms cannot arise out of thin air. And for most people
in the United States, metabolic dysfunction is a key cause of their
cellular dysfunction.
2. Chronic conditions linked to Bad Energy exist on a spectrum from not
immediately life-threatening (e.g., erectile dysfunction, fatigue,
infertility, gout, arthritis) to more urgently life-threatening (e.g., stroke,
cancer, and heart disease).
3. “Mild” symptoms today should be seen as clues that more serious
disease will likely follow.

The best way I can explain the interconnectivity of “small” and “big”
diseases is by diving deeper into the story of my mother and me.

A “HEALTHY” BABY
When my mom was preparing to get pregnant in the 1980s, she had duly
followed the nutritional advice of the time: copious grains, bread, crackers
(we were told to eat six to eleven servings a day), and lots of low-fat snacks
—since fats back then were to be eaten “sparingly.” Sufficient healthy
protein was, unsurprisingly, an afterthought, given its no-man’s-land place
in the confusing middle of the food pyramid. In her twenties and early
thirties, my mom was known for despising vegetables, with her main veggie
dish being broiled tomatoes with Parmesan on occasion. She never learned
to cook in her youth and relied on takeout as a New Yorker in her twenties.
She walked but wasn’t a regular exerciser and was notorious for going to
bed late. She smoked from her twenties to her fifties, stopping just for
pregnancy.
Invisibly, metabolic abnormalities were going on in my mom that
transferred to me in utero. You don’t become an eleven-pound, nine-ounce
baby for no reason. And having a large baby increases the risk of future
metabolic problems for both mom and baby, including type 2 diabetes and
obesity. This relationship is due to several mechanisms.
1. Insulin Resistance: Children born with macrosomia are often exposed to
high levels of glucose in utero, which can cause insulin resistance in
the child. This early exposure to high insulin levels can persist into
adulthood, leading to an increased risk of developing type 2 diabetes
and other metabolic problems.
2. Fat Cell Number and Size: Children born with macrosomia often have an
increased quantity and size of fat cells, likely due to maternal fatty
acids stimulating the conversion of fetal stem cells into fat cells. This
can contribute to obesity and metabolic problems later in life.

3. Inflammation: Children born with macrosomia are often exposed to high
levels of inflammation in utero, which can contribute to the
development of metabolic problems as they age.
My mom’s doctor insisted on a cesarean birth due to my size. But
because I didn’t pass through her vaginal canal, I didn’t ingest the
organisms from her microbiome that would have helped seed mine.
Breastfeeding is more challenging for mothers after C-section, and my
mother couldn’t breastfeed. She was also told not to lift more than ten
pounds while her C-section scar healed, and I was nearly twelve pounds,
making breastfeeding additionally challenging. Given this, I didn’t get the
benefits of the healthy bacterial transfer and oligosaccharides that come
with breast milk that shape the infant microbiome for life.
In early childhood, although we had many home-cooked, lovingly made
meals as a family, I ate many standard children’s foods: Reese’s Puffs
cereal, Lucky Charms, Dunkaroos, Utz Barbeque chips, Rice Krispies
Treats, Goldfish, and Hostess CupCakes. The Bad Energy warning signs
showed up quickly. When I was a toddler, my chronic ear infections and
tonsillitis had my mom frequently running to the doctor, who prescribed
antibiotics. I remember stories in my youth of her “living” at the
pediatrician’s office and being on a first-name basis with all the staff.
I now understand that those chronic infections likely were connected to
a suboptimal immune system, which is in large part determined by our
microbiome composition and the integrity of the lining of our gut (which
houses 70 percent of our immune system). As I was a C-section-birthed,
formula-fed baby who went on to eat processed foods and to frequently
consume microbiome-destroying antibiotics, my gut function was likely a
disaster (in the scientific literature, this “disaster” is referred to as a
combination of “dysbiosis” and “intestinal permeability”), and it was
contributing to a vicious cycle of worsening metabolic health, worsening
cravings for processed food, and worsening immune function.
By the time I was just ten years old, my young body had packed on
weight. I was 210 pounds before eighth grade. I experienced low-grade
anxiety, painful menstrual cycles, acne along my jawline and back, semi-

regular headaches, and recurrent tonsil infections in my early teen years. I
didn’t see these as red flags: they were customary rites of passage for
American children, and doctors even called me “healthy.” It seemed
common to have cramps, intermittent headaches, zits, and strep throat here
and there. While these might be common conditions in the modern world, I
didn’t understand that they all represented highly dysfunctional biology.
At age fourteen, at the end of my first year of high school, I became
passionate and relentless about getting to a healthy weight, so I read a stack
of nutrition books and cookbooks to learn how. I committed to a summer of
health: I cooked all my meals and joined a gym and took the bus there every
day, sweating on the elliptical machine and lifting weights while blasting a
Backstreet Boys CD on my Walkman. I quickly and healthily lost all the
extra weight over about six months. My other symptoms got quite a bit
better, too. Though I couldn’t have named it then, I probably reversed the
insulin resistance and chronic inflammation that, since infancy, had been
causing or aggravating my weight gain and other issues. Growing into a
dedicated athlete and chef in my mid-teens, I kept many of my symptoms at
bay.

“NORMAL” CHALLENGES IN MY TWENTIES AND THIRTIES
Ten years later, as a twenty-six-year-old freshly minted medical doctor and
first-year surgical resident, I fell back into a matrix of cellular misery. The
day I walked into the hospital as a bright and healthy surgical resident, my
world shrank to a tunnel of chronic stress and adrenaline. My pager beeped
around the clock, and the fluorescent lights of the hospital glared down at
me during every moment of the day and night. I slept erratically during
frequent night shifts, ate processed cafeteria food, got little exercise,
imbibed caffeine constantly, and breathed stale air. I endured multiday
stretches of zero sunlight, waking before dawn and leaving work after dark.
My body was again an epicenter of Bad Energy, which cropped up almost
instantly in multiple symptoms.

IBS

Irritable bowel syndrome (IBS) was the first sign that the cells in my
intestine were dysfunctional and quite literally couldn’t do their job. I didn’t
make a solid stool for almost two years. IBS can look like many different
things, and for me it was painful lower abdominal gas coupled with watery
diarrhea eight to ten times a day.
Strong evidence shows reduced mitochondrial activity and decreased
energy production within the gut-lining cells in people with IBS. This
reduced activity contributes to gut symptoms, such as abdominal pain and
changes in bowel habits. As strange as the connection sounds, IBS is
strongly linked to insulin resistance and problems with Bad Energy. If you
have IBS, you are twice as likely to have metabolic syndrome and elevated
triglycerides.
Insulin resistance can negatively affect the enteric (gut) nervous system,
which some call our “second brain.” The impact can alter gut motility,
which is the coordinated contraction and relaxation of the muscles in the
gut wall. Insulin resistance also alters gut barrier function, which is the
ability of the gut lining to prevent the entry of harmful substances into the
bloodstream. Altered gut barrier function can result in increased gut
inflammation and sensitivity, leading to increased abdominal pain and other
symptoms of IBS. What’s more, chronic inflammation from a poor gut
barrier can fuel metabolic issues throughout the body.
Acne

The acne cysts on my face and neck that erupted when I was a new doctor
were clues that elevated glucose and insulin levels were driving hormonal
changes. Studies have shown that individuals with acne have higher insulin
levels than those without acne. High insulin levels are linked to increased
production of male hormones that stimulate the production of skin oil,
called sebum. When the skin’s oil glands produce too much, sebum can mix
with dead skin cells and clog hair follicles, creating an environment where
bacteria can thrive. Multiple studies have found that a low-glycemic load

(i.e., low sugar) or a low-carbohydrate diet can lead to significant
reductions in acne.
People with acne have been shown to have a higher burden of oxidative
stress and mitochondrial damage, both hallmarks of Bad Energy.
Interestingly, over a dozen skin conditions are known to be downstream of
oxidative stress and mitochondrial damage, including alopecia areata (a
type of hair loss), atopic dermatitis (eczema), lichen planus, scleroderma,
vitiligo, rosacea, sun damage, psoriasis, and many others. Dysfunction in
various skin cell types can look like many different skin conditions and
symptoms, and it appears that much of this dysfunction is driven by Bad
Energy.
Depression

The onset of uncharacteristic depression during my surgical residency has a
strong metabolic link. The brain is exquisitely sensitive to oxidative stress
and inflammation and is one of the most energy-hungry organs of the body,
using 20 percent of the body’s total energy despite representing just 2
percent of the body’s weight! As such, Bad Energy processes, like
mitochondrial dysfunction, inflammation, and oxidative stress, are known to
affect brain function and mood regulation—similar to how they impact gut
function in IBS. My toxic work environment and residency lifestyle worked
together to break the energy-producing pathways of my gut and brain.
The gut-brain axis refers to communication between the digestive and
central nervous systems. This connection is vital in depression because the
gut microbiome plays a significant role in making our neurotransmitters,
which control our thoughts and feelings and regulate mood and behavior.
Imbalances in these neurotransmitters contribute to depression. More than
90 percent of serotonin, the hormone that regulates mood and contentment,
is made in the gut—not in the brain. Anything that disturbs gut function—
like the Bad Energy physiology that leads to IBS—can strongly impact
mental health. Unsurprisingly, IBS and depression have a strong link, with

IBS sometimes even being called “depression of the gut.” IBS, in fact, is
often addressed with antidepressants.
Studies in animals and humans have also found that changes in the gut
microbiome can influence the development of depression-like behaviors.
Shifts toward unhealthy patterns in the gut microbiome are observed in
individuals with depression. Microbiome transfer from depressed animals to
healthy animals has been shown to quickly induce depression-like
behaviors.
Problems with Bad Energy in our cells contribute to the pathophysiology
of depression in several ways.
1. Energy Production: Mitochondrial dysfunction can lead to decreased
energy production in the central nervous system, resulting in altered
neurotransmitter signaling, including the neurotransmitters that
modulate mood, such as serotonin and norepinephrine.
2. Inflammation: Mitochondrial dysfunction can also lead to an increase in
oxidative stress, which can trigger inflammation. Chronic inflammation
has been linked to depression, and many studies have shown that
individuals with depression have elevated levels of inflammatory
markers.
3. Neuronal Function: Mitochondria are involved in several vital processes
for neuronal function, including apoptosis (cell death), calcium
regulation, and oxidative stress defense. Mitochondrial dysfunction can
alter these processes and lead to neuronal dysfunction, contributing to
depression.
4. Stress Response: The hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal (HPA) axis, which
regulates stress response, depends on proper mitochondrial function.
Mitochondrial dysfunction can alter the regulation of the HPA axis and
lead to altered stress response, which can contribute to depression.
Unstable blood sugar can derail the brain’s cells, just as it can derail any
other cell in the body. It can cause the brain’s cells to promote the

production of more stress hormones, creating an endless feedback loop of
stress and dysfunction. Incredibly, our five primary metabolic biomarkers
from Chapter 1 can tell us a lot about depression risk. One study showed
that every additional 18 mg/dL of fasting glucose was associated with a 37
percent increased rate of developing depression. Additionally, for every
one-unit increase in the triglyceride-to-HDL ratio, people had an 89 percent
higher likelihood of developing depression. When I was describing my
feelings of depression to my parents during my residency, I tearfully told
them I felt as if my brain had rapidly gone from the full-color spectrum to
black and white. My creativity, ability to synthesize concepts, and sharp
memory were gone. A few times after thirty-hour call-shifts, I had the
disturbing sense that it would be easier just not to exist. Through the lens of
Bad Energy, this makes sense to me now: due to several changes in my
lifestyle and stress levels as a new surgical resident, my brain cells likely
did not have the power to provide me with the full spectrum of thought and
emotion, nor the energy to want to keep going.
There have been several reported associations between metabolic
syndrome biomarkers and suicidal ideation, a link that should be urgently
investigated and addressed as rates of depression and suicide alarmingly
rise, especially in young people.
Chronic Pain

Even the chronic neck pain I developed as a young surgeon was likely
related to metabolic chaos. Research demonstrates how poor mitochondrial
function and insulin resistance may play a role in the development of
chronic pain. Oxidative stress and inflammation in the nerves and other
tissues can lead to nerve damage and sensitization. Mitochondrial
dysfunction can result in decreased production of neurotransmitters and
other signaling molecules that regulate pain perception. Insulin resistance
may also alter the metabolism of cells in the muscles and other tissues,
leading to muscle wasting, joint degradation, and other pain-inducing
changes. Likely, the manifestation of dysfunction within the energy-

producing pathways of my cells was generating my pain, rather than the
repetitive neck bending I’d originally attributed the pain to due to my long
hours hunched over the operating room table. I was certainly not alone: an
estimated 20 percent of U.S. adults suffer from chronic pain.
Sinus Infections and Migraines

While I ignored the root cause of my own health issues, the ENT
department in which I worked also was ignoring what might be causing the
head and neck issues in the patients who found themselves under our
scalpels. Take sinusitis, the condition that plagued Sophia and thirty-one
million other people in the United States. Doctors describe chronic sinusitis
—characterized by facial pain and pressure, nasal congestion, headaches,
postnasal drip, and green and yellow nasal discharge—as chronic
inflammation of the tissue of the sinuses. But we never dig deeper: What is
causing that chronic inflammation?
The higher a person’s blood sugar, the higher the likelihood of their
having sinusitis. The probability is 2.7 times higher if you have type 2
diabetes!
I recall my shock when I read an article on sinusitis in the Journal of the
American Medical Association (JAMA). It showed a picture of the
inflammatory pathways that increase in the nasal tissue in a person with
sinusitis. Many of the inflammatory markers that are increased in the nasal
tissue are the same ones that are elevated in people with heart disease,
obesity, and type 2 diabetes. Staring at the figure in this journal in the bright
light of my call room, I thought to myself, Is it possible that the same
fundamental problem with inflammatory overdrive is just showing up in
different body parts as different symptoms?
Migraine, like my patient Sarah had, also correlates closely to poor
metabolic health. In the ENT otology clinic, we often saw this condition
and had limited success in treating it. Sufferers of this debilitating
neurological disease—about 12 percent of people in the United States—
tend to have higher insulin levels and insulin resistance. A comprehensive

review of fifty-six research articles identified links between migraine and
poor metabolic health, pointing out that “migraine sufferers tend to have
impaired insulin sensitivity.” The review supports the “neuro-energetic”
theory of migraine.
Additionally, evidence suggests that micronutrient deficiencies in key
mitochondrial cofactors may also be a contributing factor of migraine.
Research has suggested that migraines could be treated by restoring levels
of vitamins B and D, magnesium, CoQ10, alpha lipoic acid, and Lcarnitine. Vitamin B12, for instance, is involved in the electron transport
chain responsible for the final steps of ATP generation in the mitochondria,
and studies have indicated that high doses of B12 can help prevent migraine.
These micronutrients usually have fewer side effects than other drugs used
to treat migraines, making them a promising option for relief, which can be
obtained through a diet rich in these micronutrients, or supplementation.
Having high markers of oxidative stress, a key Bad Energy feature, is
associated with a significantly higher risk of migraine in women, with some
studies suggesting that migraine attacks are a symptomatic response to
increased levels of oxidative stress. Less painful and more common tensiontype headaches are also linked to high variability (excess peaks and crashes)
in blood sugar.
Hearing Loss

The same story of metabolic ignorance in the ENT department unfolded for
auditory problems and hearing loss, one of the most common issues
presented to our ENT clinic. We’d typically tell our patients that their
auditory decline was inevitable, due to aging and loud concerts in their
youth, and we would suggest interventions like hearing aids. Yet insulin
resistance is a little-known link to hearing problems. If you have insulin
resistance, you are more likely to lose hearing as you age because of poor
energy production in the delicate hearing cells and blockage of the small
blood vessels that supply the inner ear.

One study showed that insulin resistance is associated with age-related
hearing loss, even when controlling for weight and age. The likely
mechanism for this is that the auditory system requires high energy
utilization for its complex signal processing. In the case of insulin
resistance, glucose metabolism is disturbed, leading to decreased energy
generation.
The impact of Bad Energy on hearing is not subtle: A study showed that
the prevalence of high-frequency hearing impairment among subjects with
elevated fasting glucose levels was 42 percent compared to 24 percent in
those with normal fasting glucose. Moreover, insulin resistance is
associated with high-frequency mild hearing impairment in the male
population under seventy years of age, even before the onset of diabetes.
These papers suggest that assessing early metabolic function and levels of
insulin resistance is essential in the ENT clinic and counseling individuals
on the potential warning signs is paramount.
Autoimmune Conditions

Even with rarer conditions such as autoimmune diseases, which occur when
the body’s immune system attacks its own tissues, research indicates a
strong metabolic link. We addressed several autoimmune conditions in the
ENT clinic, including Sjögren’s syndrome, a condition leading to
malfunction of the glands of the body, and Hashimoto’s thyroiditis, a
condition of immune infiltration of the thyroid gland that leads to low
thyroid function. While I never learned in medical school to think through
the lens of cellular metabolism and how it might generate autoimmunity, a
growing body of literature shows that metabolic and autoimmune issues are
tightly linked. Remember, after all, that a cell that can’t make energy
properly sends out danger signals, which can trigger the immune system to
invade. People with autoimmune diseases have been shown to have 1.5 to
2.5 times the rate of insulin resistance and metabolic syndrome when
compared to people without these conditions. Bad Energy can result in
chronic inflammation and, at times, autoimmunity.

Renowned researcher and physician Dr. Terry Wahls speculates that
autoimmunity could be in part because of the body responding to the “cell
danger response” (CDR), a biological reaction coordinated by the
mitochondria that occurs because of perceived threats to the cell such as
poor diet, injury, infection, and nutrient deprivation. The CDR activates a
series of events that culminate in the release of ATP outside the cell.
(Normally ATP should be inside the cell powering the cell’s biologic
processes.) The release of ATP outside the cell acts as a signal to other cells
in the area, alerting them of the danger. Overstimulation of the CDR can
lead to an increased risk of chronic diseases such as autoimmune disorders,
cardiovascular disease, and cancer.
Research has shown that people with autoimmune diseases—like
rheumatoid arthritis, lupus, psoriasis, inflammatory bowel disease (IBD),
and multiple sclerosis (MS)—are more likely to develop metabolic
disorders like obesity and type 2 diabetes. For people with rheumatoid
arthritis, the risk of diabetes is up to 50 percent higher. People with lupus
are nearly twice as likely to have metabolic syndrome. And studies have
found that people with MS are nearly 2.5 times more likely to be insulin
resistant, compared to those without MS. Plus, patients with MS and high
fasting blood glucose levels experience more cognitive dysfunction. This
link between metabolic problems and autoimmunity is likely due to chronic
low-grade inflammation in the body, which disrupts insulin signaling and
leads to insulin resistance, and the interrelated phenomenon of oxidative
stress, which is both a cause and an effect of metabolic issues and triggers
inflammation.
Unsurprisingly, autoimmune diseases have rapidly increased in the
United States over the past few decades. According to the National Institute
of Environmental Health Sciences, autoimmune diseases affect
approximately fifty million people in the nation, around 20 percent of the
population. Some studies estimate that the number of individuals with
autoimmune diseases in the country has increased by 50 to 75 percent since
the 1950s, with such conditions affecting significantly more women than
men. Currently, 20 percent of the population lives with some of their body’s

cells attacking and trying to destroy others, a process that appears to be
rooted, in part, in biological confusion related to modern dietary and
lifestyle exposures. The skyrocketing rate of autoimmune disease is the
most obvious example of the devastating results of biochemical fear. It
represents the body’s cells saying “WTF?” to our modern exposures and
acting out.
Infertility

Beginning in my early thirties, I noticed some common discussions
surrounding fertility and sex among my friend group. Many had trouble
conceiving and some experienced miscarriage. There were also whispers
over cocktails about partners having problems with sexual function, libido,
and erections.
The PCOS that Lucy experienced was common and rapidly increasing
among women in my age group. Today, it is the leading cause of female
infertility. Though the problem of cysts growing on the ovaries may not
seem connected to blood sugar and insulin issues, look again. A key driver
of PCOS is high insulin, which stimulates the ovaries’ theca cells to make
more testosterone and disturbs the delicate hormonal balance of sex
hormones and the menstrual cycle. The process impedes fertility in all sorts
of ways. PCOS, which often appears alongside obesity and diabetes, is so
tied in with metabolic health that a 2012 NIH panel proposed that the name
of the disease be changed to “metabolic reproductive syndrome.”
As metabolic issues have risen in prevalence, so has PCOS. A recent
study out of China—which is facing a type 2 diabetes crisis like that of the
United States—showed that PCOS has gone up 65 percent just in the past
decade. Evidence suggests it is now affecting 20 percent of women
worldwide. According to the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention
(CDC), half of women with PCOS may eventually develop type 2 diabetes
by the time they are forty years old. The prevalence of obesity in women
with PCOS in the nation is 80 percent. Studies have shown that weight loss,
diet and lifestyle changes, and medication can all play a role in improving

insulin sensitivity and reducing symptoms of PCOS. Just twelve weeks of a
vegetable-filled, low-glycemic diet can improve all key biomarkers of the
condition.
Women with PCOS are frequently prescribed hormonal birth control
pills or diabetes drugs, such as metformin, to overcompensate for hormone
dysregulation or to regulate blood sugar. Sometimes women with PCOS use
in vitro fertilization (IVF) in their attempts to conceive. The use of assisted
reproductive technologies like IVF has steadily increased in the United
States over the past four decades. In 2015, more than 182,000 assisted
reproductive technology (ART) procedures were performed. But very few
of the women who elect for these invasive procedures are told by their
doctor the root causes of their infertility or how to reverse them. Nor are
they told that people with blood sugar problems have double the
miscarriage rate with assisted reproduction, and that “the higher percentage
of sperm DNA damage because of oxidative stress seen in diabetic patients
may be responsible for poor embryonic development and pregnancy
outcomes.” Increasing body mass index (BMI) also increases odds of
miscarriage after ART, with risk starting to go up at a BMI of around 22.
The fertility crisis in America isn’t confined to women. Sperm count has
fallen precipitously this century—by more than 50 to 60 percent in forty
years as of the last count—and metabolic dysfunction is one key reason.
Low sperm count hits obese men particularly hard: they have an 81 percent
higher chance of having zero sperm in their semen than men of normal
weight. “Male factor” infertility contributes to up to 50 percent of infertility
cases. This is directly related to metabolic issues, as fat tissue contains
enzymes called aromatases that convert testosterone to estrogen and disrupt
the delicate hormonal balance required for sperm production. Dr. Benjamin
Bikman notes that fat tissue in men basically acts like a big ovary, causing
low testosterone and higher estrogen.
Excess oxidative stress, a key (and preventable) hallmark of Bad Energy,
damages sensitive sperm cell membranes, impairs healthy sperm
development, and can fragment sperm DNA, causing reduced sperm quality
and increased risk of miscarriage. Oxidative stress also directly decreases

testosterone production. A 2023 research review states, “Evidence is
mounting to support an association between elevated seminal reactive
oxygen species [in the male reproductive tract] and recurrent pregnancy
loss.” The paper goes on to remind that oxidative stress is thought to be
increased by “alcohol use, smoking, obesity, aging, psychological stress . . .
medical co-morbidities including diabetes and infection.” Other causes
include exposure to radiation, diets high in processed foods, certain
medications, chronic sleep loss, pesticides, pollution, and many industrial
chemicals.
What’s more, sexual dysfunction is rising in men, with 52 percent of
men over age forty having concerns, much of which is related to erectile
dysfunction (ED). ED is generally rooted in metabolic disease, with
reduced blood flow to capillaries and nerves of the penis being a key factor,
driven by the impact of insulin resistance on forming arterial blockages
(called atherosclerosis) and reduced blood vessel dilation. Metabolic and
sexual health expert Dr. Sara Gottfried notes, “Erectile dysfunction is
atherosclerosis of the penile artery until proven otherwise,” and notes that
ED is a neon sign that a man needs a metabolic evaluation. Additionally,
glycation caused by high glucose levels impairs the health of penile tissues
and blood vessels and also contributes to ED.
More than a few friends have shared that they were diagnosed with
gestational diabetes when they were pregnant. The condition has risen 30
percent in the United States since just 2016. Others have shared sad stories
of pregnancy loss, which—though seldom discussed—can also be a result,
in part, of metabolic strain. Cases of miscarriage have increased 10 percent
over the past ten years, with studies showing that metabolic dysfunction can
be toxic to the placenta. Placental dysfunction (PD) can be more technically
defined as a failure of the placenta to perform its normal functions,
including nutrient and oxygen transport, waste removal, hormone synthesis,
and immune regulation. Maternal metabolic issues, such as obesity and
insulin resistance, can cause changes in the balance of hormones and
growth factors involved in placental development and function. The more
features of metabolic syndrome someone has (e.g., low HDL, high

triglycerides, and elevated glucose), the higher the odds ratio of PD and
fetal death, with an odds ratio of 7.7 for PD in women with three to four
metabolic syndrome features. Metabolic imbalances can lead to alterations
in placental angiogenesis (formation of new blood vessels) and blood flow,
reducing oxygen and nutrient delivery to the fetus. Additionally, obesity and
insulin resistance can cause oxidative stress in the placenta, resulting in
oxidative damage to the tissues and PD.
Assessing the data holistically, it appears that modern diet and lifestyle
are sterilizing the human population in part through Bad Energy.
Chronic Fatigue

Between 10 and 30 percent of all U.S. doctor visits are for symptoms of
fatigue, making it the most common cause of medical appointments. And 67
percent of people in the United States experience regular fatigue at work,
seventy million experience chronic sleep issues, and 90 percent consume
caffeine daily. For postmenopausal women, the situation is much worse:
recent research shows that 85.3 percent of postmenopausal women report
symptoms of physical and mental exhaustion, compared with 46.5 percent
of perimenopausal women and just 19.7 percent of premenopausal women.
I saw this up close when I was a resident. Most of us chalked our
rampant chronic fatigue up to our institutionally enforced sleep deprivation.
Some days, after being awake for thirty-six hours in the hospital on call, I
would drive home from work and be unable to muster the energy to get out
of my car to go up to my apartment for much-needed sleep. I would nap in
my front seat till I could summon the will to move.
But even under less extreme conditions, we often accept fatigue and
sleep issues as inevitable by-products of modern life. Reduced ATP
production, unstable blood sugar levels, and hormonal imbalances—all
hallmarks of metabolic dysfunction—contribute to persistent fatigue and
dysregulated sleep. This causes a negative spiral because the lack of quality
sleep contributes to increased mitochondrial dysfunction and fatigue. We’ve

normalized this dynamic as almost inevitable, but it is often a warning sign
of Bad Energy in our body.

BAD ENERGY AMONG CHILDREN: NORMALIZING
UNPRECEDENTED TRENDS
Childhood Obesity and Fatty Liver Disease

The prevalence of childhood obesity has increased dramatically in the past
fifty years, and this is just one face of Bad Energy in kids. According to data
from the CDC, the rate of childhood obesity has more than tripled since the
1970s. During that decade, approximately 5 percent of children and
adolescents ages six to nineteen years were considered to have obesity. By
the late 2000s, this rate had increased to approximately 18 percent, and it’s
going up. Another face of Bad Energy is nonalcoholic fatty liver disease
(NAFLD), now the most common liver disease in kids. The prevalence of
NAFLD in children is rising sharply. The first case of NAFLD in children
was reported in 1983, and now up to 20 percent of children have it (and up
to 80 percent of obese children). For specific ethnic groups and sexes, this
number is much higher. For instance, in Hispanic young men ages twentyfive to thirty, 42 percent have NAFLD. This prevalence should be close to
zero. Similar trends have been observed in other countries around the
world. Historically, fatty livers were found primarily in adults abusing
alcohol, as alcohol disturbs several elements of lipid processing in cells,
while also generating oxidative stress. But over the past thirty years,
nonalcoholic fatty liver disease has become the most common chronic liver
disease in the world, increasing from 25 percent of the global population in
1990 to close to 40 percent by 2019. NAFLD is full-blown metabolic
dysfunction in kids and adults, representing liver cells filling with fat, which
worsens insulin resistance. Key contributors are processed foods, refined
sugars, refined grains, sweet beverages, high-fructose corn syrup, fast food,
low fiber and phytochemical intake, habitual eating close to bedtime,
sedentary behavior, and oxidative stress. Liver transplants have gone up

close to 50 percent in the past fifteen years, and while alcohol and hepatitis
C used to be the leading causes, now NAFLD is taking the lead in women
as the cause of liver failure and is a top cause for men. Fatty liver disease is
now the most common cause of liver transplant in young adults in the
United States. We are failing our children.
Brain Disorders Among Children

Children’s brains don’t escape from issues with Bad Energy. We are
reaching epidemic levels of childhood mental illness, which is the
dysfunction of these young brains. About 20 percent of all children will
have an identified mental health condition in any given year. According to
the CDC, by the time they reach age eighteen, 40 percent of all children
will meet the criteria for mental health disorders! The prevalence has risen
dramatically over the decades, with the increase going up sharply more
recently. A new study in JAMA Pediatrics showed that the number of
children ages three to seventeen years with an anxiety or depression
diagnosis increased by 29 percent and 27 percent, respectively—all
between 2016 and 2020.
During my years at Stanford and rotating at other hospitals, twenty
children and young adults per year took their lives in the surrounding Santa
Clara County. A report showed that 17 percent of Santa Clara high school
students had seriously contemplated suicide. Suicide is now the second
leading cause of death for young adults ages ten to thirty-four. According to
the CDC, 25 percent of young adults contemplated suicide in 2020—a
statistic I still can’t wrap my head around. Among local leaders, there was
little talk of whether metabolic factors—such as inflammatory food, lack of
sleep, and chronic stress spurred by technology and academic pressure in
the epicenter of Silicon Valley—could have contributed to these trends.
Cases of developmental conditions are also rising rapidly in youth, with
autism and attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) rates climbing
yearly. A mother with obesity and diabetes has quadruple the risk of having
a child with autism, and she has double the risk of having a child with

ADHD. As our most energy-hungry organ, our brains are exquisitely
sensitive to Bad Energy. A developing brain is particularly susceptible. In a
rational health care environment, a key public health priority would be to
support maternal and early childhood metabolic health as a high-leverage
approach to support a thriving population.
Other Childhood Metabolic Conditions

Epidemic levels of obesity, liver dysfunction, and brain dysfunction
demonstrate a cellular energy epidemic. And our children’s small, not fully
developed bodies are being set up to fail at an early age because our culture
and daily lives have been co-opted by processed foods and the other factors
that damage mitochondria and cellular energy production.
The following are just a sampling of health conditions that are
increasing in children and are known to be related to poor cellular energy
production, mitochondrial dysfunction, or oxidative stress: ADHD, autism
spectrum disorder, type 2 diabetes, NAFLD, cardiomyopathy, depression,
anxiety, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, IBD, asthma, atopic
dermatitis, allergies, acne, psoriasis, eczema, schizophrenia, bipolar
disorder, borderline personality disorder, and hidradenitis suppurativa (HS,
a condition of painful inflammatory lumps under the skin).
Many friends who are parents have complained of having to take off
work to take their kids to the doctor for recurrent throat, ear, and viral upper
respiratory tract infections. Few, if any, understood that the way their kids’
bodies were producing energy had a significant impact on the propensity for
illness, given that just like the function of any other cell type, immune cell
function is regulated by how well they can make and utilize energy.
Kids with metabolic dysfunction are at a significantly higher risk for
infections—such as strep throat and ear infections—than kids without
metabolic dysfunction or who are a healthy weight. For instance, one study
found that the odds of having streptococcal pharyngitis were 1.5 times
higher in children with obesity compared to those without. Another study
found that children with obesity were 2.5 times more likely to experience

middle ear infections than normal-weight children. The antibiotics we throw
at these kids are in no way harmless. One of the most alarming research
findings I’ve ever come across is that antibiotics in childhood increased the
risk of mental health issues by an odds ratio of 1.44.
Destroying the microbiome with aggressive antibiotics impacts gut
function, metabolic function, and chronic inflammation, and it sets up the
conditions for Bad Energy and subsequent problems like mental illness.
Unsurprisingly, a linear relationship exists between the number of
antibiotics courses taken prenatally or in the first one to two years of life
and having an increased BMI at ages four to five. Through the microbiomegut-inflammation-metabolic lens, this relationship makes sense. We are
creating a vicious cycle in kids, with poor immune function from Bad
Energy leading to more infectious diseases, leading to more antibiotic use,
and leading to worsened Bad Energy due to microbiome disruption.
It’s this simple: kids’ bodies, just like adult bodies, are made of cells that
need energy to function. Our children are living in disastrous metabolic
conditions, and their bodies are paying the price—while leaders in nutrition
science (which is largely funded by food companies) and “health care”
(whose research is largely funded by pharmaceutical companies to
“manage” the rise of metabolic conditions) stand silent. Our society has
failed to make meaningful preventive moves to counter the exploding
epidemics of childhood chronic diseases. Not only are these conditions
rooted in how diet and lifestyle are hurting our kids’ mitochondria, but the
conditions are also putting them squarely on the spectrum of metabolic
diseases that will ultimately shorten their lives and decrease their quality of
life. Our kids are entering a world where they will live fewer total years on
average than their parents.
Despite these trends, our culture pushes a Bad Energy world onto kids
who cannot protect themselves. Our culture has normalized giving oneyear-olds packaged, ultra-processed foods like cake, Goldfish, rice puffs,
juice, and french fries. We slather toxic, artificially scented lotions and
shampoos all over their tiny bodies as soon as their first hospital bath. We
damage their livers and antioxidant capacity with too much acetaminophen

(Tylenol) at the first sign of fussiness or a cold. We blast their microbiomes
with heavy-duty antibiotics at the first sign of a possible ear infection. And
we interrupt their sleep for unconscionably early school times, then force
them to sit at desks in school for six or more hours a day. We create terror
and chronic stress in their bodies from social media and overall media
exposure. The world kids live in is inflammatory and metabolically
disastrous unless parents staunchly go against the tide of “normal”
American culture. The irony is that so many parents wish that parenting
were easier—fewer infections, less colic, easier behavioral patterns—
without thinking through the lens of energy production in their children’s
bodies. We can do so much to make our lives and our kids’ lives easier by
controlling the controllable.

FIFTY AND BEYOND: THE RISE OF LIFE-THREATENING
CHRONIC CONDITIONS
Many of us have watched as our parents develop chronic illnesses as they
get older. To have a conversation with my group of friends without
someone in the group sharing updates of their parents’ declining health is
unusual. The common conditions include high blood pressure, high
cholesterol, heart disease, stroke, burgeoning dementia, arthritis, cancer, or
upper respiratory conditions that have required hospitalization. In my time
as a first-year resident, two coworkers’ parents had debilitating strokes. As
physicians, we are often the first call from our parents and elderly family
members to seek advice or help regarding the recent health scare. These are
all conditions rooted in Bad Energy.
Stroke

The relationship between high blood glucose and the risk of stroke is well
established. A meta-analysis from 2014 found that people with type 2
diabetes have double the stroke risk compared to those without the
condition. Another study found that people with prediabetic glucose levels
(110 to 125 mg/dL) had a 60 percent higher stroke risk than those with

normal glucose levels. More than 80 percent of acute stroke patients have a
blood sugar problem, yet most of them are unaware of it. Insulin resistance
leads directly to several problems with blood vessels that contribute to
stroke, including excess clotting, reduced nitric oxide production (which
dilates vessels), and increased atherosclerosis, the formation of blockages in
arteries.
Dementia

Early-onset dementia and other devastating cognitive diseases are also
charging through our population. Remember, the brain uses more energy
and glucose than any other organ, so it is particularly vulnerable to the
effects of Bad Energy and blood sugar variability. Evidence suggests that
the impaired glucose uptake caused by insulin resistance may, over time,
starve brain cell mitochondria of the energy they need to function properly,
creating a state called hypometabolism, which research indicates is a
potential cause of Alzheimer’s disease.
Alzheimer’s disease has been dubbed “type 3 diabetes” because of its
higher prevalence among people with insulin resistance and impaired
insulin. In the United States, around 6.2 million adults ages sixty-five or
older live with Alzheimer’s disease, and this figure is predicted to more than
double by 2050. The health care costs associated with Alzheimer’s and
other dementias in the United States were estimated to hit $355 billion in
2021. Add to that an estimated $250 billion worth of unpaid caregiving by
patients’ loved ones. With fifty million people living with dementia
worldwide and ten million new cases expected each year, finding ways to
prevent, treat, cure, or simply slow the devastating progression of dementia
has become an urgent global challenge, particularly since medications for
Alzheimer’s are not effective and may even be harmful.
Fortunately, recent research in the top medical journal The Lancet shows
that 40 percent of Alzheimer’s cases are related to twelve modifiable risk
factors (and therefore are likely preventable) and that we should be
“ambitious about prevention” with Alzheimer’s.

In a 2013 study, researchers tracked the blood glucose levels of more
than two thousand adults for about seven years and found that higher blood
sugar was associated with a greater risk of dementia, including Alzheimer’s
disease. This was true even among patients without diagnosed diabetes.
However, independent research has confirmed that diabetes increases the
risk for cognitive decline, and prediabetes is a risk factor for all types of
dementia. Another observational study published in 2021 discovered that
the earlier type 2 diabetes is diagnosed, the greater the risk of developing
Alzheimer’s disease.
Heart Disease

The heart is the organ that causes more deaths than any other part of the
body in the Western world. Heart disease—across the spectrum of high
blood pressure, high cholesterol, and coronary artery disease—is directly
rooted in Bad Energy.
Back in 1979, the Framingham Heart Study, one of the longest-running
and most important research studies in medical history, was one of the first
to demonstrate that metabolic dysfunction—in the form of diabetes—is a
risk factor for developing heart disease. Why? The usual suspects: high
blood sugar leads to oxidative stress, and these cell-damaging free radicals
lead to inflammation, which damages both large and small blood vessels by
deteriorating their inner lining, known as the endothelium. In response to
that damage, fatty deposits known as plaques build up inside your blood
vessels, causing them to harden and narrow in the process of
atherosclerosis. Eventually, the vessels can become so narrow that blood
flow is blocked: the root of coronary artery disease. Heart disease leads to
nearly seven hundred thousand deaths per year, and most of these cases
involve some or all of the biomarkers from Chapter 1 being out of range.
A significant risk factor for heart disease is high blood pressure, which
50 percent of the population experiences. Inflammation, obesity, insulin
resistance, high blood sugar, and oxidative stress all lead to strain on the
blood vessel lining, which then results in decreased production by these

cells of nitric oxide, a chemical that relaxes blood vessels. Insulin resistance
and diabetes also directly affect the parts of the brain that set off this
process, leading to dysfunction in how nitric oxide is synthesized and
released. This all leads to arterial stiffness, increases in blood pressure, and
an increased risk of heart disease. Additionally, dysfunctional vessel lining
cells promote the improper accumulation of clots and plaques and
ultimately lead to heart attacks. (Of note, these processes are nearly
identical to those that lead to erectile dysfunction, caused by the narrowing
and lack of dilatation of blood vessels in the penis.)
Respiratory Disease

The leading type of chronic respiratory disease is known as chronic
obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD). It is a progressive inflammatory
condition that causes damage to the lungs and makes breathing difficult.
Sixteen percent of people newly diagnosed with COPD have type 2
diabetes, and an additional 19 percent will develop type 2 diabetes within
ten years of a COPD diagnosis.
A key risk factor for COPD is smoking, which directly links this
condition to mitochondrial dysfunction and the risk of type 2 diabetes.
Cigarette smoke contains a multitude of toxic chemicals, including cyanide,
which can directly damage the mitochondria within our cells. This damage
to the mitochondria leads to decreased energy production, which in turn can
lead to various health problems, including COPD, and a higher risk of
developing diabetes. The toxic chemicals in cigarette smoke can also
contribute to oxidative stress and inflammation in the body, exacerbating
the negative impact on the mitochondria.
Multiple studies support the concept that improving blood glucose
control leads to better outcomes for patients with chronic respiratory
conditions. A 2019 analysis of over fifty-two hundred patient records
showed that adults with type 2 diabetes who took metformin, a medication
used to regulate blood sugar, were less likely to die from chronic lower
respiratory diseases. Research suggests an antioxidant diet rich in fruits and

vegetables can decrease COPD severity and lower risk, yet nutritional
guidelines are not a part of standard treatment. Consumption of sugarsweetened beverages is strongly linked to COPD risk (as well as the risk of
pediatric and adult asthma and bronchitis). Research in the journal Nutrients
reviewing the impact of diet on COPD states that “the magnitude of effect
of diet on lung function is estimated to be comparable to that of chronic
smoking.” A healthy diet may quell inflammation and oxidative stress,
potentially easing COPD severity.
Arthritis

One of the saddest things so many people experience when they age—aside
from the development of life-threatening diseases—is that their bodies just
don’t feel as good or work as well as they used to. Even the aches, the
pains, and the stiffness have a direct metabolic link. Leading orthopedic
surgeons, such as Howard Luks, MD, have elucidated that arthritis may be
more of a metabolic disease than a structural one. People with osteoarthritis
have three times the risk of having cardiovascular disease and a 61 percent
higher risk of having type 2 diabetes. Emerging research shows that even
musculoskeletal pain, like arthritis, is downstream of Bad Energy processes,
just like many of the other chronic cardiometabolic diseases.
One metabolic factor that has been linked to arthritis and
musculoskeletal pain is chronic inflammation. Chronic inflammation can
damage joint tissues and cause the release of pain-causing chemicals.
Another metabolic factor that is important in the development of arthritis
and musculoskeletal pain is chronic oxidative stress, which can lead to
cellular damage and contribute to joint degeneration, while also slowing
down the healing process and making recovery more difficult for the body.
Excess weight has been shown to increase the risk of developing
osteoarthritis, which is the most common type of arthritis. A study
conducted by the Arthritis Foundation found that for every pound of weight
gained, the load on the knee joint increases by four pounds. This extra strain
can lead to wear and tear on the joint and increase the risk of developing

osteoarthritis. Additionally, obesity has been linked to a higher risk of
developing knee osteoarthritis, with the risk increasing with an increasing
BMI. A meta-analysis of seventeen studies found that for every one unit
increase in BMI, the risk of knee osteoarthritis increased by 13 percent.
Furthermore, obesity has been associated with increased pain and decreased
physical function in individuals with knee osteoarthritis. Exercise is one of
the best things an older person can do to minimize joint pain—likely, in
part, because of how physical activity supports mitochondrial function. The
medical establishment continues to see osteoarthritis as a nuisance often
seen in patients with other cardiometabolic diseases, but we need to view
arthritis as a warning sign of the brewing dysfunction inside our cells that
can cause degeneration to all parts of the body, not just the joint tissues.

COVID-19
As I continued through my journey of discovering the metabolic links to
common conditions in our country, around the bend came COVID-19.
When the first news of this disease began circulating in early 2020, I had
recently joined forces with my cofounders to launch Levels, a health
technology company built to empower individuals to understand their
metabolic health. The connections between Bad Energy and nearly every
chronic disease and symptom were becoming crystal clear to those of us in
metabolic research and medicine, and we couldn’t avoid viewing the fastmoving viral phenomenon through metabolic glasses.
The COVID-19 crisis was one of the most dramatic and intense
examples of conventional medicine’s metabolic blind spot that I have ever
seen. This acute disease cruelly ravaged the bodies of those who, often
unknowingly, had a foundation of chronic conditions and diseases of Bad
Energy caused primarily by diet and lifestyle. The connections were clear in
scores of quality peer-reviewed papers. Experts around the world were
trying to yell it from the rooftops. Yet the message did not get out. Societies
worldwide lost so much by the missed opportunity to teach people about the

proven connections between severity of illness and diet, exercise, and other
modifiable factors.
In many studies on COVID-19 mortality, 80 to 100 percent of the people
who died had other chronic health problems, of which the most common
were metabolic issues, such as type 2 diabetes and high blood pressure.
Other studies showed that patients with metabolic syndrome had a 77
percent increased risk of hospitalization and an 81 percent increased risk of
death.
COVID-19 is not the first pathogen to biologically discriminate against
people with diabetes. Bacterial infections and seasonal influenza both are
much more morbid in people with diabetes, for reasons including the
impairment of the acute immune response in the face of high blood sugar.
In fact, people with diabetes are six times more likely to need
hospitalization during influenza epidemics than those without the condition.
High blood sugar negatively impacts immune function in many ways,
including impairing the ability of immune cells to move through the body
and get to the site of infection and engulf and destroy pathogens or infected
cells. Additionally, antibodies may work less effectively when sugar is stuck
to them through glycation. What’s more, high blood sugar prompts immune
cells to release excess pro-inflammatory cytokines, contributing to an
exaggerated but dysfunctional immune response that yields unproductive
collateral damage on body tissues.

THE CRUEL COST OF MISSING THE SIGNS
Early in our life, we accept conditions such as obesity, acne, fatigue,
depression, infertility, high cholesterol, or prediabetes as common rites of
passage for generally “healthy” adults as they get older.
This is the largest blind spot in medicine: these “small” conditions are
invitations to become curious about the metabolic dysfunction brewing in
our body. Bad Energy will almost certainly result in more serious conditions
down the road if left unaddressed.

In my functional medicine practice, my patients with complex cases and
serious diseases that have Bad Energy origins—like heart disease or cancer
—had experienced one or more conditions on the metabolic spectrum years
before.
In medicine, we call two or more conditions that tend to go together
comorbidities—they happen comorbidly, meaning, we “happen to see them
together.” As doctors in training, we discover that people with diabetes
often have comorbid high blood pressure and people with obesity often
have comorbid depression. In medical school, the conclusion of these cooccurrences generally elicited a shrug and “Huh, interesting.” On the
hospital floor, the word comorbidities simply signaled, “If you see this
disease, look for that one, too”—and then treat each one as you were
trained, or send the patient to the appropriate specialist for what you didn’t
have the authority to treat. While arthritis and heart disease are
comorbidities, very few orthopedists or cardiologists are deeply thinking
about the causes of mitochondrial dysfunction, oxidative stress, and chronic
inflammation in the cells of the patient in front of them and how to support
getting those causative pathways back on track to improve both issues.
Instead, they manage the symptoms and send the patient on their way, with
their core physiology still a mess.
The pervasiveness of the word comorbid normalizes what should not be
normal at all—clusters of serious conditions that are all branches of the
same tree with the same root system. This normalization has, in a sense,
reinforced our blind spots and has led to untold missed opportunities to help
millions of people turn things around before their health gets worse and
harder to heal. This is exactly what happened with my mom.
My mom did not know—nor did her doctors—that the extra fat on her
body was a sign of cells that were overwhelmed and undersupported. My
mom’s metabolism rarely shifted into a fat-burning state, a state that will
occur only if we don’t overload the body with glucose and carbohydrates.
She didn’t know that her comorbidities—elevated glucose, dysregulated
cholesterol, and high blood pressure—were the definition of metabolic
dysfunction. They were telling a story and raising a warning that was

ignored. Over time, her metabolism became more and more strained, losing
its efficiency.
My mom tried so hard to get her health back on track. She stopped
smoking. She hired a trainer. She joined a Curves gym. She read every book
about nutrition that she could get her hands on and participated in several
programs, including a medical weight-loss program through Stanford and
WeightWatchers. She tried a whole-foods plant-based diet, and then tried a
ketogenic diet through Virta Health. She tried and tried and tried. She felt
discouraged with how many different ideologies there were, all of which
claimed to be the silver bullet. But unfortunately, she didn’t have the
framework to look at her body through the lens of cellular energy
production, she didn’t have the resources to make sense of her biomarkers,
and she didn’t make a lot of progress. There were positive features to each
of these endeavors, but since no plan focused all arrows directly toward the
right problem of metabolic dysfunction, they didn’t work and she didn’t
heal.
She was let down by the siloed medical system, which saw every health
issue she faced as an isolated incident. She didn’t have the support of
practitioners who could teach her at each step that the large baby, the
inability to lose weight, the high blood pressure and cholesterol, the
prediabetes, and, ultimately, the pancreatic cancer were all branches of the
same tree. Instead of offering synthesis and helping tie all the pieces
together, her specialists actively held all the pieces apart.
The conditions that have affected me, my friends in middle age, our
children, and our aging parents show that we are all starting to become
entrenched on the Bad Energy spectrum. Our siloed approach to seeing
these conditions as separate is fatally misguided. We don’t have fifty
different conditions to treat. Consistent pathways inside our bodies must be
nurtured and healed: the function and quantity of mitochondria, the
prevalence of chronic inflammation, the levels of oxidative stress, the health
of our microbiome, and all the ways they interact.
We’ve lost our way, but we can change course quickly. Our cells have an
incredible capacity for adaptability and regeneration. They are doing it all

day, every day. Broken cellular functions can be repaired and restored
quickly. This information applies to people of all ages. I have seen eightyyear-olds, eighteen-year-olds, and even eight-year-olds gain back their
health, confidence, self-esteem, and happiness—all by starting with a
foundation of protecting their cells’ energy-making capacity. Becoming an
empowered patient is possible, but breaking free from our current health
care system requires a clear understanding of its incentives and
shortcomings.
To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

3

Trust Yourself, Not Your Doctor

The most important thirteen days of my life came from ignoring a team of
doctors.
Right after my mom’s pancreatic cancer diagnosis, a medical team out
of Stanford and Palo Alto Medical Foundation jumped to action,
recommending a laundry list of surgeries and procedures—biopsies, blood
transfusions, and a liver stent. In most cases, the patient would have agreed
to these procedures, and the meeting would wrap up quickly. These
recommendations were coming from some of the most prestigious
institutions in the world, after all.
But based on my experience in medicine, I started asking questions.
I learned that these procedures had about a 33 percent chance of
extending her life a few more months at most, a 33 percent chance of
shortening her life span, and a 33 percent chance of not impacting her life
span (yet keeping her away from the family). In all cases, the invasive route
would mean that my mom would need to sit in a hospital room alone
(because of COVID-19 protocols) and potentially longer if the surgery had
complications (as they often do with immunocompromised cancer patients).
Additionally, her cancer was causing her liver to fail by the day and her
body to destroy its red blood cells, making the prognosis numbers even
worse, potentially complicating her recommended procedures, and making
her dependent on every-other-day multi-hour blood transfusions in the
hospital, despite being so weak she could barely leave her bed. We were

amid COVID lockdowns, and we also knew that she would be forced to
check in for the hospital procedures alone and might not come out. My
mom made it clear to the oncologist that she was not afraid of her rapidly
impending death, but she wanted to minimize unnecessary pain or nausea in
her final days. Despite the fact that she was clear, the system pushed the
exact procedures that would yield pain and nausea and aggressively shamed
our family for questioning the full-court press approach.
The doctor was not consciously trying to recommend a suboptimal
procedure, but I knew the invasive route would generate hundreds of
thousands of dollars for the hospital, and this doctor’s pay was tied to
booking these procedures.
I confirmed with the oncologist: “You are recommending an invasive
diagnostic procedure that would under no scenario extend her life more than
a couple of months and risk my mom dying alone in a hospital room? Even
though we are certain that this is stage 4 pancreatic cancer based on the CA
19-9 blood test and CT scan, and that she has liver failure and almost no red
blood cells left?”
“Yes, that is what we’re recommending,” the doctor replied.
With the family’s full support, my mother chose to go without the
confirmatory diagnostic procedure and to spend her final days at home with
her family. The procedure was being recommended to alleviate the doctor’s
checklist, algorithm, chart note template, and billing codes—and decidedly
not for my mom’s benefit. At that moment, I felt sick for the families who
navigate these decisions without the advocacy of a trusted support person
who understands the incentives of the system and has the knowledge to ask
difficult questions.
Rather than leaving my mom in the hospital, where she likely would
never see or touch my brother, father, or me again, we drove back from
Stanford to my parents’ home in Half Moon Bay and spent her final days
together.
On my mom’s final day of consciousness, she woke up weak and started
to lose control of her speech. Later in the day, in a burst of energy, she
urged us to take her to the place where she would soon be buried—a rustic

forest grove overlooking fields and ocean, just three minutes from her
house. We quickly drove her there and took her in a wheelchair to the
natural burial site. My mom expressed amazement at the beauty of the
ocean view and the trees she would soon be buried under, and we hugged as
a family. She asked my dad to kneel beside her in the wheelchair and
cupped his face in her hands. She looked at him and talked about how
magical their life was together. On this small patch of earth with the Pacific
Ocean behind them, they exchanged silent looks that expressed emotion and
gratitude for each other that are impossible to fully convey in words. The
awe and connection they shared as they exchanged their final embrace will
forever be my definition of the meaning of life.
“It’s just . . . so perfect and beautiful,” my mom burst out as she looked
at her family embracing her at her final resting site.
Minutes later, she lost consciousness. Two days later, surrounded by her
family holding hands around her, she died.
The final thirteen days I shared with my mom were the most meaningful
of my life.
If we had taken the advice of the medical system, they wouldn’t have
happened.

THE INCENTIVE TO INTERVENE
During residency, one of my best friends was a cancer surgeon. During the
meeting with my mom’s doctors, words my friend spoke years before rang
in my head: If you walk through the doors of this surgical oncology
department, you are going to get an operation, whether you need it or not.
I remember speaking to this friend after work when she was visibly
shaken after watching a patient forced into a surgery that wasn’t necessary.
Frequently, she suggested patients with terminal cancer be put on palliative
care (which prioritizes the patient’s comfort and peace in their final days).
The senior doctors generally shot this down. She told me her attending
surgeon would “lose his mind” for suggesting anything other than surgery
to a patient. If a patient said they wanted to decline a surgical intervention,

the department leaders would ask them to sign “Against Medical Advice”
(AMA) paperwork and be left with fewer resources to seek palliative care
or less invasive treatment options.
A doctor-patient relationship is such a power imbalance: the patient is
scared for their life and is not in a position to disagree when that doctor
offers a perceived “cure” to solve diabetes or heart disease or depression or
cancer.
Nobody gets into medicine to take advantage of patients to get rich.
There are far easier ways to make money than four years of medical school,
another three to nine years of residency and fellowship, an MCAT test, three
USMLEs (United States Medical Licensing Examinations), and oral and
written board examinations. Nearly every doctor I worked with dreamed as
a child about curing disease and worked like crazy to become a doctor.
They studied tirelessly to learn science, entered medical school with
idealistic visions, and became the pride of their family. They entered
residency with hundreds of thousands of dollars of student loan debt and
initially saw the chronic sleep deprivation and verbal abuse by their
superiors as integral parts of the experience—because “great achievement is
born of great sacrifice.”
But almost universally among doctors I have met, this idealism
eventually turns to cynicism. My colleagues in residency talked often about
questioning their sanity, of wondering whether this was all worth it. I spoke
with successful surgeons who’d drafted their resignation letters dozens of
times. Another had a recurring daydream of leaving everything behind and
becoming a baker. Many of my supervising physicians were desperate to
spend more time with their children. I witnessed more than one tearful
breakdown in the operating room when surgical cases were delayed and led
to yet another missed bedtime for their kids. Several had dealt with suicidal
depression. I understood why doctors had the highest burnout and suicide
rate of any profession.
Inevitably, these conversations led to an insight that I believe is
whispered by doctors in every hospital in America: they feel trapped inside
a broken system. For most, changing paths was unthinkable because of

financial pressures and the fact that they’d tied their identities to the status
of having “MD” at the end of their name.
These dedicated professionals are saddled with hundreds of thousands in
debt and put into a system driven by one simple financial incentive:
Every institution that impacts your health makes more money when
you are sick and less when you are healthy—from hospitals to pharma
to medical schools, and even insurance companies.
This incentive has created a system that is demonstrably hurting
patients.
Imagine you were an intelligent alien who was transported from outer
space to the United States and saw the health landscape: more than 75
percent of deaths and 80 percent of costs are driven by obesity, diabetes,
heart disease, and other preventable and reversible metabolic conditions we
have today. Now imagine you asked that alien to allocate $4 trillion—the
amount we spend on health care annually—to fix the problem. Never in a
million years would that alien say that we should wait for everyone to get
sick and then write prescriptions and perform procedures that don’t reverse
the underlying reasons they’re sick. But that is what we are doing today
because it generates recurring revenue for the largest industry in the
country.

TRUST THE SYSTEM ON ACUTE ISSUES, IGNORE IT ON
CHRONIC
Most health care books give recommendations and end with a disclaimer to
“consult your doctor.”
I have a different conclusion: when it comes to preventing and managing
chronic disease, you should not trust the medical system. This might sound
pessimistic or even frightening, but understanding the incentives of our
medical system and why it does not deserve our benefit of the doubt is the
first step to becoming an empowered patient.
In the last twenty years of her life, my mom had what many would
consider the best medical care in the world. She frequently visited the Mayo

Clinic for preventive tests and routinely visited doctors at Stanford
Hospital. And yet despite faithfully going through their revolving doors,
year after year, her cells never healed. Her doctors turned little knobs on her
biomarkers with a slew of medications, but those drugs did not help her
heal the disarray in her cells. Like almost any chronic disease, pancreatic
cancer is largely preventable by implementing the lifelong Good Energy
habits in this book. But nobody at these preeminent medical institutions
gave her strong recommendations on improving how her cells
fundamentally functioned. The only aggressive, assertive interventions they
espoused were ones they recommended when she was flagrantly and
lethally sick.
I hear you asking these questions: Hasn’t our system produced medical
miracles over the past hundred years? Hasn’t life expectancy almost
doubled during that time? Medicine is complicated—why should we
question a system that has worked so well?
Life expectancy has increased primarily because of sanitation practices
and infectious disease mitigation measures; because of emergency surgery
techniques for acute and life-threatening conditions, like an inflamed
appendix or trauma; and because of antibiotics to reverse life-threatening
infections. In short, almost every “health miracle” we can point to is a cure
for an acute issue (i.e., a problem that would kill you imminently if left
unresolved). Economically, acute conditions aren’t great in our modern
system, because the patient is quickly cured and no longer a customer.
Starting in the 1960s, the medical system has taken the trust engendered
by these acute innovations and used it to ask patients not to question its
authority on chronic diseases (which can last a lifetime and thus are more
profitable).
But the medicalization of chronic disease in the past fifty years has been
an abject failure. Today, we’ve siloed diseases and have a treatment for
everything:
High cholesterol? See a cardiologist for a statin.
High fasting glucose? See an endocrinologist for metformin.

ADHD? See a neurologist for Adderall.
Depressed? See a psychiatrist for a selective serotonin reuptake
inhibitor (SSRI).
Can’t sleep? See a sleep specialist for Ambien.
Pain? See a pain specialist for an opioid.
PCOS? See an OB-GYN for clomiphene.
Erectile dysfunction? See a urologist for Viagra.
Overweight? See an obesity specialist for Wegovy.
Sinus infections? See an ENT for an antibiotic or surgery.
But what nobody talks about—what I think many doctors don’t even
realize—is that the rates of all these conditions are going up at the exact
time we are spending trillions of dollars to “treat them.”
In the face of these unprecedented trends happening to our brains and
bodies across our life span—which all have metabolic dysfunction as a root
—we are told to “trust the science.” This obviously doesn’t make sense. We
have been gaslighted to not ask questions over the past fifty years at the
exact time chronic disease rates have exploded.
Our intervention-based medical system is by design. One of the most
cited doctors in medical school classes is Dr. William Stewart Halsted, a
Johns Hopkins founding physician in the early 1900s who created the
concept of residency. To Halsted, medical education was “a superhuman
initiation into a superhuman profession that emphasized heroism, selfdenial, diligence, and tirelessness.”
In Halsted’s view, there was no more important or higher calling in a
hospital than a surgeon cutting into a patient’s body and ridding them of
disease. Aggressive medical interventions were heroic—necessarily
barbaric and aggressive—to inflict short-term pain on the patient for longterm gain. To achieve the honor of becoming a surgeon, a Darwinian system
that ensured only the best and brightest attained this privilege was
necessary. He would engage in multiday surgical benders with residents to
test and weed out students.
During this time, John D. Rockefeller—realizing he could use byproducts from his oil production to create pharmaceuticals—heavily funded

medical schools throughout the United States to teach a curriculum based
on the intervention-first Halsted model. An employee of Rockefeller’s was
tasked to create the Flexner Report, which outlined a vision for medical
education that prioritized interventions and stigmatized nutritional,
traditional, and holistic remedies. Congress affirmed the Flexner Report in
1910 to establish that any credentialed medical institution in the United
States had to follow the Halsted/Rockefeller intervention-based model.
Initially, I agreed with Dr. Halsted’s mindset. When I applied for
surgical residency, I was eager to “solve” problems by simply cutting them
out. I believed that becoming a doctor, particularly a surgeon, is a privilege,
and there should be a rigorous process to ensure that only the best make it.
As a young resident, I judged people who complained about the grueling
schedule.
I didn’t learn in medical school that Dr. Halsted suffered from a lifelong
addiction to cocaine and morphine. He would embark on multiday drugfueled marathons in the surgical wards and then experience psychotic
breakdowns where he would be confined to home for days or weeks. He
often couldn’t perform surgeries because his hands were shaking vigorously
from sleep deprivation and cocaine. But the Flexner Report—and the
Halsted/Rockefeller intervention-based brand of medicine—has not been
changed by Congress since 1910 and continues to define U.S. medicine.
The truth: we should consider listening to the medical system if we have
an acute issue like a life-threatening infection or broken bone. But when it
comes to the chronic conditions that plague our lives, we should question
almost every institution regarding nutrition or chronic disease advice. All
you need to do is follow the money and incentives.

BIAS FOR ACTION
During my undergraduate years, the dean of Stanford Medical School was
Dr. Philip Pizzo, a pain specialist appointed in 2011 to lead a governmentsupported Institute of Medicine panel to make recommendations on treating
chronic pain in America. Nine of the nineteen people he appointed to the

panel had direct ties to opioid manufacturers. At the same time he was
appointed to the panel, Dr. Pizzo secured a $3 million donation to the
school from Pfizer, one of the largest opioid makers. The committee
recommended lenient opioid guidelines that have contributed to the crisis of
addiction we are seeing today.
Between 2012 and 2019, NIH grants went to at least eight thousand
researchers with “significant” financial conflicts of interest, many with
pharma companies. Over $188 million in conflicts were reported.
Deans of leading institutions have taken millions of dollars in direct
payments from pharmaceutical companies.
At the start of my residency, the Affordable Care Act (ACA) was passed
and all doctors had to get up to speed on the Merit-Based Incentive
Payment System (MIPS), a new program under the Quality Payment
Program (QPP), where a physician would now receive substantial
adjustments to payments from Medicare if they met specific quality-of-care
criteria. One would think that “quality” and “merit” in medicine would
mean that the patient was actually getting better. But when I dug deep
through the MIPS website to find the specific quality metrics for each
specialty, I was shocked to see that these quality criteria were primarily
based on whether doctors prescribed drugs regularly or did more
interventions. Yes, a government incentive program focused less on actual
patient outcomes (i.e., Did the patient get healthier?) and more on whether
doctors prescribed long-term pharmaceuticals. For instance, there are four
quality metrics under the domain of “Effective Clinical Care” for asthma,
and none references the improvement or resolution of asthma; rather,
doctors report on metrics like “percentage of patients aged five through
sixty-four years with a diagnosis of persistent asthma who were prescribed
long-term control medication.” This is consistent across hundreds of metrics
for a multitude of conditions. Only later did I learn that pharma spends
three times more on lobbying than the oil industry, and pharma has heavily
influenced virtually every piece of health care legislation and guideline I
operated under.

I heard doctors frequently talk about their variable pay being based on
relative values units (RVUs)—a measure of their productivity in generating
profitable billing codes. Many hospitals incentivize doctors to increase their
RVUs. Doing something like performing bariatric surgery on someone is
awarded significantly more RVU points than counseling a patient with
obesity to eat healthily. Even in hospitals that don’t explicitly tie RVUs to
pay, the administration almost always expects a doctor to hit a minimum
number of RVUs in a year. The metric is also used to assess promotions.
RVUs are an explicit gauge of the economic value a doctor is driving to the
hospital. Maximizing RVUs is an overarching concern for hospital
administrators and doctors who work within them. This makes sense.
Interventions, measured by RVUs, are how hospitals make money. This
incentive leads doctors not to ask questions about root-cause solutions when
a surgical case lands in their department. And it leads doctors to recommend
surgery more than they should. From early in my residency, I was counseled
by faculty physicians to learn to bill properly, because as a surgeon “you eat
what you kill,” a disturbing euphemism meaning that you get paid more if
you do more and bill more.
Whenever I asked why we were performing surgery or suggested a
potential dietary intervention (for people like my migraine patient Sarah),
doctors with seniority reprimanded me with comments like “We didn’t
become surgeons to give dietary advice.” Even if it means that terminal
patients are brutally traumatized and separated from family during their
remaining time, doctors are indoctrinated to do whatever it takes to keep
patients alive, even if it’s about squeezing out a few more days of life in the
ICU.
Billing is based on completing and coding an interventional action rather
than addressing why people get sick. Measuring and reimbursing an act
(such as prescribing a pill, conducting surgery, running an MRI) can be
coded, while a multifactorial physiological outcome that improves patients’
health (reversing diabetes, preventing cancer, reducing inflammation or
oxidative stress) cannot be.

Because revenue depends on the billing codes used, hospitals are
incentivized to conduct as many procedures and have as many quick patient
visits as possible to maximize reimbursements. If you come to the hospital
with a broken arm, the hospital will make more money if they prescribe a
narcotic to you in addition to treating your arm. The more you do, the more
you get paid, no matter what the outcome for the patient.
In residency, I sat by a sign in the ENT workroom that read fuck
cancer!—presumably to motivate the poor souls already terrified and
weakened by the disease running through their bodies. At Stanford
Medicine, I saw powerful, wealthy cancer patients laud their oncology team
for helping them wage war on their disease and confidently tell their
families, between exams, that they had the “best doctors in the world” on
their side. Obviously, there are benefits for patients to get psychologically
motivated to beat a disease, and there is nothing wrong with having
enthusiasm for your medical team. But I couldn’t help but start wondering
where these motivational slogans were in the decades prior when these
patients inevitably demonstrated symptoms like diabetes, mild dementia,
and hypertension. Cancer is often a preventable disease, but the fervor to
“fight” comes only after the damage has been largely done.
The truth is that the caliber of your doctor matters very little after a
cancer diagnosis. They will prescribe you the same thing as every other
doctor, conduct the same chemotherapy procedures with the same
machines, and perform the same surgery to roughly the same standards, all
based on National Comprehensive Cancer Network (NCCN) guidelines
(which are dripping with conflicts of interest). Saying “You have the best
medical team” after a cancer diagnosis is like saying you have the best
mechanic after totaling your car.
After my mother’s death, I spoke with one of her oncologists on the
phone. I leveled with her—doctor to doctor, woman to woman—and
expressed my frustration that she’d recommended procedures we both knew
would take my mom away from her family in her final days without
meaningfully improving her life span. I felt empathy, knowing she’d gotten

into medicine to help people, but she was so deep in the system, she
couldn’t conceive of a different way.

THE BIGGEST LIE IN HEALTH CARE
The most blatant and deadly example of the intervention-based incentives
of our medical system is that medical leaders are absolutely silent on the
things that are actually making us sick: food and lifestyle.
If the surgeon general, the dean of Stanford Medical School, and the
head of the NIH gave a press conference on the steps of Congress tomorrow
saying we should have an urgent national effort to cut sugar consumption
among children, I believe sugar consumption would go down. People in the
United States generally listen to medical leaders. Smoking plummeted
when the Surgeon General’s Report on Smoking was released, and we
changed our diet to more carbs and sugar (to disastrous effect) when the
Food Pyramid was released in the 1990s.
But instead, our medical leaders are silent on the true causes of our
nearly universal metabolic epidemic.
They don’t sound the alarm that U.S. teenagers are so sedentary and
eating such poor food that 77 percent of twenty-one-year-olds aren’t
physically fit enough to join the military.
They aren’t calling out media companies like Viacom (Nickelodeon) that
spend millions on lobbying the FTC not to regulate food ads to kids. Fastfood companies alone spent $5 billion to target kids in 2019, with 99
percent of the ads highlighting unhealthy options that are against the
USDA’s guidance.
They aren’t demanding later start times for schools, even when we have
a scientific consensus that sleep patterns of teenagers differ significantly
from those of other age groups and the current early start of school disrupts
normal brain development.
They aren’t decrying that 40 percent of funding for the Academy of
Nutrition and Dietetics comes from the food industry. These financial
conflicts have led the largest and most influential dietician group to endorse

mini cans of Coke as healthy, to publicly attack the idea that sugar causes
obesity, and to lobby against sugar taxes.
They aren’t expressing outrage that 10 percent of SNAP (Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program, a nutrition program 15 percent of the country
relies on) funds are spent on sugar-sweetened beverages, representing
billions of taxpayer dollars being funneled directly to companies like CocaCola and PepsiCo (which also benefit from taxpayer-funded Farm Bills that
subsidize the high-fructose corn syrup that goes into their diseasegenerating drinks).
They aren’t calling for medical organizations to reject donations from
ultra-processed food companies, which have donated millions of dollars to
medical groups such as the American Academy of Pediatrics (which takes
money from formula companies like Abbott and Mead Johnson) and the
American Diabetes Association (which has received money from the likes
of Coke and Cadbury).
They aren’t calling for tighter regulation on the more than eighty
thousand synthetic chemicals filling our food, water, air, soil, homes, and
personal care products, of which less than 1 percent have been adequately
tested for human safety, but for which many are known to be hormonal and
mitochondrial disruptors linked to diabetes, obesity, infertility, and cancer.
They aren’t calling for a stop to the billions in agricultural subsidies that
generate the components of processed food: Eighty percent of American
Farm Bill subsidies go to corn, grains, and soy oil. Amazingly, tobacco
receives four times more government subsidies (2 percent) than all fruits
and vegetables combined (0.45 percent).
Obesity doctors and pediatricians are not calling to lower the
recommended added sugar for children to zero; they are saying obesity is a
“brain disease” and that the government should subsidize bariatric surgeries
and pharmaceutical injections to manage it.
Cardiologists are not screaming from the rooftops for an urgent national
effort to reduce processed food to curb America’s number one killer, heart
disease.

The American Diabetes Association (ADA) is not declaring a War on
Sugar. They have in fact accepted millions from processed food companies
like Coke and put the ADA logo on products from brands such as Cadbury
chocolate, Kool-Aid, Crystal Light, Jell-O, SnackWell’s, Cool Whip, and
Raisin Bran.
Our medical leaders aren’t protesting the USDA’s decision to blatantly
ignore its scientific advisory board’s recommendation to lower added sugar
from 10 to 6 percent of total calories in the recent food guidelines. They
aren’t calling for the reversal of the USDA’s decision to broker a deal with
Kraft to offer ultra-processed Lunchables in schools and to relax regulations
around whole foods in cafeterias while being able to offer more processed
foods.
We would expect institutions like the NIH, medical schools, and the
American Medical Association (the group representing doctors) to be
ringing alarm bells about why so many patients are getting sick: diet and
other metabolic habits. We would expect them to use their respected voices
to be calling aggressively for changes to our food system and launching a
national effort to decrease sedentary lifestyles. But these critical institutions
of medicine have stayed silent and profited as more patients have gotten
sick.
Often I would hear in medical training that patients are “lazy” and that
they will inevitably eat bad food and make bad decisions. This pessimistic
view of patients is endemic in medicine. Looking around, I do not see
people in the United States systematically trying to be obese and
metabolically unhealthy or trying to live tortured lives and miss critical
milestones of their kids and grandkids. No. Patients are being crushed by
the devil’s bargain between the $6 trillion food industry (which wants to
make food cheap and addictive) and the $4 trillion health care industry
(which profits off interventions on sick patients and stays silent about the
reasons they’re getting sick).
This is not a conspiracy but a statement of hard economic reality that
every patient should clearly understand. Your doctor—and the entire system
they work within—directly and unequivocally benefits from your continued

suffering, symptoms, and sickness. Your doctor also likely doesn’t
understand the role they play in this medical industrial billing complex or
the economic and political puppet strings controlling their educational
curriculum, the research literature around nutrition, and their decisionmaking.
The incentives of our medical and food systems pressure patients to not
ask questions. These incentives also lead to the biggest lie in health care:
that the reasons we are getting sicker, fatter, more depressed, and more
infertile are complicated.
The reasons are not complicated; they all tie to Good Energy habits.
I deeply respect doctors, but I want to be very clear on something: at
every hospital in the United States, many doctors are doing the wrong
things, pushing pills and interventions when an ultra-aggressive stance on
diet and behavior would do far more for the patient in front of them. Suicide
and burnout rates are astronomical in health care, with approximately four
hundred doctors per year killing themselves. (That’s equivalent to about
four medical school graduating classes just dropping dead every year by
their own hand.) Doctors have twice the rate of suicide as the general
population. Based on my own experience with depression as a young
surgeon, I think a contributor to this phenomenon is an insidious spiritual
crisis about the efficacy of our work and a sense of being trapped in a
system that is not working but seems too big to change or escape.

SAVING YOURSELF
It might not sound like it, but the theme of this chapter is optimism. We are
amid a modern health crisis. The good news is that our system can be fixed,
and the crisis can end.
Just 120 years ago, starvation, malnutrition, and early death were the
norm. Tuberculosis and pneumonia were leading causes of death. Life
expectancy in the United States was around age forty-seven. Back then, 30
percent of all U.S. deaths occurred in children under five years of age,
compared to just 1.4 percent in 1999. If you transported someone living in

those times to the present day, they’d be in utter shock as they tried to
process society’s advancements. There is no question that our system can
produce positive results when focused on the right problem.
U.S. hospitals today are filled with some of the world’s most dedicated,
intelligent, and hardworking professionals. But they are operating in a
system that has lost its way, one that now makes money when patients are
sick and loses money when they are healthy.
The modern medical system has systematically, overwhelmingly, and
unequivocally let us down in preventing and reversing chronic disease. In
fact, if you pull out deaths from the top eight infectious diseases (which
were decreased by antibiotics) from historical data, life expectancy rates
haven’t improved much in the past 120 years—despite, of course, the fact
that health care is the largest and fastest-growing industry in the United
States—with the vast majority of health care dollars going to chronic
disease care.
We will all grow old before the system changes itself. But a bottoms-up
revolution is happening where patients are better equipped today to take
charge of their metabolic health. Let’s dive into specific ways to implement
Good Energy principles to feel better today and prevent disease tomorrow.
To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

PA R T 2

CREATING GOOD ENERGY

CHAPT ER

4

Your Body Has the Answers
How to Read Your Blood Tests and Get Actionable Insights from Wearables

Emily did what every pregnant woman in the United States does at twentyfour weeks of pregnancy: she walked into a doctor’s office, drank a
concoction of 50 grams of glucose dissolved in water and artificial
colorings (an oral glucose tolerance test, or OGTT), waited an hour, and
took a blood sugar test to see if she had gestational diabetes. She was told
her blood glucose level didn’t indicate the condition and she was “in the
clear.”
Emily had a personal affinity for data and had gotten access to a
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), which she was wearing on her arm
when she went in for her OGTT. Given this, she was able to personally
obtain dozens of glucose data points over the several hours before and after
her test and see a much more dynamic picture of her blood sugar than the
single data point from the lab. The CGM results showed a very different
story than what her doctor told her: she actually had high glucose levels
(well in the gestational diabetes range), even hours after drinking the
glucose drink. “I walked away thinking that I didn’t trust that lab anymore
—or the hospital mixed up my results,” said Emily.
Without that CGM data, Emily would have left her doctor’s office not
knowing about her underlying condition and the risks it could have for her
child and herself. According to the journal Diabetes Care, 20 percent of
women with gestational diabetes will remain undiagnosed, even with

universal screening. Failure to manage the condition can lead to insulin
resistance in the fetus and set the stage for the high risk of lifelong
metabolic issues. As we saw in the case of my mother, metabolic
dysfunction often first shows signs in the mother during pregnancy,
providing a warning signal to get blood glucose levels in a healthy range to
avoid additional (and increasingly serious) related conditions.
Managing the condition “was a fun challenge . . . with the CGM,” said
Emily. During pregnancy, she launched an exploration to protect herself and
her child. “Data shows that glucose levels and type 2 diabetes may play a
role in Alzheimer’s development,” she added. “So I started to think, Wow, I
have a child, and I need to start thinking about protecting my brain long
term.”
She continued, “Before wearing a CGM, my body was a mystery to me.
I wasn’t connecting what I was doing to how I was feeling. Now it’s Oh, if
I’m feeling tired or stressed, how have I been eating in the past twenty-four
hours? because I usually see the answer there. It’s funny because, as
women, we’re always told to lose weight and be thin and look better. Once I
wore the glucose monitor, my mindset shifted to Actually, I’m eating food
to take care of my body and protect it long term. Food stopped being an
enemy and started being a tool for my health.”
Getting insight into how food impacts our health to empower people to
make decisions is a good thing; that seems obvious. But most expecting
mothers—and most patients in general—don’t get nearly as much insight
into their bodies as Emily did with a CGM.
Today, we understand more about how our cars, finances, and computers
work at any given moment than we do about the function of our own
bodies. We jump through hoops to get a basic once-a-year sense of our
metabolic health. In twenty-two U.S. states, patients still don’t legally own
their own medical records; instead, doctors and hospitals do.
If we lack access to tests that show us how food directly affects our
biology, the health care system prevents us from understanding our health
trajectory and whether our choices are leading to good outcomes. Instead,
we have industry-funded movements aimed to convince us that there is “no

such thing as bad foods.” Such perverse campaigns have spread among the
public health and nutrition ecosystem.
Most of us have had the disappointing experience of going to the doctor
to review our lab work only to have them tell us one of two things:
1. “Everything looks fine! You’re good to go.” Even when you definitely
don’t feel fine.
2. “This result is a little off. We’re going to put you on this medication.”
Without talking in depth about why or what you can do about it.
The truth is that most doctors don’t understand how to interpret the lab
results in a meaningful way. Sure, doctors can order a potassium infusion if
potassium is low, prescribe a statin if LDL cholesterol is elevated, and
prescribe an antibiotic if the white blood cell count is above 11,000. But
push a little deeper into how labs are interconnected or what the
constellation of labs and biomarkers says about the underlying cellular
physiology in your body, and you’re likely to get a blank stare. Physicians
are trained to follow rules with lab interpretation rather than to step back
and read the integrated tea leaves of what it all means. And in more than 93
percent of U.S. adults, the tea leaves read “Bad Energy.”
Fortunately, we’re entering a new era of medicine. Doctors no longer
need to serve as the middlemen for interpreting lab results. This new era
will benefit patients profoundly. Levels CEO Sam Corcos calls this concept
“bio-observability”—the ability to observe your own biology through
technologies like wearables, continuous monitors, and direct-to-consumer
(DTC) lab testing. Let me be clear: bio-observability is one of the most
disruptive trends our health care industry faces. You should not blindly trust
your doctor and you should not blindly trust me. You should trust your own
body. Your body can “speak” to you through accessible testing and realtime data from wearable sensors that help you understand how individual
symptoms are connected to overall metabolic health.
We are living in an exciting time where we have the potential to live the
longest, healthiest lives in human history, but this will require optimization.

You are the primary person in charge of understanding your body. You may
have been indoctrinated to think you’re not capable of understanding your
body, to distrust common sense, and to outsource your health agency. This
stops now. A movement exists of people demanding to understand and own
their health data so they can use it to live healthier lives. The time is now to
join this movement to learn more about the signals coming from your body.
For the remainder of this book, let’s dive into how to use symptoms, blood
tests, and real-time biosensors to see inside your body and determine the
success of the Good Energy plan.

SYMPTOMS ARE A GIFT: HOW DO YOU FEEL?
So many patients I’ve seen in my practice tell me that they “feel fine” and
are “healthy.” But when we dig into a detailed symptom questionnaire, we
find they have ten or more discrete symptoms or conditions, which their
previous doctors have chalked up to “normal.” These symptoms often
include neck pain, seasonal sinus infections or recurrent colds, eczema,
itchy ear canals, lower-back pain, acne, headaches, bloating, reflux, chronic
cough, a little anxiety, trouble falling asleep, low energy, and PMS
symptoms like cramps and moodiness.
None of this is normal. You can and should feel incredible—mentally
and physically—most of the time. We have so normalized what Dr. Mark
Hyman refers to as “FLC” (feel like crap) syndrome that many of us can’t
even imagine what it could feel like to be symptom-free. Every one of the
handful of symptoms I just listed is a sign from the body that the cells are
not getting what they need and could be improved by minimizing oxidative
stress, mitochondrial dysfunction, and chronic inflammation with food and
lifestyle changes.
Taking stock of baseline symptoms is a simple, critical step in enhanced
bio-observability. I urge you to take the symptom questionnaire on my
website (caseymeans.com/goodenergy), adapted from the Institute for
Functional Medicine, and see what has been affecting you over the past
thirty days.

We are told that symptoms are things to fear and immediately treat. But
they are a gift. Think of your cells as thirty-seven trillion infants in your
care. Like infants, the cells can’t communicate with words, so symptoms
are their way of wailing to get your attention to have their needs met.
Every time a symptom crops up, I ask, What is my body trying to tell
me? If my neck pain starts acting up, I always look at how my sleep and
stress levels have been. If I have anxiety, I think about whether I’ve been
exercising and how much alcohol I had that week. If a pimple pops up out
of the blue, I ponder whether sneaky sugar crept into a recent restaurant
meal I ate. If I have a headache, I think back on my hydration over the day.
If I have PMS symptoms, I think about all the factors that may have
affected my hormones differently that month, like fiber intake, alcohol,
stress, and sleep.
Another important way our body speaks to us is through our biomarkers.

HOW TO ANALYZE A STANDARD BLOOD TEST
Triglycerides, fasting glucose, “good” cholesterol, “bad” cholesterol—we
have all nodded as the doctors quickly glossed over our test results, but very
few of us have any idea what these numbers mean. These numbers have
limitations: they are a single snapshot when our body is highly dynamic.
But they can still give powerful clues to metabolic health and cellular
energy management when interpreted together properly.
The question you’re trying to answer with standard blood tests is
whether you are part of the 6.8 percent of people in the United States who
meet the normal criteria for the five basic metabolic biomarkers without
medication, and therefore are a step in the right direction to having Good
Energy. To answer this question, you will need to obtain your lab results
and vital signs from your most recent annual physical and get a measuring
tape. Among your life’s top priorities should be making it into that 6.8
percent. If you don’t achieve that goal, you’ll almost certainly experience
more conditions like depression, acne, headaches, and deadly chronic
diseases in life. If you’re a woman, you’ll be more likely to pass metabolic

dysfunction on to your child in utero, be infertile, have a miscarriage,
experience worse menopausal symptoms, and develop Alzheimer’s. We
have normalized an environment where 70 percent of the nation’s
population will have an overt chronic disease soon. That doesn’t have to be
you.
I am a huge believer in personal choice and individual freedoms—and
for people to eat or do things that are unhealthy if they choose to. But we
should all at least know where we are on the spectrum of Good (or Bad)
Energy so we can make informed decisions. Scientific research on behavior
change has shown that patients who have access to their own health data
have significantly better outcomes. I believe that if a patient with a high
triglyceride-HDL ratio clearly understands that this biomarker makes them
89 percent more likely to have depression, they would be more likely to
follow a diet and lifestyle plan to optimize their metabolism.
To be empowered about our health, we must understand the five basic
metabolic biomarkers that generally come at no cost during our annual
physical.
Triglycerides: Am I Overwhelming My Cells with Glucose?

When we consume more sugar and carbohydrates than our liver
mitochondria can handle, the excess glucose is converted into triglycerides
and shipped out into the bloodstream to be stored in tissues and muscles in
a process called de novo lipogenesis (de novo = new, lipo = fat, genesis = to
make).
Evolutionarily, this process makes sense. Triglycerides are a form of fat
that can be used for energy when humans are fasting (which they were often
forced to do in the feast-or-famine cycles of premodern life) or exerting
themselves. But in our modern society—where we are constantly fed and
largely sedentary—these triglycerides pile up in the bloodstream.
Insulin resistance causes overburdened fat cells throughout the body to
break down fat (via lipolysis), which sends more fat back to the liver for
triglyceride production. Unfortunately, liver cells filled with fat don’t work

properly and block insulin signaling, exacerbating insulin resistance in a
vicious cycle occurring in most U.S. bodies today.
In terms of what raises triglyceride levels, the simple message is that
high triglycerides are almost certainly a warning sign that you are eating too
much sugar, refined carbs, and/or alcohol, and probably not engaging in
enough physical activity. You need to reduce the amount of carbs that are
overwhelming your liver and turning into fat. This means cutting out the
soda, sugar-sweetened beverages, juices, added sugar of any kind, candy,
products with refined grains (breads, pasta, crackers, tortillas, chips,
cookies, pastries, cakes, cereals, etc.), and other high glycemic foods. And
you need to increase your daily movement to burn the excess fuel.
Excess alcohol consumption has a negative impact on triglyceride levels
due to its impact on liver function, with triglyceride levels going up as
alcohol consumption goes up (which will likely be even worse if the drink
has any added sugar, mixes, or juices in it). Additionally, when alcohol is
consumed with a meal containing fat (specifically saturated fat), it may
worsen post-meal triglyceride levels by impairing the activity of lipoprotein
lipase, an enzyme that normally clears triglycerides. Aside from increased
triglycerides as alcohol consumption goes up, alcohol also depletes
antioxidant resources in the cells and generates reactive oxygen species,
both of which contribute to poor metabolic health.
RANGES:

The triglyceride range that’s considered “normal” by standard criteria:
<150 mg/dL
Optimal range: <80 mg/dL
That the normal range for triglycerides is anything under 150 mg/dL is a
travesty. The range should be much lower. The research shows that the
probability of a cardiovascular event (i.e., heart attack and stroke) is 50
percent less in people with triglycerides under 81 mg/dL versus in people
with levels between 110 and 153 mg/dL. (Yet doctors tell both groups they

are in the “normal” range.) Levels above 153 mg/dL sharply drive up the
risk.
In my own case, my triglyceride levels on two very different diets—one
a high-carb, low-fat vegan diet and the other a more omnivorous, higher fat,
moderately low-carb diet—were both 47 mg/dL. Why did both diets keep
triglycerides low? Neither diet overwhelmed my cells with too much energy
to process, because both focused on unprocessed, whole foods that cued my
complex satiety mechanisms to signal me not to overeat. If you pair dietary
strategies with comprehensive Good Energy habits (such as sleep, stress
management, toxin avoidance, exercise, etc.), your whole metabolic system
will churn through excess energy substrates from food and maintain
mitochondrial health. And you’ll be set up for healthier triglyceride levels.
High-Density Lipoprotein (HDL) Cholesterol

When we talk about cholesterol in lab testing, it’s a misnomer. Cholesterol
and triglycerides can’t travel around the body by themselves, because these
two fatty substances can’t dissolve in the blood (which is mostly water).
Instead, they are packaged together inside a sphere made of molecules that
can dissolve in water, and this sphere is covered in protein markers (like
shipping labels) that allow cells to recognize and interact with it, so the
sphere can drop off its fat and cholesterol cargo. The specific proteins on
the surface, along with the ratio of cholesterol and fat inside the sphere,
determine whether it’s considered a high-density lipoprotein cholesterol
(HDL-C) particle, a low-density lipoprotein cholesterol (LDL-C) particle,
or other types.
HDL is often referred to as “good” because it helps remove cholesterol
from the blood vessels and carries it back to the liver for processing and
elimination from the body. This process of reverse cholesterol transport can
help prevent the buildup of plaque in the arteries and reduce the risk of
heart disease and stroke. Therefore, high levels of HDL in the bloodstream
are considered beneficial for cardiovascular health.

Meanwhile, LDL (low-density lipoprotein) is often referred to as “bad”
cholesterol because it can deposit cholesterol in the walls of the arteries,
leading to the formation of plaque. This process, known as atherosclerosis,
can narrow the arteries and increase the risk of heart disease and stroke.
High levels of HDL have been associated with a lower risk of heart
disease and stroke, while low levels of HDL have been linked to an
increased risk of these conditions. In fact, HDL is often used as a predictor
of cardiovascular risk, along with other factors such as blood pressure,
smoking, and age. Additionally, HDL has anti-inflammatory and antioxidant
properties, which can help protect against the development of
atherosclerosis. For inflammatory cells to cause problems in the blood
vessels, they need to first bind to the vessel walls; HDL helps decrease this
ability for inflammatory cells to adhere. More research is coming out daily
about the nuances of HDL, with more attention being paid to the subtypes
of this larger class of molecules. But HDL is generally associated with
better metabolic health, and HDL is one of the only lab tests you want to be
high rather than low.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: >40 mg/dL for men
and >50 mg/dL for women
Optimal range: There is a U-shaped relationship between HDL levels
and development of diseases, with both low and very high levels being
associated with increased risk. The sweet spot for lowest risk appears to
be about 50 to 90 mg/dL, although sources vary.
Fasting Glucose

Fasting glucose measures your blood sugar levels unaffected by a recent
meal and should be tested after not eating or drinking any calories for eight
hours. We learned why this is important in earlier chapters: a high fasting
glucose level is a sign of insulin resistance blocking glucose from getting
into our cells. We also learned that the body initially overcompensates for
this insulin block by producing more insulin, which can work for a while in

“pushing” the cell to let glucose in. Because of this overcompensation,
fasting glucose levels can look normal for a long period while insulin
resistance is developing full force.
Unfortunately, though, you won’t know if insulin resistance is brewing
unless you test fasting insulin, which is—catastrophically—not a standard
lab test in the United States, despite being cheap and easy. A study from The
Lancet showed that insulin resistance can be picked up more than a decade
before fasting glucose hits the diabetic range, meaning that we are
knowingly missing a huge window of opportunity to intervene. More on
this later in the chapter.
With that said, if your glucose is rising, it’s a big warning sign of
problems with how your cells are functioning and a clue that Bad Energy
processes—like mitochondrial dysfunction, oxidative stress, and chronic
inflammation—are at play and that issues inside your cells are preventing
the normal transmission of the insulin signal.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: <100 mg/dL
Optimal range: 70–85 mg/dL
We call blood sugar less than 100 mg/dL “normal.” That’s another
travesty. As Dr. Robert Lustig says, “Once the fasting glucose rises over
100 mg/dL (signifying prediabetes), metabolic syndrome is in full force,
and there are no options for prevention anymore; now you’re in full-fledged
treatment mode. But in fact, a fasting blood glucose of 90 mg/dL is already
questionable.”

The Six Stages of Diabesity According to Dr. Mark Hyman
“There are six stages of diabesity [diabetes + obesity, aka insulin resistance]. The
first stage of insulin resistance is high spiking levels of insulin 30 minutes, one hour,
and two hours after the introduction of a sugar load. Your blood sugar may stay
completely normal in these time frames. The second stage is elevated levels of
fasting insulin with a perfectly normal blood sugar level while fasting and after a

glucose challenge test. The third stage is the elevation of blood sugar and insulin
after a sugar load at 30 minutes, one hour, or two hours. The fourth stage is an
elevation of your fasting blood sugar level higher than 90 or 100 mg/dl and
elevation of fasting insulin. As you can see, by the time fasting blood sugar is
higher than 90 or 100 mg/dl, this is far down the progression of insulin resistance.”
—Dr. Mark Hyman

Blood Pressure

High blood pressure is the most common preventable risk factor for
cardiovascular diseases, such as heart disease, heart failure, stroke, heart
attack, arrhythmias, chronic kidney disease, dementia, and arterial
blockages in the extremities. High blood pressure is the largest contributor
to death and disability in the entire world. It exerts its ill effects on the body
by damaging blood vessels and contributing to stiffness and blockages in
the vascular system that can cut off critical blood flow in subtle ways over
long periods of time.
Blood pressure is directly related to insulin resistance. Interestingly, one
of the many functions of insulin is to stimulate nitric oxide, which is the
chemical that dilates vessels and is released from cells of the blood vessel
wall. In insulin-resistant bodies, this process is impaired, leading to less
dilation of vessels. Bad Energy processes make this worse: increased
inflammation leads to high blood pressure by downregulating nitric oxide
synthase (the protein enzyme that makes nitric oxide), and oxidative stress
induces hypertension by causing damage to blood vessel walls and
decreasing nitric oxide.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: <120 systolic and <80
diastolic mmHg
Optimal range: Same as “normal”

Waist Circumference

Waist circumference matters because it is a marker of fat in and around
your abdominal organs. Excess fat here is a sign of excess energy being
deposited in places it is not supposed to be. Fat can be stored in the body’s
following three compartments, and each carries a different level of risk for
metabolic dysfunction:
Subcutaneous fat is the fat under the skin that you can pinch with your
fingers. This fat is not considered to be dangerous and more of it is not
associated with increased mortality.
Visceral fat is fat coating the organs in the abdomen. Think of it as a
blanket of fat on top of your liver, intestines, and spleen. This fat is
dangerous, promotes chronic inflammation, and increases the risk of
disease and early death.
Ectopic fat is fat inside the cells of various organs like the liver, heart,
and muscle. This fat is extremely dangerous, blocks insulin receptor
signaling, and increases the risk of disease and early death.
Visceral fat and ectopic fat are strongly associated with insulin
resistance and metabolic abnormalities. Visceral fat is unique in that it acts
as a hormone-secreting organ, secreting pro-inflammatory chemicals that
recruit inflammatory cells. This stew of inflammation causes fat to leak into
the bloodstream (lipolysis), block insulin signaling, and drive insulin
resistance. Ectopic fat directly blocks the cells’ normal internal activities,
like insulin signaling.
Waist circumference is a useful—albeit rudimentary—indicator of the
level of visceral fat, which expands our midlines. This is measured just
above the top of your hip bone, at about the level of your belly button. The
amount of visceral fat helps predict metabolic dysfunction, regardless of
whether someone is normal weight or obese. We can measure visceral fat in
more precise ways, including via imaging studies, such as dual X-ray

absorptiometry (DEXA) scans. But knowing your waist circumference is a
great place to start.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: <102 cm (40 inches)
for men and <88 cm (35 inches) for women
Optimal range: The International Diabetes Federation has proposed
tighter cut points of <80 cm (31.5 inches) for women and <90 cm (35
inches) for men of the following ethnicities: South Asian, Chinese,
Japanese, and South and Central Americans. For those of European,
Sub-Saharan African, Middle Eastern, and Eastern Mediterranean
origin, the cut points are <94 cm (37 inches) in men and <80 cm (31.5
inches) in women.
Triglyceride-to-HDL Ratio

After assessing each of these five biomarkers, there is one more step:
calculate your triglyceride-to-HDL ratio to better understand insulin
sensitivity. Simply divide your triglycerides by your HDL. Interestingly,
studies have shown that this value correlates well with underlying insulin
resistance. So even if you are unable to access a fasting insulin test, the
triglyceride-to-HDL ratio can give you a general sense of where you’re at.
According to Dr. Mark Hyman, “the triglyceride-to-HDL ratio is the best
way to check for insulin resistance other than the insulin response test.
According to a paper published in Circulation, the most powerful test to
predict your risk of a heart attack is the ratio of your triglycerides to HDL.
If the ratio is high, your risk for a heart attack increases sixteen-fold—or
1,600 percent! This is because triglycerides go up and HDL (or ‘good
cholesterol’) goes down with diabesity.”
Dr. Robert Lustig agrees: “The triglyceride-to-HDL ratio is the best
biomarker of cardiovascular disease and the best surrogate marker of
insulin resistance and metabolic syndrome.” In children, higher
triglyceride-to-HDL is significantly correlated with mean insulin, waist
circumferences, and insulin resistance. In adults, the ratio has shown a

positive association with insulin resistance across normal weight and
overweight people and significantly tracks with insulin levels, insulin
sensitivity, and prediabetes.
Perplexingly, the triglyceride-to-HDL ratio is not a metric used in
standard clinical practice. If you remember one thing from this chapter,
remember this: you need to know your insulin sensitivity. It can give you
lifesaving clues about early dysfunction and Bad Energy brewing in your
body, and is best assessed by a fasting insulin test, discussed below. Right
now, this is not a standard test offered to you at your annual physical. I
implore you to find a way to get a fasting insulin test or to calculate your
triglyceride-to-HDL ratio every year. Do this for your children, as well. And
take the steps outlined in the following chapters to ensure it does not start
creeping up.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: none specified in
standard criteria
Optimal range: Anything above a ratio of 3 is strongly suggestive of
insulin resistance. You want to shoot for less than 1.5, although lower is
better. I recommend aiming for less than 1.
My HDL cholesterol is 92 mg/dL and triglycerides are 47 mg/dL,
making my ratio 0.51.

SIX FURTHER TESTS
The blood tests we’ve covered so far should come standard (and generally
for free) on your annual physical and give you a decent picture on whether
Bad Energy is brewing in your body.
Below are the six most important additional tests that are relatively
inexpensive and can be run at almost any standard lab to give an expanded
view of your metabolic and overall health. These tests should be completed

at least yearly. Confirm that these six tests are on your annual physical or
order them as additional tests if not.
Fasting Insulin and Calculation of HOMA-IR

Fasting insulin is the most valuable lab test you can get.
An elevated fasting insulin is a red alarm that your cells are under siege
and Bad Energy is at play. It tells you that cells in your body are likely
filling up with toxic excess fat, blocking the insulin signal, disavowing
glucose from entering the cell, and forcing your pancreas to oversecrete
insulin to try to overcompensate for this dysfunctional block. Elevated
fasting insulin also tells you that inflammation may be directly blocking the
transmission of the insulin signal from the outside to the inside of the cell.
Ask your doctor for a fasting insulin test on your next lab draw. From the
fasting insulin along with a fasting glucose test, you can calculate your
HOMA-IR (homeostatic model assessment for insulin resistance)—one of
the most standard measures of insulin resistance in research. To calculate,
search “HOMA-IR” on MDCalc (a medical calculator tool) and input your
lab values.
Most likely your doctor will push back and say, “Oh, your blood sugar is
fine. You don’t need an insulin test” or “You’re a healthy weight. You don’t
need an insulin test” or “This test varies day to day, so it won’t be reliable.”
Do not accept any of this.
Dozens, if not hundreds of papers show the clinical utility of
understanding the degree of insulin resistance, even in people without
diabetes who are a healthy weight. If your doctor pushes back on this test, I
recommend providing the following quote from The Lancet, a premier
medical journal that your doctor will be aware of (Note: “hyperglycemic”
means “high glucose”):
[There are] marked changes in the HOMA 2 scores in the patients
that progress to the overt hyperglycaemic stage of type 2 diabetes up
to 15 years before diabetes diagnosis by glycaemic parameters,

which remained mostly in the normal range during this anterior
period of time. . . .
Excessive pancreatic ß-cell function is characterised by
hyperinsulinaemia . . . as this organ attempts to overcome the body’s
increasing insulin resistance, characterising subclinical diabetes
within the non-diabetic glycaemic range. At this hyperglycaemic
insulin-resistant stage, hyperglycaemic insulin-resistant individuals
already present with an increased risk of diabetic comorbidities long
before overt diabetes develops.
Translation: You can develop insulin resistance up to fifteen years before
you can diagnose type 2 diabetes based on testing glucose. Any level of
insulin resistance means your cells are overburdened, you are dealing with
Bad Energy processes in the cells, and you will be at a higher risk for
developing innumerable symptoms and diseases associated with metabolic
dysfunction (see Chapter 2).
HOMA-IR is a calculation that considers your insulin level for a given
fasting glucose level. Two people might have the exact same fasting glucose
level, but the more insulin-resistant person will be producing much more
insulin to keep the glucose at that level (to overcome the insulin block). The
following example illustrates why knowing your HOMA-IR is crucial.
Person A has a fasting glucose of 85 mg/dL and an insulin level of 2
mIU/L.
Person B has the same fasting glucose of 85 mg/dL and an insulin
level of 30 mIU/L.
Person B’s body is having to churn out significantly more insulin to
keep fasting glucose at 85 mg/dL, representing that person B is
extremely insulin resistant.
Person A has a HOMA-IR of 0.4 (extremely good, very insulin
sensitive).
Person B has a HOMA-IR of 6.3 (very insulin resistant) and will
likely develop many more diseases and symptoms and die earlier.

However, doctors rarely test fasting insulin. Both people have normal
fasting glucose levels, so their doctors will tell them they are both
totally in the clear.
Recent research shows that in children with obesity, elevated fasting
insulin levels and HOMA-IR are highly predictive of future blood sugar
diseases, whereas fasting glucose levels and hemoglobin A1c were not
predictive.
RANGES (FASTING INSULIN):

No standardized range for “normal,” but according to some sources,
<25 mIU/L
Optimal range: fasting insulin 2 to 5 mIU/L. Above 10 mIU/L is
concerning, and above 15 mIU/L is significantly elevated.
RANGES (HOMA-IR):

Less than 2.0, but lower is better
Brand-new research has shown that when a young, healthy adult is on
the high end of “normal” for fasting glucose, waist circumference, and
fasting insulin, they have a five times higher risk for a future major
cardiovascular event. The absolute tragedy of our current health care system
is that a doctor will tell this young person they are fine and normal.
High-Sensitivity CRP (hsCRP)

When you have inflammation, hsCRP, a protein primarily made by the liver,
rises in blood concentration. This test is one of the most common and easyto-access measures of inflammation. It is often elevated in people with
metabolic dysfunction. Think obesity, heart disease, type 2 diabetes, leaky
gut, Alzheimer’s disease, and sleep disorders like obstructive sleep apnea.
The marker can also rise during infection. You definitely want to know your
level of inflammation every year—given how strong the relationship is
between insulin resistance, oxidative stress, chronic inflammation,
mitochondrial dysfunction, the cell danger response (CDR), and the

development of nearly every chronic disease and symptom facing people in
the United States today.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: The CDC and
American Heart Association recommend the following ranges:
Low risk: <1.0 mg/L
Average risk: 1.0 to 3.0 mg/L
High risk: >3.0 mg/L
Optimal range: <0.3 mg/L. This level is one you want as low as
possible, and certainly below the “low-risk” range indicated by the
CDC. A study of nearly thirty thousand individuals showed that very
low hsCRP (<0.36 mg/L) was associated with the least risk of
cardiovascular events, such as heart attack and stroke, and the risk
steadily increased from there. Even a range of 0.36 to 0.64 mg/L
conferred higher risk than <0.36 mg/L, and by the time one reached
0.64 to 1.0 mg/L, the relative risk was 2.6 for a cardiovascular event.
Chronic inflammation is one of the three key hallmarks of Bad Energy.
If it’s not low, take stock of which Good Energy pillars outlined in the
following chapters may be driving a state of “threat” in the body, and
address it.
Hemoglobin A1c (HbA1c)

HbA1c (often referred to as just A1c) measures the percentage of
hemoglobin in your body that has sugar stuck to it via glycation. HbA1c is
one of the three main screening tests for type 2 diabetes (along with fasting
glucose and an oral glucose tolerance test). Hemoglobin is the molecule in
all red blood cells that carries oxygen. If more glucose is floating around in
the bloodstream, it has a higher chance of bumping into hemoglobin and
bonding with it. This bonding will increase the percentage of glycated
hemoglobin, which can be translated into an approximation of average
glucose levels.

Red blood cells float around in the bloodstream for around 90 to 120
days before the spleen clears them out. So HbA1c represents a longer-term
estimate of average blood sugar levels over a few months. But many factors
can affect HbA1c, like red blood cell life span (which can be related to
genetics and ethnicity), anemia, kidney disease, an enlarged spleen, and
more. Therefore, we should use an HbA1c test as just one tool among many
to understand metabolic status.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: <5.7 percent
Optimal range: Research suggests that the lowest risk range for HbA1c
is 5.0 to 5.4 percent.
Uric Acid

Uric acid is a metabolic by-product of the breakdown of fructose and
purine-rich foods, which include animal proteins (especially red meat,
seafood, and organs) and alcohol (especially beer). When we overwhelm
the body with too much fructose too quickly (like when we chug a soda
laden with high-fructose corn syrup), uric acid levels quickly rise, creating
several problems. Excess uric acid generates oxidative stress that disturbs
mitochondrial function, shunting things that should go to cellular energy
(ATP) production toward fat instead. Then, as fat builds up in the cells,
particularly in the liver cells, it worsens insulin resistance. Uric acid also
generates systemic inflammation by stimulating the release of inflammatory
chemicals (cytokines) and increases blood pressure by inactivating nitric
oxide, which normally relaxes blood vessels.
When uric acid levels are high, it can crystallize in our joints, leading to
gout, an extremely painful inflammatory condition that, unsurprisingly, is
associated with a 71 percent higher likelihood of having type 2 diabetes (in
women), a 78 percent higher risk of kidney disease, a 42 percent increased
risk of depression, and a twice as high risk of sleep apnea and heart attack.
Hopefully, the relationship between these varied conditions no longer seems

perplexing: they are each organ-specific expressions of the same underlying
physiology of Bad Energy.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: usually around 1.5 to
6 mg/dL for women and 2.5 to 6 mg/dL for men
Optimal range: Research suggests that keeping uric acid <5 mg/dL for
men and 2 to 4 mg/dL for women is associated with the lowest
development of cardiometabolic diseases.
Liver Enzymes: Aspartate Transaminase (AST), Alanine Transaminase
(ALT), and Gamma-Glutamyl Transferase (GGT)

AST and ALT are proteins made in liver cells that can be released into
circulation when liver cells die or become damaged. One of the key ways
that liver cells can become dysfunctional is via insulin resistance. So
elevated AST and ALT are associated with increased risk of fatty liver and
metabolic disease.
GGT is a protein made throughout the body. But it is especially
concentrated in the liver. It is a unique marker in that it is one of the few
tests that can offer a hint of oxidative stress, one of the three key processes
underlying Bad Energy, which is notoriously hard to test for directly.
Because GGT’s role is to metabolize the protein glutathione, a key
antioxidant our bodies make that neutralizes free radicals, levels will
increase in the face of more oxidative burden and glutathione activity.
Given the relationship between oxidative stress and metabolic dysfunction,
high GGT is significantly associated with increased risk of type 2 diabetes,
cardiovascular disease, cancer, liver disease, and premature death.
The liver could not be more important to our overall metabolism and our
ability to make Good Energy. It is the first site of nutrient delivery from the
intestines after we eat and it determines how the body will process and use
energy. The liver is a master balancer of blood sugar levels by having the
skills to break down glucose, store glucose, and make glucose from other
substrates, like fat. It creates bile to help break down food in the gut, so we

can absorb critical micro- and macronutrients necessary for metabolism and
mitochondrial function. It packages and exports fats and cholesterol to other
parts of the body for storage or use. It also receives fats and cholesterol
from the bloodstream to process them. As we’ve learned, when the liver
becomes overburdened and damaged, it will store fat inside its cells,
creating fatty liver disease—a toxic and preventable process now affecting
close to 50 percent of U.S. adults. Modern life is decimating this key
metabolic organ.
Interestingly, when insulin is released from the pancreas, it doesn’t
immediately enter the general circulation. It goes straight to the liver
through a special vein: the portal vein. So if the liver becomes insulin
resistant, the pancreas receives direct feedback to make more insulin,
generating damaging hyperinsulinemia and the vicious cycle of Bad Energy.
I cannot overstate how much we want a pristine, healthy, optimally
functioning liver for all aspects of health. The strategies in the next chapters
will help you achieve that. You may have never thought about how your
liver health can directly contribute to heart disease, Alzheimer’s, PMS,
erectile dysfunction, or infertility, but it can. The liver is a master
orchestrator of metabolism, hormone processing, detoxification, digestion,
and cellular energy production across the whole body.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: the Mayo Clinic states
that normal ALT is 7 to 55 U/L, AST is 8 to 48 U/L, and GGT is 8 to 61
U/L.
Optimal range: Research suggests that all-cause mortality starkly
increases when AST and ALT levels rise above about 17 U/L. For GGT,
lowest risk for men is about <25 U/L and women <14 to 20 U/L. Some
sources recommend <8 U/L. Sources vary, but these are good targets to
aim for.

Vitamin D

Vitamin D is a hormone made when we expose our skin to sunlight.
Vitamin D serves dozens of critical biological functions related to calcium
and phosphate levels, insulin secretion, immune function and cytokine
regulation, cell death, and vascular growth pathways, among others.
Many proteins made inside cells get released into circulation to act
elsewhere in the body. These proteins include insulin, neurotransmitters,
inflammatory cytokines, antibodies, and others. They require calcium as an
activating signal for their release, and vitamin D highly regulates calcium
levels.
Healthy vitamin D levels not only improve insulin sensitivity but also
improve the function of the pancreatic cells that make insulin. Vitamin D
also manages the healthy regulation of the immune system, while low
vitamin D levels can stimulate the master inflammatory gene NF-ϰB,
increase pro-inflammatory cytokine levels, and cause the overproduction of
immune cells. Simply put, low vitamin D signals a chronic “pro-threat” to
the body, which we’ve learned is antithetical to Good Energy. Various
aspects of the pro-inflammatory state can directly impair insulin signaling
and reduce glucose channel expression in the cell. Vitamin D
supplementation has been shown to decrease fasting glucose levels and
decrease the incidence of type 2 diabetes.
RANGES:

Range considered “normal” by standard criteria: the NIH recommends
levels from 20 to 50 ng/mL.
Optimal range: research suggests that vitamin D levels from 40 to 60
ng/mL are associated with the lowest all-cause mortality. Vitamin D
toxicity is generally not observed until levels are much higher.

GOING FURTHER
There are deeper layers of lab testing that can give you an even more
nuanced picture. Options include looking at expanded cholesterol panels,
thyroid hormones, sex hormones, kidney function, and micronutrient levels.

At my functional medicine clinic, I often tested over one hundred
biomarkers in patients. To receive full blood work to target where Bad
Energy is brewing in your body and a specific plan of how to reverse it, I
recommend searching the functional medicine doctor database
(https://www.ifm.org/find-a-practitioner/) or utilizing Function Health (a
telehealth service that tests over one hundred biomarkers from all body
systems for a very affordable price, with detailed interpretations and
optimal ranges for each test).

What About Total Cholesterol and Low-Density Lipoprotein Cholesterol (LDL-C)?
On a standard cholesterol panel, you’ll see Total Cholesterol and LDL-C as part of
your results. While these are given a lot of weight in the health care conversation,
they are nuanced to interpret. Below is a primer on Total Cholesterol and LDL-C
from Dr. Robert Lustig, professor emeritus of endocrinology at the University of
California, San Francisco, as paraphrased from his book Metabolical:
When you get a total cholesterol result, throw it in the garbage. It means
absolutely nothing. Anyone who tells you that “my cholesterol level is high”
doesn’t know what they are talking about. You need to know what kind of
cholesterol you’re talking about. . . .
LDL-C has a checkered history. There is no doubt that LDL-C levels correlate
with heart disease risk in large populations, and you do need to know your LDLC. But, the medical profession places way too much significance on this test,
and they do that because we have a drug for it. . . . The hazard risk for high
LDL-C and heart disease is 1.3 (high LDL-C leads to 30 percent higher risk of
having a heart attack in your lifetime), but there is something that is much more
concerning: high triglycerides. High triglyceride levels confer a hazard risk of 1.8
for heart attack.
The takeaway of the Framingham Heart Study was that if you had very high
LDL-C, you were more likely to suffer a heart attack. But when the data were
analyzed, unless LDL-C was very high (over 200 mg/dL), it wasn’t a risk factor.
Those with an LDL-C less than 70 mg/dL develop relatively little heart disease.
But for the rest of the population, LDL-C is not a great predictor of who will suffer
a heart attack. More people are suffering heart attacks with lower LDL-Cs than
before, because the standard test of cholesterol assumes all the LDL-C particles
are the same.
There are two different types of LDL-Cs, but the lipid profile test measures
them together. The majority (80 percent) of circulating LDL-C species are called
large buoyant, or type A LDL-C, which are increased by dietary fat consumption.

This is the species reduced by eating low-fat or taking statins. However, large
buoyant LDL-C are cardiovascularly neutral—meaning it’s not the particle
driving the accumulation of plaque in the arteries leading to heart disease.
There’s a second, less common (only 20 percent) LDL-C species called small
dense LDL-C (sdLDL-C) or type B LDL-C, and it is predictive of risk for heart
attack. The problem is that statins will lower your LDL-C because they are
lowering the type A LDL-C, which is 80 percent of the total; but they’re not doing
anything to the type B LDL-C, which is the problematic particle.
If you have a high LDL-C level, your provider is likely to tell you to eat a lowfat diet. Similar to statins, while your LDL will go down, it’s only affecting the
large buoyant LDL and not the small dense LDL, which is the actual problem.
Small dense LDL rise because they are responsive to dietary refined
carbohydrates (i.e., fiberless food) and especially sugar consumption.
According to Dr. Mark Hyman, “more than 50 percent of people who show up in
the emergency room with heart attacks have normal cholesterol. But they have
small cholesterol particles (sdLDL-C), which are caused by insulin resistance. What
causes these small dangerous cholesterol particles? It is the sugar and refined
carbohydrates in our diet. Insulin resistance causes these small cholesterol
particles to form, and taking statins won’t fix the problem.”
To better understand your level of disease-promoting cholesterol, ask your
doctor for an NMR Lipoprotein Fractionation test, which tells you about your
amounts of type A and type B LDL-C, and also may report oxidized LDL (oxLDL), a
marker of LDL-C particles damaged by oxidation and prone to stoke inflammation.
An additional test that may be more useful than LDL-C to understand the total
amount of disease-causing cholesterol particles in the body is apolipoprotein B-100
(ApoB). ApoB is the protein that wraps around specific cholesterol particles to help
them dissolve in the blood, and uniquely, it is present on the forms of cholesterol
particles in the blood that are known to be atherogenic, or promote blocked vessels
and causative of heart disease. These include several interrelated cholesterol
particles, including LDL-C, very-low-density lipoprotein (VLDL-C), intermediatedensity lipoprotein (IDL-C), and lipoprotein(a)—also called Lp(a). Because ApoB
measures the total number of disease-promoting cholesterol particles in the blood,
it may be a more accurate marker of heart disease risk than LDL-C alone. This is
not a test that is ordered in standard practice and must be requested or ordered
through a specialty service, like Function Health, and optimal ranges have not been
established.

Ranges (LDL-C):
Range considered “normal” by standard criteria (from Cleveland Clinic):
Less than 70 mg/dL for those with heart or blood vessel disease and
for other patients at very high risk of heart disease (those with
metabolic syndrome)

Less than 100 mg/dL for high-risk patients (for example, some
patients who have diabetes or multiple heart disease risk factors)
Less than 130 mg/dL otherwise
Optimal range: According to Dr. Robert Lustig in his book Metabolical, “If LDL-C
is below 100 mg/dL, the small dense fraction can’t be high enough to be
harmful. If it’s over 300 mg/dL, you might have the rare genetic disease familial
hypercholesterolemia (FH) and you can’t clear LDL-C, and you need a statin. If
it’s between 100 and 300 mg/dL, then you need to look at the triglyceride level.
If the triglyceride level is above 150 mg/dL, that’s metabolic syndrome until
proven otherwise.”
Also look at the LDL-C value in the context of triglyceride-to-HDL ratio, as this
ratio is a helpful biomarker for risk of cardiovascular disease and the presence of
insulin resistance.

REAL-TIME TOOLS
Levels cofounder Josh Clemente is an aerospace engineer who developed
life support systems for SpaceX before conceiving of and starting Levels.
He observed that when we build rockets, we put over ten thousand sensors
on them to understand the functioning of all parts of the spacecraft and to
enable prediction of mechanical dysfunction and systems failure before it
happens. You really don’t want a rocket to break down in the middle of
space. Yet with human health, we adhere to an opposite paradigm: we wait
for the human body to develop fulminant systems failure, which shows up
as symptoms and meeting diagnostic thresholds for disease-specific
biomarkers. And only then do we recommend sensors or more frequent
testing to address the problems. Almost the entirety of what is plaguing U.S.
adults today is largely preventable chronic illnesses. What if we treated
humans like rockets, equipping them with sensors before systems fail, to
understand where dysfunction is arising so we can address it?
If you notice on your wearable device that your resting heart rate is
slowly rising and has bumped from 55 bpm (beats per minute) to over 70
bpm over a few months, you need to dig into why. Have you been more
sedentary? If you notice on a CGM that your waking glucose is slowly
creeping up from about 75 mg/dL to 90 mg/dL, you need to address what

might be causing it before it gets worse: Is it the ultra-processed foods?
Recent work stress? Too little sleep? We’re just beginning to be able to
answer these questions for ourselves. But this ability will change health
care forever, transforming it from a reactive sick care system to a true
health empowerment system.
The following are the most impactful real-time biomarkers you can
measure today to make actionable decisions.
Continuous Glucose Monitoring

I believe CGM is the most powerful technology for generating the data and
awareness to rectify our Bad Energy crisis in the Western world. A CGM is
a biosensor that can alert us to early dysfunction, coach us on how to eat
and live in a way that promotes Good Energy in our unique bodies, and
promote accountability. My belief in the potential of this technology to
reduce global metabolic suffering is why I cofounded Levels, which enables
access to CGMs and software to understand and interpret the data.
A CGM is a small plastic disc worn on the arm that automatically tests
your blood sugar roughly every ten minutes, twenty-four hours a day. And it
sends that information to your smartphone. As opposed to just having a
single yearly snapshot of glucose—like a fasting glucose test in a lab—a
continuous glucose monitor tells you exactly how your body is responding
in real time to every action you take, like eating breakfast, exercising,
walking, getting a poor night’s sleep, or experiencing stress. These factors
can change glucose levels almost immediately. In working to prevent the
metabolic issues that 93.2 percent of people in the United States are facing,
rather than just one data point, I’d rather have up to 35,040 painless data
points per year to drive personalized decision-making.
Wearing a CGM as part of a journey to understand and optimize health
provides seven main benefits:
1. Improve Glycemic Variability: Glucose levels should be generally stable and
rise only slightly after meals. High variability in glucose levels can

damage tissues and lead to heart disease, diabetes, and metabolic
dysfunction. A study from Stanford found that even among people
considered healthy by standard glucose ranges, 25 percent of them
showed severe glucose variability based on CGM data, and the
percentage of time spent in severe variability patterns correlated with
worse metabolic markers.
2. Reduce Cravings and Anxiety: High glucose spikes lead to bigger glucose
crashes, which can lead to cravings, fatigue, and anxiety. Recent CGM
research showed that glucose dips—or reactive hypoglycemia—after
meals can predict how hungry people would be later in the day, how
soon they would eat again, and how much they would eat at the next
meal. And bigger crashes led to eating more calories in a twenty-fourhour period. CGMs can teach you how to avoid reactive hypoglycemia
by keeping blood sugar more stable and avoiding sharp spikes.
3. Learn Your Reaction to Individual Foods and Meals: Different individuals
respond differently to the same food (in terms of blood sugar rise),
depending on factors such as microbiome composition, sleep, recent
meals, and body type. Simply reading carb content or looking at a
food’s glycemic index is not sufficient to help you find a diet and
lifestyle that allows you to maintain stable glucose. Chronic
overnutrition is a key cause of Bad Energy that overwhelms our cells
and causes oxidative stress, inflammation, mitochondrial dysfunction,
glycation, and insulin resistance. CGMs can be useful in showing you
the exact impact of a meal on your blood glucose levels. An extra-large
spike after a meal is a clear sign that the meal had too much refined
grain or refined sugar and is creating a big stress of food energy for
your cells to deal with.
4. Learn to Use Strategies to Stabilize Glucose: Balancing meals with enough
fiber, protein, and fat; eating meals earlier in the day and avoiding latenight meals; walking after meals; and not eating while stressed are
some strategies that can help keep glucose stable. A CGM can help you
experiment with different stabilizing strategies.

5. Train the Body to Be Metabolically Flexible: Burning fat produces ketones,
which have health benefits. But if the body is constantly getting fed
glucose—the body’s preferential source of food energy to convert to
ATP—it’s not going to prioritize burning fat. By learning to keep blood
sugar levels low and healthy through diet and lifestyle, we increase the
opportunity for our body to tap into fat stores for energy, which
improves metabolic flexibility (an indicator of better health).
6. Catch Metabolic Dysfunction Earlier: Fasting glucose can remain low despite
increasing insulin resistance as the body pumps out excess insulin to
overcompensate for an insulin block. By viewing a continuous glucose
curve on CGM, we can see more subtle clues indicating early
dysfunction, like how high our post-meal glucose levels are and how
long glucose spikes take to come down to normal.
7. Motivate Behavior Change: Seeing real-time glucose data and the impact of
meals and activities on glucose levels can motivate behavior change
and encourage healthier choices, which can lead to better overall health
outcomes.
What data can a continuous glucose monitor tell you?
1. Morning Glucose: After a poor night’s sleep or a late-night dessert,
morning glucose can be elevated. Ideally, morning glucose should be
70 to 85 mg/dL, the level associated with a lower risk of future
cardiometabolic disease.
2. Dawn Effect: This refers to a rise in glucose driven by the growth
hormone and cortisol release that happens naturally before we wake up.
As people become more insulin resistant, they tend to have a larger
magnitude of this effect. Their body becomes less efficient at clearing
the morning glucose rise. Research has found that only 8.9 percent of
people without diabetes have a dawn effect, while it is present in 30
percent of people with prediabetes and 52 percent of people with new
type 2 diabetes. Presence of the dawn effect is indicative of poor
glucose control in people with diabetes. Definitions of the dawn effect

vary, but this study defined it as a 20 mg/dL rise. If you note a
pronounced dawn effect, you could have brewing insulin resistance.
3. Post-Meal Glucose (Postprandial Glucose): Immense learning comes from
understanding how different foods, meals, and ingredient combinations
affect your blood sugar in the one to two hours after you eat. Post-meal
spikes are a contributor to glycemic variability. We want to minimize
spikes because they are associated with worse health outcomes. Aiming
for a post-meal glucose level of less than 115 mg/dL, with not more
than a 30 mg/dL increase from premeal levels, is likely more optimal
than standard ranges (which recommend keeping blood sugar below
140 mg/dL). This lower post-meal goal also correlates with the average
peak postprandial glucose levels seen in healthy populations wearing
CGMs and is supported by extensive expert opinion. In your first week
of using a CGM, I recommend eating your normal diet to get a baseline
and note any interesting observations. For instance, you might realize
that when you eat eggs, avocado, and an orange for breakfast, you have
a much lower spike than when you eat breakfast cereal and skim milk
or a doughnut and latte. In this case, the protein and fat from eggs and
avocado likely offset the glucose impact from the orange. In contrast,
cereal and pastries tend to be high in quickly absorbed refined carbs.
4. Area Under the Curve (AUC): AUC reflects both the height of the spike and
how long the glucose stays elevated after a meal. Generally, people
with normal glucose tolerance should return to baseline glucose levels
within one to two hours after a meal, while those with prediabetes or
type 2 diabetes may see their glucose stay elevated for longer.
5. Reactive Hypoglycemia: These post-meal crashes are usually the result of
your blood sugar spiking and then crashing below normal levels after a
meal. If you find that your blood sugars are going high and then
dropping below their baseline, try balancing future meals better by
doing the following:
Reduce any refined grains and sugars.
Pair carbs with more fiber, protein, and healthy fat sources.

6. Impact of Stress on Glucose: One of my highest glucose spikes ever was
after an argument with my brother (my coauthor!). We hear examples
of this all the time from Levels members: stress alone can raise glucose
levels, regardless of your diet. The reason is that a key stress hormone,
cortisol, signals our liver to break down stored glucose and release it
into the bloodstream to fuel the muscles, anticipating a threat that we’ll
need energy to physically move away from. In the modern world,
however, the “threats”—like arguments, emails, honking, and the alerts
on our phones—that cue our stress pathways rarely require our muscles
to be active. As such, that mobilized glucose sits in our bloodstream,
causing more harm than good. CGM can be a powerful tool in teaching
us how stress impacts our metabolic health and motivates us to address
acute stress in healthy ways, like deep breathing.
7. Impact of Exercise on Glucose: CGMs are a powerful feedback tool on how
exercise impacts your metabolic health. For instance, you might learn
and internalize that a ten-minute walk or thirty squats right after a meal
significantly lowers your post-meal glucose rise. Similarly, you might
notice that after two to three months of consistent daily movement, all
your CGM metrics are improving.
8. Impact of Sleep on Glucose Levels: Just one night of reducing sleep to four
hours can plummet insulin sensitivity by 25 percent in healthy people.
What’s more, poor sleep efficiency (meaning the time awake tossing
and turning as a percentage of the whole night’s sleep), later bedtimes,
and deviating from one’s usual sleep pattern all lead to higher glucose
responses to breakfast the next morning. CGM can offer subtle clues
about how sleep is affecting your body’s ability to clear glucose from
the bloodstream. Almost nothing has motivated me to prioritize sleep
quality, quantity, and consistency more than CGM biofeedback. Seeing
how skimping on sleep hurts you in real time is incredibly valuable.
9. Glucose During Sleep: Late-night high-carbohydrate meals can cause high
variability through the night because of our relative insulin resistance
when melatonin levels are high (more on this in Chapter 7). And during
REM sleep, glucose levels can naturally drop. Add late-night alcohol

into the equation, and this can lead to lower glucose levels by blocking
the liver’s ability to synthesize and produce glucose (something the
liver does in the background to make sure blood levels don’t drop too
low). Simply put, glucose during sleep can be all over the place, and
knowing this can help you troubleshoot sleep problems that may be
related to glucose patterns.
10. Average Glucose: Your twenty-four-hour mean or average glucose level is
not a standard metric used in medical practice, but given the increasing
use of CGM, I anticipate it will likely become more recognized.
Average glucose takes into account fasting glucose, nighttime glucose,
and magnitude of glycemic variability and can be a crude measurement
of how much glucose your bloodstream is exposed to every day. In a
study of a young, healthy population, mean glucose was 89 mg/dL with
a standard deviation of 6.2 mg/dL.
11. Long-term Trends in Glucose: If you wear a CGM always or just a few
times a year, you can view long-term trends in glucose that can help
you see the trajectory of your metabolic health. One thing you can be
certain of: if you are able to track your blood sugar and keep it in a low
and healthy range over the course of your lifetime, you will never have
to walk into the doctor’s office and get a bomb dropped on you about a
diagnosis of type 2 diabetes, which develops gradually over years and
decades. You will know exactly where you stand, and that is powerful.
Food Journaling

To understand your body, you must know what is going into it. A food
journal is a powerful tool for accountability, making sure that you are
getting in what you need to optimize Good Energy, and keeping out what
hurts these processes. In my practice, I will not see new patients unless they
agree to temporarily keep a food journal. I can’t counsel them if I don’t
know what two to three pounds of molecular information are going into
their bodies every day. (Imagine a patient taking two to three pounds of
medications every day but not telling the doctor what they’re taking.)

What’s more, research has shown that people on diets who keep food
journals lose twice as much weight as those who don’t. A Kaiser
Permanente study, involving 1,685 patients, looked at the efficacy of a
twenty-week weight-loss program. The number of food records the
participants kept per week was one of the key statistically significant
variables predicting weight loss. We have seen similar preliminary
correlations in the Levels dataset: Levels members who input more food
logs have a more significant reduction in body mass index while using
CGM.
Several food-logging apps can be helpful, including MacroFactor,
MyFitnessPal, and logging within a continuous glucose monitoring app like
Thea. But just as effective might be using a paper journal or a note in your
phone. Every Saturday I review my food logs from the week with my
nutrition coach to understand where I was on track and where I could have
made healthier choices.
Sleep Data

As we’ll learn in Chapter 7, all-cause mortality and risk of type 2 diabetes
are higher in both people who get too little sleep (less than seven hours) and
those who get too much sleep (more than nine hours) per night.
Use a wearable sleep and step tracker (examples are listed on this page)
to understand your average quantity of sleep per night, with the goal of
aiming for about seven to eight hours. Note which days—if any—tend to be
outliers for you. Then reflect on why. Research has shown that people
significantly overestimate the amount they sleep when their self-reports are
compared to their wearable sleep data. Research shows that people who are
actually sleeping five hours per night overestimate their sleep by eighty
minutes on average. Imagine that: you think you are getting close to seven
hours of sleep per night (optimal), when you are actually sleeping an
amount that puts you at a high risk for a range of metabolic issues.
Wearables can help us really see where we’re falling short on critical health
behaviors like sleep.

To get maximal benefits, use your sleep tracker to assess quality of sleep
as well, including how many awakenings you experience per night and how
much deep and restorative sleep you get. Actionable, evidence-based steps
can help you improve sleep quality, like minimizing alcohol and reducing
blue light before bedtime. Understanding your patterns can uncover specific
—and simple—areas to focus on to improve Good Energy. Sleep
consistency—the regularity of your sleep and wake times—is the third
pillar of sleep to track with a wearable. Having a set sleep schedule is a key
factor in optimal health.
Activity Data

Movement is one of the best things you can do to improve mitochondrial
health and churn through excess food energy substrates. Step count is a
great proxy metric to show you how much you’re moving. Certainly, steps
aren’t the only form of exercise that’s important, but we do know that lowgrade activity that occurs more frequently and regularly throughout the day
is extremely important for cellular health and glucose control, even more so
than chunking all your physical activity in one discrete block and sitting for
the rest of the day (a pattern most Americans adopt).
I’ll explain the science of the Good Energy benefits of movement in
Chapter 8. But a preview of why it’s so important is that exercise stimulates
glucose channels to come from inside the cell to the cell membrane to allow
glucose to travel from the bloodstream into the cell to be processed for
energy for the muscle. Exercise also increases mitochondrial function,
mitochondrial quantity, and antioxidant proteins in the mitochondria to
protect it from oxidative stress. More movement means we have an
increased quantity and quality of high-resiliency energy-producing
machines in our cells to work through all our energy substrates, reducing
the likelihood that the foods we consume will end up shunted to toxic
intracellular fat that leads to insulin resistance.
Use a wearable step and sleep tracker (examples listed on this page) to
understand your average steps per day, with a goal of getting a bare

minimum of 7,000 steps per day, and ultimately working up to 10,000 steps
per day. Researchers are still debating whether step count matters. I hope to
put this debate to rest.
In a study of 2,110 adults followed for almost eleven years, published in
the premier medical journal JAMA, adults who got at least 7,000 steps per
day had a 50 to 70 percent lower risk of dying during the follow-up period
than those getting fewer than 7,000 steps per day. Other studies have shown
similar findings: data from 6,355 men and women followed for an average
of ten years showed that those who walked 8,000 to 12,000 steps per day
had a 50 to 65 percent lower risk of death than those who took fewer than
4,000 steps per day.
Aside from step count, you also want to understand the number of your
active hours per day, meaning hours where you were up and moving more
than about 250 steps. If you sit all day but get 10,000 steps over the course
of one hour by going for a run, that’s less health promoting than if you
space out those steps over every hour of the day (more on this in Chapter
8). Wearables can help alert you to times of the day when you tend to be
more sedentary and ping you to get up.
Research shows large discrepancies between how much we think we’re
moving and how much we are. For instance, in a study of 215 participants,
the self-reported amount of moderate to vigorous physical activity was 160
minutes per week, while wearable data over the same period showed that
these people were actually performing moderate to vigorous physical
activity only 24 minutes per week. Wearable data provides us clarity about
how much we really are moving.
Number of Cardiovascular Minutes per Day and Week

Research strongly suggests that a minimum of 150 minutes of moderate
aerobic activity per week is crucial for cardiometabolic health (and is as
effective as antidepressant medication for mood), which translates into
about 30 minutes, five days a week. Wearables that track heart rate can help
you know if you are getting this amount per week.

Heart Rate Variability (HRV)

Heart rate variability is a metric that indicates how much variability in time
there is between each heartbeat. HRV is a biomarker that can help us
understand the trends in our stress and strain levels, which we know impact
our cells’ ability to produce energy effectively. Counterintuitively, more
variability in the time between each heartbeat is indicative of better health
status and outcomes. Under times of more stress and strain on the body, the
cardiovascular system will act like a metronome with regularity in the time
between each heartbeat. In a more relaxed, rested, and recovery state, the
whole system is more “elastic” and the time between each heartbeat will
vary slightly. For instance, one beat might be 859 milliseconds, the next 763
milliseconds, the next 793 milliseconds, and so forth. So if your heart rate is
60 beats per minute, it doesn’t mean that each beat is exactly one second; in
fact, it’s better if they’re not.
A high HRV reflects the ability of the nervous system to adapt
effectively, and low HRV can indicate strain, fatigue, overtraining, or
chronic disease. Low HRV has been associated with physical inactivity,
immune dysfunction, high blood pressure, diabetes, cardiovascular disease,
depression, decreased social engagement, decreased psychological
resilience in the face of stressors, decreased cancer survival, and infertility,
among many other conditions that we learned are related to Bad Energy in
Chapter 2. What’s more, a drop in HRV can predict the onset of COVID-19
before PCR testing is positive.
The interrelationship between HRV and how our cells make energy is
complex, multidirectional, and not fully understood, but this is how I see it:
Cells that are subjected to the daily insults that result in Bad Energy
(chronic overnutrition, sleep deprivation, chronic psychological or excess
physical stress without time to recover, toxins, etc.) will send out distress
signals and can activate the “stress” arm of the autonomic nervous system,
which is the sympathetic nervous system. All of these insults indicate that
the body is under threat and needs to be at the ready to “fight” the battle,
even when there isn’t one. When Bad Energy manifests in our body and we
develop insulin resistance, we know that it can reduce nitric oxide activity

and decrease the ability of the vascular system to dilate and adapt, which
will exacerbate a cycle of having a rigid vascular system and low HRV.
Nitric oxide also directly stimulates the relaxation arm of the nervous
system, which is the parasympathetic nervous system, and specifically the
vagus nerve (which regulates relaxation). Ideally, we want a balance
between the two arms of the autonomic nervous system, with the ability to
gear up when there is a threat and the ability to relax in times of safety. Low
HRV indicates that the gas pedal of stress and strain is too high, and the
body—particularly the vascular system—cannot relax.
You can monitor HRV via a wearable device and see trends over time.
HRV is very individual and lacks a universal optimal range. You might
naturally be a lot lower or higher than the people around you. What matters
most is determining what lifestyle factors seem to bump or crash your
personal HRV levels compared to your baseline, so you can make lifestyle
adjustments to raise HRV. Whoop, an innovative wearable that tracks HRV,
fitness, and sleep, has discovered that several factors are associated with
increasing HRV over time:
Giving the body time to recover after intense athletic training.
Staying hydrated.
Avoiding alcohol: just one night of drinking can decrease HRV for up
to five days.
Getting consistent and adequate quality sleep.
Maintaining a consistent eating schedule.
Eating a healthy diet.
Avoiding eating within three to four hours of bedtime.
Getting cold exposure: exposing the body to cold temperatures for brief
periods of time (like cold showers and ice baths) stimulates the
parasympathetic nervous system.
Writing in a gratitude journal. This also impacts HRV. Focusing on
abundance and thankfulness is a calming signal to the body.

Resting Heart Rate

Resting heart rate is the number of times the heart beats per minute when a
person is at rest. It is considered an essential metric to evaluate overall
health and fitness. A lower resting heart rate indicates that the heart is
efficiently pumping blood and is less stressed. Research has shown that
having a lower resting heart rate can improve overall life span and
metabolic health. A higher resting heart rate is associated with an increased
risk of heart disease, type 2 diabetes, and all-cause mortality. Studies also
suggest that resting heart rate can be lowered by consistent exercise.
Someone with a resting heart rate of more than 80 bpm (considered in the
middle of the “normal” range of 60 to 100 bpm by Harvard, Mayo Clinic,
and the American Heart Association) has a 2.91 times higher risk of having
type 2 diabetes than someone with a heart rate of less than 60 bpm. In a
meta-analysis of over one million people, all-cause mortality and
cardiovascular mortality increased linearly and significantly for any resting
heart rate above 45 bpm.

THE REPLACEMENT OF THE DOCTOR’S OFFICE
We are entering the era of bio-observability: more readily available blood
tests and real-time sensors filtered through AI analysis to give us a highly
personalized understanding of our bodies and a personalized plan to meet
each body’s needs with daily choices. This can’t be crystallized in a fifteenminute doctor’s visit. We should all welcome more technology in the
interpretation of our biomarkers.
Now that we know how to measure Good Energy, let’s jump into the
specific mindset shifts and steps we can take to optimize it.

Recap: Recommended Ranges
Below are recommended optimal ranges for key metabolic blood tests. Falling
outside of these ranges is an indicator that you could have brewing dysfunction.
The remainder of Part 2 and the plan in Part 3 will give specific steps to increase
Good Energy and improve these biomarkers:

Triglycerides:
Less than 80 mg/dL
HDL:
50 to 90 mg/dL
Fasting Glucose:
70 to 85 mg/dL
Blood Pressure:
Less than 120 systolic and less than 80 diastolic mmHg
Waist Circumference:
<80 cm (31.5 inches) for women and <90 cm (35 inches) for men
(South Asian, Chinese, Japanese, and South and Central Americans)
<80 cm (31.5 inches) for women and <94 cm (37 inches) for men
(European, Sub-Saharan African, Middle Eastern, and Eastern
Mediterranean)
Triglyceride-to-HDL Ratio:
Below 1.5. Above 3 is a clear sign of metabolic dysfunction.
Fasting Insulin:
From 2 to 5 mIU/L. Above 10 mIU/L is concerning and above 15
mIU/L is significantly elevated.
HOMA-IR:
Less than 2.0
High-Sensitivity CRP (hsCRP):
Less than 0.3 mg/dL
Hemoglobin A1c:
From 5.0 to 5.4 percent
Uric Acid:
Less than 5 mg/dL for men, and from 2 to 4 mg/dL for women
Liver Enzymes: aspartate transaminase (AST), alanine transaminase (ALT),
and gamma-glutamyl transferase (GGT)
AST and ALT levels of 17 U/L or less. For GGT, lowest risk for men is
less than 25 U/L and women from 14 to 20 U/L. Sources vary slightly,
but these are good targets to aim for.
Vitamin D
40 to 60 ng/mL
Recommended real-time metrics to track:
Glucose (continuous glucose monitor)
Food (food journal or app)
Sleep (quantity, quality, consistency)
Activity (steps, number of active minutes per day and week with
elevated heart rate)
Resting heart rate and heart rate variability

To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

5

The Six Principles of Good Energy Eating

“Let me talk to your fucking manager,” one patient screamed at me during
my fourth year of residency. He was irate that I wouldn’t prescribe him a
refill of opioid pain medication, despite the fact that several weeks had
passed since his surgery. He was well-versed that patient satisfaction
surveys dictated physician performance ratings. These tools also determined
physician compensation—even though patient satisfaction is often at odds
with patient well-being. On several occasions, patients called the clinic
repeatedly and threatened to leave bad reviews if I did not write an opioid
prescription.
How weak that someone can be so blinded by their addiction to make
them act like this, I used to think. But then I learned that most opioid
addictions result from a legal prescription and often overdose deaths occur
when addicts are forced to buy drugs off the street loaded with unknown
poison. About eighty thousand people died of opioid overdoses in the
United States in 2022, many of whom started taking opioids by getting their
prescription from a doctor.
We have another, more hidden addiction crisis, in which highly
addictive substances are being pushed on every person in the United States
from birth, and these substances are causing well over one million deaths
per year. These substances are ultra-processed foods.
The NIH defines addiction as “a chronic, relapsing disorder
characterized by compulsive drug seeking and use despite adverse

consequences,” which is obviously what is happening when it comes to
modern industrial food. We have no other way to explain how people in the
nation are going against their evolutionary impulses to such a systematic
degree—which is exactly what’s happening when 30 percent of teenagers
have prediabetes and nearly 80 percent of adults are overweight or obese.
We have a compulsive collective food addiction. We are eating ourselves to
death.
The solution to this crisis is very simple—promote unprocessed whole
foods and discourage ultra-processed industrial foods. Yet we are in a state
of confusion about what the right diet is—about 59 percent of people report
that conflicting information about nutrition makes them doubt their choices.
Organic, plant-based, natural, non-GMO, fair trade, sustainable, crueltyfree, hormone-free, regenerative, gluten-free, free-range, pasture-raised,
conventional—we have innumerable terms we need to sort through when
selecting food.
We need to stop falling into traps of dietary philosophies and start
breaking food into its individual parts and analyzing whether those parts are
good or bad for our cells. Food is nothing more than a set of molecular
components, and whether those components meet our cells’ needs largely
determines health. When we see someone who is addicted to opioids or
alcohol, it is easy to identify the cause of the problem. But when it comes to
food, we have trouble analyzing individual components that are helping our
cells or harming them, because we don’t think of food in this framework of
molecular components.
Let’s take an extreme, simple example:
A glass of water is good and will help hydrate you.
A glass of water mixed with arsenic is bad and will kill you.
In the example above, we can easily see the water with arsenic as two
separate parts, one that can help (water) and one that will kill you (arsenic).
But we don’t think about this when it comes to most food. Let’s take a less

obvious case of a “burger,” which could be made from several different
things despite looking the same:
Beef from a cow raised on an industrial farm in a concentrated animal
feeding operation (CAFO), eating an all-grain diet
Beef from a cow raised outside, free to roam in a pasture, eating
exclusively pesticide-free grass
Beef alternatives, like Beyond Burger or Impossible Burger
The molecular makeups of these three versions of burgers are highly
different. A cow has evolved over millennia eating grass, which delivers
anti-inflammatory omega-3 fatty acids to its body. Grain-fed beef contains
five times fewer omega-3 fats and significantly more inflammatory omega-6
fats than grass-fed beef. In terms of micronutrient content, grass-fed beef is
generally higher in vitamin A, vitamin E, and beta-carotene, which are all
critical for maintaining metabolic and immune function.
The two main ingredients of Beyond Burger are pea protein and canola
oil. Canola oil is high in omega-6 fats, making Beyond Burger more
inflammatory than grass-fed beef. Additional ingredients include natural
flavors (a misnomer, as natural flavors can be highly processed and contain
chemical additives) and methylcellulose, a main ingredient in laxatives
manufactured by heating wood in acidic solutions to extract and purify
cellulose. Clearly, these three different versions of burger deliver vastly
different molecular information to the cells.
Food empowerment involves seeing beyond the labels of food and into
how the parts build functional cellular health. For instance, you could see
broccoli as simply a green veggie. Or you could see it more accurately as an
ecosystem of molecular components that can support many of the hallmarks
of Good Energy by quelling oxidative stress, chronic inflammation, and
mitochondrial dysfunction. The high fiber content of broccoli feeds your gut
bacteria and lining, minimizing leaky gut and chronic inflammation and
helping to produce mitochondria-optimizing chemicals like short-chain

fatty acids (SCFAs). Its vitamin C protects your mitochondria from
oxidative stress. Vitamin K decreases mitochondrial dysfunction by serving
as a mitochondrial electron carrier. And folate serves as a lock-and-key
cofactor in the mitochondrial proteins that generate ATP. Broccoli also
contains numerous antioxidants that protect your cells from oxidative
damage. All these substances turn the knobs on the key processes of Good
Energy. You don’t need to know all these scientific terms, but it is vital to
start thinking of food as molecular information that dictates our day-to-day
and long-term function, and Chapter 6 will get into the details.
Here is a hopeful message: daily, we make hundreds of micro-decisions
about food that can change our genetic and physiologic “fate.”
Like any doctor, I would end appointments by giving patients vague
dietary advice such as “eat more fruits and veggies” and then writing a
pharmaceutical prescription. But in training, doctors are told that nutrition
is a soft topic that “isn’t evidence based.” You will rarely find specific
nutrition recommendations in the official treatment guidelines for any given
condition; for example, within the hundreds of cumulative pages of
guidelines for migraine, sinusitis, COVID-19, and prostate cancer
treatment, you won’t find a single mention of specific dietary patterns to
adopt, despite hundreds of scientific papers showing benefits of dietary
interventions for these conditions. Interventions like prescribing a pill or
performing surgery are seen as “heroic,” while nutritional interventions are
seen as fuzzy and wimpy. We ignore that natural foods have over five
thousand known phytochemicals alone—each of which is a small molecule
that impacts health: the definition of medicine.
The pounds of molecular information we put into our bodies daily
impact our health. Every thought you have and feeling you feel comes from
food. Inside your mother’s body, you were 3D printed out of food, and
every item you ingest continues to print the next iteration of yourself.
Bodies, neurotransmitters, hormones, nerves, and mitochondria are all
made, exclusively and necessarily, from what you (or your mom) put in
your (or their) mouth; we don’t arise from thin air, we arise from food.

So often, doctors and patients are taught that genes are our destiny—but
that’s not true. Our genes don’t determine most health outcomes. What we
eat and how we live impact our gene expression and cellular biology,
determining our outcomes. Food chemicals go into your body and act as
signaling molecules. They can directly increase or decrease gene
expression, change DNA folding, and activate key cell-signaling pathways,
like those controlling whether your cells produce Good Energy.
What we put into our bodies is the most critical decision for our health
and happiness. To learn why food is our most potent weapon against
chronic disease, I had to learn the principles for myself long after becoming
a doctor.

PRINCIPLE 1: FOOD DETERMINES THE STRUCTURE AND
FUNCTION OF OUR CELLS AND MICROBIOME
Our bodies are built entirely of food. Eating is the process of transforming
and assimilating matter from the external world into our own form. Every
day, food breaks down into different types of “bricks” in our gut, and then
those bricks get absorbed into our bloodstream to be used to continually
rebuild the next iteration of our body. When we provide the body with the
right “bricks,” we build the right structures, and we get health. Below are
five examples of how food acts as a structural element in cells, as a
functional messenger, and as a shaper of the microbiome and what it
produces.
Food as Structure: Dietary Fats in Our Cell Membranes

Cell membranes are the structural layer around cells. They are made of a
fatty layer studded with cholesterol molecules (which make the membrane
malleable) and proteins (which serve as receptors, anchors, and channels).
Our modern industrial diets have fundamentally changed the structure of
our cell membranes, which are a key functional unit of our cells, housing
the cell receptors, channels, enzymes, and anchors that kick off innumerable
cell-signaling activities. Healthy membranes are critical for all aspects of

health because they are the gatekeepers of every material and signal that
goes into the cell. Both omega-3 and omega-6 fats are necessary for optimal
biological function, but we want them to be balanced, because omega-3 fats
are anti-inflammatory and promote membrane elasticity, and omega-6 fats
promote inflammation. With the advent of ultra-processed, industrialized
foods—loaded with high concentrations of omega-6 fats from processed
vegetable and seed oils—our dietary intake of omega-6 fats relative to
omega-3 fats skyrocketed, radically changing our cell membrane structure
and function. Adjusting dietary intake of omega-3s and omega-6s can
change the membrane ratio in as little as three days, as cell membranes turn
over rapidly.
Food is a message from the external world that can directly activate and
inhibit genetic pathways deep inside your body. More than just being the
structural bricks, food also is a signaling molecule that directs key
functions in cells and the overall body, including how our genes are
expressed. It can act like a hormone at hormone receptors and can directly
create or alleviate oxidative stress. It can change the function of protein
enzymes by serving as cofactors for chemical reactions, like a key in a lock
that turns on machines in the cell that make ATP or do other jobs.
Eating spices like turmeric (which directly minimize chronic
inflammation) or cruciferous vegetables (which directly minimize oxidative
stress) are two examples of ways that food can functionally signal for Good
Energy.
Food as a Functional Message: Minimizing Oxidative Stress

Isothiocyanates are molecules from cruciferous vegetables, such as broccoli
or brussels sprouts, which help combat oxidative stress, one of the key Bad
Energy processes. Normally, if excess oxidative stress is present, the cell
increases gene expression of antioxidant molecules by sending a protein
called Nrf2 into the nucleus to bind to the genome and increase the
expression of antioxidant genes. When it’s not doing this function, Nrf2 is
inactivated by staying bound to a protein called Keap-1. Isothiocyanates

from cruciferous vegetables act by binding to Keap-1, causing it to release
Nrf2 to go to the nucleus and promote antioxidant gene expression—which
supports Good Energy by minimizing damaging oxidative stress.
Isothiocyanate from food acts to functionally activate key genes involved in
Good Energy.
Food as a Functional Message: Inhibiting Inflammation

Curcumin, which gives turmeric its yellow color, acts similarly to
isothiocyanates, but instead of increasing antioxidant genes, it blocks proinflammatory genes. Normally, a protein lives in the cell called NF-ϰB,
which, upon interacting with the DNA, leads to the expression of an array
of genes involved in inflammatory signaling. Overactivation of NF-ϰB—
occurring from excess oxidative stress, processed foods, sleep deprivation,
and psychological stress—leads to chronic inflammation, which can
damage the body and directly promote insulin resistance. When
unstimulated, NF-ϰB is bound to IkB proteins and inactivated (like how
Keap-1 inactivates Nrf2). IkB proteins are themselves inactivated when
another set of proteins, called IkB kinases, tags IkB with a molecule called
phosphate. So when IkB kinases are activated, they inactivate IkB, and NFϰB is free to go to the nucleus and exert its pro-inflammatory effects. In the
cell, curcumin suppresses IkB kinase, thereby keeping IkB bound to NFϰB, deactivating it. Curcumin therefore functionally inactivates proinflammatory genetic activity in the cell, supporting Good Energy.
Food Also Defines the Composition of Our Microbiome

Our microbiome is the trillions of bacteria cells that make up the second
body living inside our body. It determines our metabolic health, mood, and
longevity. In a sense, the microbiome is like our soul: it’s invisible, lives
inside of us, and determines the quality and quantity of our life and what we
think and do. And it’s immortal, because after we die, it breaks down our
body and persists. A big part of the purpose of eating is to feed this wellintentioned beast so that it serves us by converting the food we eat into

various chemicals that control our thoughts and bodies. Mistreat or misfeed
the microbiome, and our life will suffer in unbelievable ways: depression,
obesity, autoimmune disease, cancer, sleep disturbances, and more. Care for
the microbiome, and poof: our life magically becomes easier.
Fiber, probiotic-rich foods, and polyphenol-rich plant foods all feed and
support microbiome health, allowing for a robust gut lining (which
minimizes chronic inflammation) and for the microbiome to generate
metabolism-supporting chemicals like SCFA. You can think of your
microbiome as a magical transformer of food to medicine.
Food Determines Whether the Microbiome Generates MitochondriaBoosting Urolithin A

When certain gut bacteria in our microbiome encounter plant compounds
called ellagic acid and ellagitannin—which are found in pomegranates,
some berries, and certain nuts—they convert it into a class of compounds
called urolithins, of which urolithin A is a common one. These are absorbed
and then travel throughout the bloodstream. When urolithin A enters cells
throughout the body, it acts to improve Good Energy through several
mechanisms. The first is by acting as an antioxidant, and the second is by
stimulating the critical process of mitophagy, a mitochondrial qualitycontrol mechanism that allows for degradation of damaged and superfluous
mitochondria.

—
In serving structural, functional, and microbiome-supporting roles in the
body, foods need to be chosen wisely to yield health and Good Energy. This
brings us to principle 2.

PRINCIPLE 2: EATING IS THE PROCESS OF MATCHING
CELLULAR NEEDS WITH ORAL INPUTS
Any diet that sufficiently generates optimal cellular function, eliminates
chronic symptoms, and leads to optimal biomarkers is the right diet for you.

Let’s think about what food is from your cells’ perspective: the inside of
your body is warm, wet, and dark. Most of your thirty-seven trillion cells
live in moist darkness within you, just waiting for the signals and
information on what to do and when in order to give you a good life. Cells
obviously can’t see, hear, or smell. They only have receptors and channels
on their membranes that allow them to receive inputs by patiently waiting
for nutrients to float by that they can take up and use to do their work.
If what floats by is the needed structural and functional information to
do their work, your cells (and therefore you) will be healthy.
If the right information isn’t floating by, they’ll get confused. If
dangerous signals float by, they’ll get damaged. In desperation, they will try
to build the structures they need to build or do the work they need with this
shoddy material—but it will go poorly, like a builder constructing a house
out of low-quality or insufficient bricks. Everything you eat determines
what your cells will blindly interact with and what will determine their fate.
Eating is a matching problem: Matching the food inputs with the cells’
needs produces health. If we don’t properly match inputs with needs or if
we put in damaging substances that the body shouldn’t be exposed to, we
get symptoms and disease.
We eat an astonishing seventy metric tons of food in our lifetimes. Food
constantly rebuilds our rapidly dying and regenerating bodies. We turn over
our skin cells entirely every six weeks or so, and our gut lining turns over
almost every week. Everything is rebuilt from food. Unfortunately, several
factors have led to the majority of that seventy metric tons being either
useless or harmful to our body’s constant turnover process and baseline
functioning. No wonder so many of us are sick or don’t feel good.
The first is that industrial agriculture practices—like monocropping,
tilling, pesticides, and factory farming of animals—lead to vastly fewer
nutrients in our food. A fruit or vegetable you eat today has up to 40 percent
fewer minerals, vitamins, and less protein than the same food would have
had seventy years ago.
The second is that our food is being transported over large distances,
causing degradation and damage to nutrients. The average distance that

produce travels from farm to plate in the United States is approximately
fifteen hundred miles. During this journey, some fruits and vegetables can
lose up to 77 percent of their vitamin C content, a critical micronutrient for
ATP production in the mitochondria and antioxidant activity in the cell. You
may have thought that “eating local” or shopping from farmers’ markets is
frivolous, but it is actually a critical step to ensure you are getting maximal
helpful molecular information in the bites you take to build and instruct
your body.
The third is that most of our U.S. calorie consumption is ultra-processed
foods, stripped of their nutrition. About 60 percent or more of the calories
adults in the nation consume is ultra-processed garbage. You’re looking at
just a fraction of that seventy tons meeting the cells’ functional needs.
No wonder we are insatiable as a culture and eating ourselves into early
graves. We are not getting what we need from the nutrient-depleted
industrial material we eat, so the deep wisdom of our bodies and
microbiomes pushes us to consume more.
Eating most of your food from high-quality, unprocessed sources is
crucial. When you eat ultra-processed foods, where key nutrients have been
stripped from the whole-food form, you immediately slash the possibility of
your cells getting what they need. When you eat whole, unprocessed foods,
you have a much better chance of giving your cells the good stuff. And if
you eat food grown in healthy, thriving soil that hasn’t been tarnished by
pesticides, your food will have the highest likelihood of being filled with
the necessary molecules to get your cells what they need to thrive and the
least amount of damaging stuff that hurts them. Hunger will effortlessly
subside because your cells’ needs are met.
Interestingly, the “matching problem” of eating for the cells’ needs is
dynamic and can change day to day and in different phases of life. For
instance, during the second half of the menstrual cycle (the post-ovulation
luteal phase), women tend to be more insulin resistant due to relatively high
progesterone levels, which can induce oxidative stress in the mitochondria
by promoting the generation of hydrogen peroxide (a free radical). Ramping
up antioxidant food support during the second half of the menstrual cycle,

as well as minimizing high-glycemic foods that could exacerbate insulin
resistance–induced glycemic fluctuations, is a dynamic food intervention.
During the luteal phase, I tend to focus on antioxidant-rich berries,
cruciferous vegetables, and spices like cardamom and turmeric, and I
emphasize low-glycemic foods, like leafy greens, nuts, seeds, fish, eggs,
and pasture-raised meats.
A second example of the shifting needs of the cells is how several
micronutrients, including zinc and magnesium (both of which are necessary
for over three hundred chemical reactions in the body), can become
depleted during times of psychological stress. Researchers theorize several
possible reasons as to why this occurs, including increased metabolic
demands, higher excretion of micronutrients, or greater utilization of
antioxidant micronutrients when stress increases. Given this, supporting the
body with additional micronutrients during periods of increased
psychological stress could emerge as an intervention to minimize the
cellular dysfunction and increased illness that is known to accompany
chronic stress.

—
Bites are opportunities, and you don’t want to waste any. You want every
bite you take to communicate with your cells about what you expect them
to do, which brings us to the next principle.

PRINCIPLE 3: FOOD IS HOW YOU COMMUNICATE WITH
YOUR CELLS
Think of your consciousness and free will as a military general. Your cells
are the troops defending the integrity and safety of your life. Foods are the
messages the general chooses to send to motivate and tell the troops what to
do. The general’s ability to survive—as well as the troops’ survival—
depends on the quality and clarity of the messages. We must speak clearly
and correctly if we want to survive.

In an optimal state, food sends our cells clear messages about what our
body needs to do to thrive. Specific food choices and food behaviors can
tell your body different things, such as the following:
Omega-3 fatty acids (in, e.g., salmon, sardines, chia seeds, walnuts) to
immune cells: Put down your defenses. Things are safe now.
Cruciferous vegetables (in, e.g., cauliflower, cabbage, brussels sprouts,
and kale) to the DNA: It’s a tough time and we must produce more
defenses.
Leucine (an essential amino acid found in, e.g., beef, pork, yogurt,
lentils, and almonds) to the muscles: It’s time to build. Let’s go.
Magnesium (found in, e.g., pumpkin seeds, chia seeds, beans, leafy
greens, and avocados) to neurons: Relax!
Fiber to the microbiome: I love you.
Intermittent fasting: We need to clean things up.
Synthetic herbicides and pesticides to healthy bacteria in the gut: It’s
time to die.
Example of Clear Communication with the Body: Thylakoids Regulating
Hunger

You may recall from high school biology that chloroplasts are the parts of
plants that generate energy from the sun. Inside chloroplasts, green discs
called thylakoids are the workhorses of this process, and you’ll consume
them if you eat any unprocessed green vegetables. When thylakoids enter
the gut, they block the activity of the hormone lipase, which is released
from the pancreas to digest fat. Inhibiting lipase slows fat breakdown and
increases a sense of fullness. Thylakoids also suppress hunger by
stimulating two hormones that promote satiety: cholecystokinin (CCK) and
glucagon-like peptide 1 (GLP-1). These are both significantly increased
when high thylakoid levels are present in meals. People eating thylakoids
have a profoundly decreased urge for sweets. Thylakoids represent a way of
sending your body the communication that you have eaten enough. They

are found in high levels in raw spinach, kale, parsley, arugula, broccoli, and
spirulina.
When I make a smoothie in the morning, loaded with a dozen organic
ingredients, I’m thinking through exactly what conversation I want to have
with my body that day: safety, strength, satiety, and resilience.

—
Like any relationship, communicating poorly can lead to confusion and
problems.

PRINCIPLE 4: EXTREME FOOD CRAVINGS ARE FEEDBACK
FROM YOUR CELLS THAT YOU’RE GIVING MIXED
MESSAGES
The genesis of cravings is complex, involving over a dozen hormones,
several brain regions, and the microbiome. But a fundamental way to think
about it is that cravings—meaning a hedonistic desire for a specific food—
are a sign that you have confused your cells through your diet. You can
overcome cravings by communicating clearly to your body through food
choices.
Many patients and people I talk with about changing their diet
understandably feel like they just can’t give up what they crave.
“It’s just too hard.”
“I just can’t stop eating this stuff!”
“I’d rather cut five years off my life than give up X [insert highly
addictive food]!” Sadly, I’ve heard this last one dozens of times.
A key point in understanding how to overcome cravings and create a
sense of total freedom with food is this: if your body is pushing you to
acquire specific foods (cravings), that is a signal that your human cells’ or
your microbiome cells’ biological needs are not being met, and they are
employing their tools—like hunger hormone secretion—to get you to
aggressively seek food with the chance that you’ll eat something that

scratches their fundamental itch. You can think of yourself and your
behavior as a robot acting at the will of your cells and microbiome.
We are eating ourselves into a state of Bad Energy because the food we
eat is tapping into addictive pathways rather than meeting our needs or
checking our bodies’ boxes. We learned in Chapter 1 that “chronic
overnutrition”—a.k.a. overeating—is a key root of why we’re straining our
mitochondria and generating intracellular fat buildup and insulin resistance.
We can’t will ourselves to avoid chronically overeating. Our drives are too
strong, and our microbiome’s signals are too powerful. The best chance
against chronic overnutrition is eating real, unprocessed food. When you do
this, you tap into the body’s exquisitely sensitive regulatory mechanisms,
which will stop you from eating more than you need. When eating real,
unprocessed foods, you also experience more pleasure and stop wanting the
other stuff—effortlessly. I spent much of my childhood and surgical training
controlled by cravings to the point where I would not leave the house
without a stash of sweet treats in my bag, especially Hershey’s Kisses or
Reese’s Peanut Butter Cups. Learning to simply load my body with more
unprocessed foods wiped away these cravings, which once felt part of my
identity.
When I think about the worst examples of food that confuse our cells, I
think about fructose. Liquid fructose came onto the scene in the 1970s and
completely changed the relationship between humans and sugar, increasing
our consumption of added fructose intake from 6 grams a day (from fruits)
to 33 grams per day—a fivefold increase in this substance. When fructose
enters the body in high quantities, it depletes ATP levels in the cell, leading
to less available cellular energy. It also generates uric acid as a by-product
in its metabolism, which causes mitochondrial oxidative stress and
mitochondrial dysfunction. To the cell, this rapid depletion in ATP and
lower cellular energy signals starvation and induces intense appetite and
food-seeking behaviors for more sugar in hopes of raising ATP levels in the
cell. Simultaneously, to counteract the perceived starvation, uric acid–
induced mitochondrial dysfunction leads to the sugar being stored as fat.

Fructose says to the cells (and therefore the body): You are starving and
preparing for winter. Eat as much as you possibly can and store it!
Many animals aim to store as much fat as possible before winter’s low
food supply. They gorge themselves with ripe, fructose-rich fruit. The shortlived spike in fructose consumption during autumn drives foraging (foodseeking) behaviors and even increases violence and aggression. For the
animal, this time of gorging on fruit is a life-or-death situation, and an
influx of fructose turns on this survival switch that changes metabolism and
behavior. The survival switch concept is from Dr. Rick Johnson, author of
Nature Wants Us to Be Fat. But now that ultra-concentrated high-fructose
corn syrup is available 24-7, our survival switch has been used against us to
turn us into aggressive food-seeking addicts, preparing for a hibernation
that never comes.
Food companies have also mastered the science of glucose spikes to
make food more addictive. Research has shown that intense cravings often
happen after a blood sugar spike followed by a crash (reactive
hypoglycemia), which we learned about in Chapter 4. When you load your
body with sugar, like after eating refined carbohydrate foods or foods with
added sugar, the body releases a surge of insulin to help take all this glucose
out of the bloodstream. What can result from the surge is a stark crash in
blood sugar, with levels often dipping below the premeal baseline. This
time of post-spike low blood sugar—or hypoglycemia—has been shown to
be the time when people often crave a high-carbohydrate snack, and the
average post-meal glucose dip relative to baseline can even predict an
increase in hunger at two to three hours post-meal and a greater caloric
intake at the next meal and in the twenty-four-hour period following. The
choice of blood sugar–spiking (and crashing) foods puts the body into a
confused panic, seeking food to stabilize itself. We can prevent this cycle by
avoiding skyrocketing glucose via simple blood sugar–stabilizing strategies
(explained in the next chapter). Interestingly, when wearing a CGM, many
people who believe they or their kids suffer from “hypoglycemia” actually
find that the real problem is that they are spiking their blood sugar too high,
which is then followed by a reactive hypoglycemic crash. The solution,

therefore, is to stabilize the blood sugar, learn how to eat to avoid big
spikes, and become more metabolically flexible.
In a fascinating study on hunger led by Dr. Kevin Hall, published in Cell
in 2021, researchers put twenty participants with stable weight in an
inpatient facility at the NIH for an entire month. There, they ate only food
delivered to them by the research team. They could not leave. For the first
two weeks, participants were able to eat unlimited quantities of ultraprocessed, industrially manufactured foods. This diet consisted of common
American staples, including Cheerios, croissants, Yoplait yogurt, blueberry
muffins, margarine, packaged beef ravioli, diet lemonade, oatmeal raisin
cookies, white bread, store-bought gravy, canned corn, low-fat chocolate
milk, deli turkey, tortillas, Heinz pickle relish, Hellmann’s mayonnaise,
shortbread cookies, Fig Newtons, orange juice, Tater Tots, french fries,
cheeseburgers with American cheese, Heinz ketchup, turkey bacon, English
muffins, chicken nuggets, hoagie rolls, crackers, hot dogs, burritos, tortilla
chips, and so on.
In the second two weeks, participants were able to eat unlimited
quantities of unprocessed foods, like fresh egg scrambles and omelets,
steamed and roasted vegetables, rice, nuts, fruits, oatmeal with berries and
raw almonds, salads with chicken, apples, homemade dressing, sweet potato
hash, unsweetened Greek yogurt with fruit, shrimp, salmon, chicken breast,
beef roast, and baked sweet potatoes.
The researchers weighed every morsel of food left behind on the plates,
so they knew the precise amount each participant had eaten. Amazingly, the
participants ate over 500 fewer calories per day in the two weeks of
consuming unlimited unprocessed foods, adding up to around 7,000 fewer
calories in just two weeks. The participants lost two pounds on average
during the unprocessed food period and gained two pounds during the ultraprocessed food period. And, unsurprisingly, satiety hormones were
significantly different between the two periods, with the unprocessed foods
yielding higher satiety hormone levels and lower hunger hormones. So in
the same bodies, two different food signals (unprocessed versus ultraprocessed) gave very different messages: one that confused the body into

thinking it needed more food than it did and one that satisfied it completely.
Clearly, ultra-processed food intake drives weight gain and overeating, but
it took locking up individuals in a prisonlike setting at the NIH to prove that
ultra-processed foods make you hungrier, make you eat more, and make
you gain weight.
In The End of Craving, Mark Schatzker makes the case that our
insatiable desire for food stems from a unique feature of processed food
called “variable reward.” The body—which prepares itself for digestion
from the time of looking at and tasting a food by predicting what nutrition
will hit the GI tract—can never be sure what nutrition is coming in with
unnatural ultra-processed foods. To the body, ultra-processed food is a
nutrition gamble. One day it’s Coke Zero, the next it’s the full-sugar Coke,
but they taste the same, and as with gambling, variable reward drives us to
keep seeking by triggering our key motivation pathway: dopamine. Ultraprocessed foods confuse our body’s ability to accurately predict nutritional
inputs and therefore drive us to keep seeking. In contrast, eating
unprocessed foods at fairly stable times lets the system run smoothly.
The food industry uses the science of cravings to make food more
addictive, rigorously studying how specific combinations of ultra-processed
foods get consumers to their “bliss point” of pleasure, driving them to want
more. We are being naive if we don’t plainly realize that our food is
weaponized to confuse our bodies at a sophisticated level. Over twenty-one
million people in the United States depend on the food industry for
employment, and that industry is built to grow, and growth means more
cravings and addiction to processed foods.
The beauty of eating unprocessed, whole foods is that you have the best
chance of getting a diverse array of nutrients that check the human cells’
and microbiome cells’ boxes and therefore diminish cravings. If you do this,
the cravings will stop, the hedonistic desire for food will stop, and it will
feel effortless to enjoy and love food that helps you.
The best advice I can give anyone in transforming their health is to find
a way—any way—to stick with totally unprocessed, organic food for just a

month or two. By the end of this time, I can guarantee that your preferences
and cravings will have changed.

PRINCIPLE 5: IGNORE DIET PHILOSOPHIES AND FOCUS ON
UNPROCESSED FOOD
Diet controversy is a charade.
I personally know brilliant, hardworking, highly educated people who
believe polar opposite ideologies about nutrition. One group feels that a
low-fat, high-carb diet is the only diet that yields Good Energy, and another
feels that a high-fat, low-carb diet is the best way. Both have data that show
that these diets reduce liver fat (a key marker of insulin sensitivity), lower
weight, lower triglycerides, improve insulin sensitivity, and lower
inflammation. And both are right. And in between is the Mediterranean diet,
which also has masses of literature to support a more omnivorous approach.
All these diets can “work” for good health because all emphasize primarily
unprocessed, whole foods to give the cells what they need to function and
cue satiety mechanisms so that we don’t overeat.
Countless Instagram and blog posts from vegan health professionals
blast the carnivores for ruining the planet. And the vitriol from the
ketogenic and animal-based crowd toward the vegans is some of the
cruelest stuff I’ve seen on the internet. Both are wrong in their attacks and
right in their dietary choices. I know vegan and carnivore elite athletes, both
of whom are absolutely thriving with low insulin levels, low glucose, low
triglycerides, and low visceral fat.
I am so grateful that I have had a foot in both worlds. I know that both
movements have merit and are championed by science-focused, missiondriven people. And I’m not being wishy-washy. The reality is that eating
unprocessed, clean, natural foods—in a pattern that keeps you energized,
symptom-free, and with optimal biomarkers—is the right diet for you.
How can different whole-food dietary patterns “work” for Good Energy?
Chronic overnutrition and mitochondrial dysfunction are what clog up the
cell with fat and lead to Bad Energy. In the absence of chronic

overnutrition, the cell will work through the substrates it has available to it,
whether it be glucose or fat, or a mix of both. If you’re eating unprocessed,
nutrient-dense food from healthy soil, your satiety mechanisms work
exquisitely (like every other animal species that doesn’t get metabolic
disease because they don’t eat ultra-processed foods) and you likely won’t
overconsume. Therefore, your body processes the energy it needs and the
cell doesn’t fill itself with fat and doesn’t become insulin resistant.
We need to get over dietary labels and just start thinking of food as
molecular information. The key is understanding what molecular
information is in the food, how much is getting absorbed, and whether the
cells are “happy” as a result.
It’s important to realize that the body is remarkably capable of getting to
similar outcomes with different inputs through redundant mechanisms—
that is, you could be eating a sustainably sourced, unprocessed plant-based
diet or an animal-based diet and still get the same molecular information for
your cell. Here’s how you can get several key nutrients to your cells from
very different dietary sources.
Multiple Ways for Cells to Get What They Need from Food: Butyrate,
EPA/DHA, and Vitamin C

Butyrate
Butyrate is a key signaling molecule in the body that serves as a positive
regulator of mitochondrial function. Higher levels of butyrate are correlated
with reducing depression and obesity risk, two states that are tied to
mitochondrial dysfunction. Butyrate is an SCFA produced when bacteria
ferment fiber in the gut, which is then absorbed by the gut lining cells and
enters circulation. Butyrate production is a key reason why high-fiber diets
are touted to be so beneficial. Often, ketogenic diets are theorized to be
problematic partly because they lack fiber. However, people on a low-fiber
ketogenic diet still can reap the benefits of butyrate by making it themselves
in their own cells, bypassing the microbiome. When the body is starved of
carbohydrates, the liver will make a chemical called beta-hydroxybutyrate,

a chemical almost identical to the butyrate formed by gut bacteria with the
addition of one oxygen atom, yielding a different pathway to give your cells
the same Good Energy benefit. On a diet high in fiber, you may make about
50 grams of butyrate per day from the bacteria in the gut. On a ketogenic
diet, you make a similar amount or more. Throughout human evolution,
cultures have thrived on over 100 grams of fiber a day from foraging (like
the modern hunter-gatherer Hadza tribe in Tanzania) while others ate a
mostly animal-based diet of milk and meat and consumed little fiber (like
the Maasai tribe in Kenya). I predict that the people in both cultures had
sufficient butyrate in their cells, albeit through two different physiologic
pathways.

EPA/DHA
One of the reasons people eschew a vegan diet is because it can lack the key
omega-3s eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA) and docosahexaenoic acid (DHA),
which are largely found in animal foods (although they are also found in
algae). Omega-3s serve profound metabolic roles in both signaling in the
mitochondria and minimizing chronic inflammation. The predominant
omega-3 found in plants is alpha-linolenic acid (ALA), which must go
through a several-step conversion process to become the biologically
critical EPA and DHA. Many people, as a key criticism of plant-based diets,
cite this conversion pathway as “inefficient.” But we must dig deeper and
look at biology before making these judgments. Three cellular protein
machines (enzymes)—delta-6-desaturase, elongase, and delta-5-desaturase
—process ALA to make EPA and DHA. And these enzymes require several
micronutrients to function properly, including B₂, B₃, B₅, B₆, B₇, vitamin
C, zinc, and magnesium. In the United States, 92 percent of people are
deficient in at least one critical micronutrient, likely because of our ultraprocessed diet, poor soil, and poor gut health. So if you’re deficient in these
micronutrients, you will likely not convert ALA to EPA/DHA efficiently,
and if you are replete with these micronutrients, you will. What’s more,
omega-6 fats also use these same enzymes to convert to their downstream
versions. The conversion occurs in several steps, going from linolenic acid

to arachidonic acid (a downstream omega-3 that generates proinflammatory chemicals). So if you are like a typical American who is
eating twenty times more omega-6 fats than we have historically—because
you’re consuming processed vegetable oils and processed foods—you are
also going to stunt your ability to convert ALA to EPA and DHA by
blocking access to these enzymes.
A thoughtful approach to vastly different diets can yield the positive
outcomes you want, illustrating why we have healthy, uninflamed people
who fall into different diet camps: one that’s whole foods plant-based
(WFPB) and one that’s more animal-based.

Vitamin C
Vitamin C is a critical micronutrient that serves the purpose, among many
other functions, of reducing oxidative stress in the cell. Vegans get vitamin
C from numerous colorful plants, including bell peppers, tomatoes, and
citrus fruits. More carnivorous people get it from eating organ meats,
specifically liver, one of the only animal sources of vitamin C. Both do just
fine.

—
Focus on cell biology over diet dogma. Put all your energy into finding and
eating unprocessed foods grown in healthy soil. Your health will vastly
improve. It actually is that simple.
With that said, knowing the principles of healthy eating and actually
living them out day to day are two different things, which brings us to
Principle 6.

PRINCIPLE 6: MINDFUL EATING—FINDING AWE IN FOOD
If adhering to an organic, unprocessed diet as a human in the twenty-first
century were easy, we’d all be eating clean healthy food all the time.
Instead, it takes conscious daily work to go against the tide of normal
culture to make consistently healthy food decisions. I tap into a sense of

awe and wonder about food that lets me appreciate its impact on my life
and inspires me to make the healthiest choices possible. The following are
some of the things I reflect on as I tap into my appreciation for the
miraculous interaction between food and my body:
I reflect that all the energy stored in the cellular bonds of the plants I’m
eating was originally a packet of photon energy that started in the sun,
traveled through space, and then was absorbed by a plant’s chloroplast,
transformed into glucose, and taken up by an animal that I might eat.
Chloroplasts in plants are remarkably like the mitochondria in humans,
which ultimately convert that glucose formed in plants from the sun into
ATP that I can use to power my life and my ability to think and love. And
when I eventually die and go back to the earth—hopefully in a natural
burial like my mother’s, where my body is put directly in the soil to be
decomposed by worms, fungi, and bacteria and reenter the greater
ecosystem—my body’s material building blocks will help grow new plants
that will convert more of the sun’s energy into glucose in an infinite loop of
mystical transformation.
I reflect that the mitochondria that process energy from food to animate
our tissues are inherited entirely from our mothers, passed down through
millennia in an endless progression of nesting dolls along a matrilineal line.
The mitochondria from the sperm essentially melt upon fertilization with an
egg, while our mother’s mitochondria persist and create all the energy we
need to do everything.
I reflect on how mitochondria historically started out as bacteria that
were engulfed by more complex cells and worked together to create a more
powerful entity. When I think about my mother in quiet moments, I
visualize that unbroken lineage over millions of years and of my mother’s
cellular engines living through me in this spectacular way. She—and every
woman before her in our lineage—are living through me as I type these
words. I do not want to hurt that gift through my food choices. Modern life
is an assault on our mitochondria, which means it’s an assault on our
ancestors and our mothers, an assault on the creative, generative force of
the feminine in all of us, and an assault on our animating life force. It’s an

assault on the miraculous flow of cosmic energy from the sun, through the
soil and plants, through bacteria in my gut, through my cells’ mitochondria
to create the energy that sparks my consciousness and the statistical near
impossibility of me. Out of respect for all of this, I must push back. And I
do that through what food I choose to buy, cook, and eat.
I reflect on the fact that a teaspoon of healthy soil has more living
organisms in it than there are people on the planet, and all those little
bacteria, nematodes, and fungi are working around the clock to alchemize
air, water, sunlight, soil, and seed into everything humans need to survive
and be happy. I think about how we have murdered our soil’s life force with
pesticides and industrial agriculture, but how there is an incredible, hopeful
movement of regenerative farming advocates fighting to bring this life back
because our lives—and the biodiversity that allows for our lives—depend
on it.
I reflect on the nature of the gut. In one frame of reference, the gut is just
a tube of tissue. In another frame of reference, it’s the interface between the
cosmos (i.e., everything in the universe) and “ourselves.” As with all
relationships, poor boundaries lead to toxic outcomes. No boundary—
physical or psychological—is more important than your gut lining. I’ve
worked on personal boundaries a lot in therapy, and I am convinced that
healthy emotional boundaries—such as being clear and vocal about what
you will and will not let into your life—are what make relationships
functional. Your gut lining is a boundary between you and everything else
in the universe that is poised to inundate and overwhelm your biology and
generate unrelenting inflammation. Healing and strengthening your gut
lining with food—therefore creating and strengthening this critical
boundary and reducing intestinal permeability or “leaky gut”—allows you
to be selective about what you want to take in from the universe on a
material level. You can choose what serves you.
I reflect on the fact that many of the problems in society—including
violence, mental illness, developmental issues, and pain—start in humans,
and humans are made by cells that become dysfunctional largely because of
oxidative stress, mitochondrial dysfunction, and chronic inflammation. How

miraculous that food can directly combat those things. We can’t have a
healthy society without well-functioning humans. We can’t have wellfunctioning humans without well-functioning cells. And we can’t have wellfunctioning cells with mitochondrial dysfunction, oxidative stress, chronic
inflammation, and cellular and hormone disruption from toxic chemicals in
our food. We combat those things through nutrient-dense, unprocessed
foods grown in living, thriving soil. Many of us are addicted to processed
food but have had trouble mustering the strength to quit because we don’t
really know what awaits us on the other side. What awaits us is a maximally
positive experience of our one life.
Pausing before eating to think about these concepts, expressing gratitude
for my food before I start, and eating slowly are ways I reinforce these
concepts. From a place of awe and appreciation for the magic of food, I find
it vastly easier to make healthier choices. And with that, the obvious next
question is: What should we and shouldn’t we eat?

Recap: The Six Principles of Good Energy Eating
Principle 1: Food Determines the Structure of Our Cells and Microbiome
Principle 2: Eating Is the Process of Matching Cellular Needs with Oral Inputs
Principle 3: Food Is How You Communicate with Your Cells
Principle 4: Extreme Food Cravings Are Feedback from Your Cells That You’re
Giving Mixed Messages
Principle 5: Ignore Diet Philosophies and Focus on Unprocessed Food
Principle 6: Find Awe in Food

To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

6

Creating a Good Energy Meal

At Stanford Medical School, I didn’t take a single dedicated nutrition
course. In fact, 80 percent of medical schools to this day do not require their
students to take a nutrition class, despite food-driven diseases decimating
our population.
I saw occasional references to nutrition research, but the main messages
were that “nutrition is complicated” and findings often contradict
themselves. For example, some studies have shown that red meat causes
heart disease, while other studies have shown that it prevents heart disease.
Some studies have shown that sugar causes obesity, while others have
shown that it doesn’t. And some studies have shown that low-carb diets are
best, while others have shown that low-fat diets are preferred.
Only after leaving medicine did I learn that so many of these studies
were funded by food companies, which spend eleven times more on
nutrition research than the NIH. Unsurprisingly, this money slants findings:
82 percent of independently funded studies show harm from sugarsweetened beverages, but 93 percent of industry-sponsored studies reflect
no harm. When food companies fund research, the studies are six times
more likely to have a favorable result about the food in question.
Policymakers use this highly compromised research. It dictates food
guidelines, school lunches, and food subsidy decisions. About 95 percent of
the academics on the USDA panel that created the 2020 Dietary Guidelines
for Americans had conflicts of interest with food companies. The food

industry’s influence on studies has led the current guidelines to say that 10
percent of a child’s diet can come from added refined sugar, which should
be unequivocally zero percent.
In 2022, one of the nation’s preeminent nutrition studies (jointly funded
by the NIH, the Gerald J. and Dorothy R. Friedman School of Nutrition
Science and Policy at Tufts, and processed food companies) reported that
Lucky Charms ranks as far healthier to consume than whole foods like lamb
or ground beef. And seventy brand-name cereals from General Mills,
Kellogg’s, and Post were ranked twice as high as eggs. This would be funny
if the stated goal of the study wasn’t to impact “marketing to children.”
No animals in the wild suffer from widespread metabolic conditions, nor
did humans as little as seventy-five years ago. Somehow, animals left to
their own devices—not confused by the advice of “experts”—figure it out.
According to PubMed, 45,668 peer-reviewed nutrition studies were
conducted between 2020 and 2022.
I believe the United States would be a healthier, happier, more
prosperous place if we replaced all those studies with these simple
guidelines that will transform anyone’s health. Eat the following:
Organic (ideally regenerative) unrefined or minimally refined fruits
Organic (ideally regenerative) unrefined or minimally refined
vegetables
Organic (ideally regenerative) unrefined or minimally refined nuts and
seeds
Organic (ideally regenerative) unrefined or minimally refined legumes
and beans
Pasture-raised, organic, 100 percent grass-fed meats and organs,
including elk, venison, bison, lamb, beef, pork, goat
Pasture-raised, organic, 100 percent foraging poultry and eggs
Pasture-raised, organic, 100 percent grass-fed, ideally A2-strain dairy
products like milk, cheese, yogurt, and kefir
Wild, line-caught, small omega-3 fish, including mackerel, sardines,
anchovies, and salmon

Organic unrefined or minimally refined herbs and spices
Organic minimally refined condiments, like vinegar, mustard, and hot
sauce
Organic (ideally regenerative) minimally refined fermented foods like
sauerkraut, kimchi, yogurt, natto, tempeh, tofu, and kefir
Reverse osmosis or charcoal-filtered water

Water
Water makes up 90 percent of our blood, and clean water is of profound
importance to our health. Unfortunately, it is becoming increasingly clear that this
doesn’t come from tap water. The Environmental Working Group (EWG) has a
database where you can search the purity of your water based on zip code. The
water in my community had 820 times the amount of arsenic recommended as
safe. I recommend investing in a reverse osmosis filter of a high-efficacy charcoal
filter (e.g., Berkey) to ensure you are getting a regular supply of clean water. Brita
and similar inexpensive water filters typically use activated carbon filters, which are
effective in reducing chlorine taste and odor, but they may not be as efficient in
removing other contaminants like heavy metals, bacteria, and harmful chemicals.
Adequately hydrating with clean water is a significant part of the equation in
becoming metabolically healthy and preventing obesity. According to Dr. Richard
Johnson, professor of medicine at University of Colorado and author of the
incredible book Nature Wants Us to Be Fat, even “mild dehydration stimulates the
development of obesity.” Interestingly, making fat tissue is a way for humans to
store more water, called “metabolic water,” which can be released in times of water
scarcity. Think about camels: they can survive in the desert with low water supply in
part because they store water in the fat cells of their fatty humps! How dehydration
leads to obesity is one of the most fascinating stories in all of medicine.
Dehydration activates a process in the brain called the polyol pathway, which
stimulates the body to manufacture fructose. The fructose the body makes does
two things: it stimulates a hormone called vasopressin, which tells our kidneys to
retain water, and it causes us to print fat—meaning to literally manufacture more fat
and fill our cells with it—through the disturbance of mitochondrial function. This
then lets us store more “metabolic water” in that fat. According to Dr. Johnson,
“people with obesity are ten times as likely to be dehydrated as their leaner
counterparts.” In a study in Germany, drinking just one additional glass of water per
day reduced children’s risk of becoming overweight by 30 percent.

Cut processed and ultra-processed foods from your diet—particularly
those that contain the following:
Refined sugars of any kind
Refined grains of any kind
Refined industrial vegetable or seed oils of any kind

A WORD ABOUT GRAINS
You might notice the absence of unprocessed grains from the “eat” list. I
see no major benefit in adding grains in any form to the diet. Grains are a
relatively modern food that provides some vitamins, minerals, and fiber, but
much less than other foods on this list. For instance, 1 cup cooked quinoa
has 5 grams of fiber per cup, 34 net carbohydrates, 8 grams of protein, and
160 milligrams of omega-3s—while just two tablespoons of basil seeds
have 15 grams of fiber (three times as much as quinoa), 0 net carbs
(meaning near zero glucose elevation), 5 grams of protein, and 2,860
milligrams of omega-3 fats (seventeen times as much as quinoa). In the
context of the U.S. metabolic crisis—in which 93 percent of adults have
problems with metabolism—avoiding carbohydrate-predominant foods with
a lesser value of protective substances within them is a wise choice.
Existing in the modern world—no matter how vigilant you are—means
your gut lining will be compromised to some extent. Some of the
concentrated proteins in modern grains can contribute to leaky gut,
regardless of whether you have a strong sensitivity. Additionally, most
grains in the U.S. are covered in toxic pesticides.

Conventional, Organic, Regenerative: What Does It Mean?
Conventionally Grown Food:
Conventionally grown foods make up 94 percent of food sales in the United States,
and the term refers to foods not grown organically. Conventional farming uses one
billion pounds of pesticides per year in the United States alone, many of which are
known to cause damage to human and microbiome cells and are tied to obesity,

cancer, and developmental illnesses, among many others. The World Health
Organization has explicitly stated that glyphosate, the key ingredient in the most
widely used pesticide, Roundup, damages our DNA and probably causes cancer.
Conventional farming utilizes monocropping, the process of planting the same
single crop repeatedly in one place, which strips the soil of key nutrients.
Monocropping generally doesn’t use cover crops, which are traditionally planted to
protect the soil between plantings and replenish the soil with nutrients. Without
cover crops, the soil overheats and loses water, becoming lifeless dirt instead of
thriving living soil.
Additionally, we’ve replaced the natural replenishment of soil through cover
crops and natural fertilizers, like manure and compost, with fossil-fuel-derived
synthetic fertilizers. Huge amounts of natural gas and coal are used to directly
make synthetic fertilizer. Research shows that long-term monocropping leads to
“soil sickness” and a reduction in diverse bacteria. Conventional farming also
utilizes mechanized tilling, an aggressive turning and agitating of the soil that kills
the fragile ecosystem of microorganisms that allow our food to be as nutrient rich
and resilient as possible. Conventional soil is depleted of microbial life, leading to
topsoil depletion, water runoff, and toxic chemicals in the water and environment
that are creating environmental catastrophes, like a dead zone the size of New
Jersey in the Gulf of Mexico where the Mississippi drains.
Conventionally raised animals are subjected to confinement and pesticidecovered grain diets in CAFOs (concentrated animal feeding operations) that
increase omega-6 fat content in their bodies. In the absence of diverse natural diets
and movement, the squalid conditions lead to rampant infectious disease, so much
so that 70 percent of antibiotics in the United States go toward conventionally
raised animals. Astonishingly, 70 percent of conventional soy grown in the United
States and nearly 50 percent of the corn go toward animal feed in a cycle that hurts
our soil via conventional agriculture, then sickens animals by overloading their
bodies with omega-6 fats, which then sicken humans who eat them.
Avoid conventionally grown foods at all costs: they hurt the soil, the
environment, our water systems, farmer well-being, global biodiversity, your
microbiome, and your cellular health. Eating nonorganic or nonregenerative food is
promoting an environmentally devastating industry that uses extensive fossil fuels.

Organically Grown Food:
Organic farming refers to adherence to a strict set of standards overseen by the
federal government that includes restrictions on the use of most synthetic fertilizers
and pesticides. However, organic doesn’t necessarily mean that the practices focus
on regenerating thriving and biodiverse soil. Organically grown food is a
significantly better option compared to conventionally raised foods because it
minimizes the use of some of the most toxic chemicals in our soil and on our food.
Organic meat and dairy products come from animals who did not eat food grown
with synthetic pesticides; however, this does not mean that the animal ate a natural
diet. It very well may have eaten exclusively organic grain feed (like corn and soy),

which is still omega-6 rich and promotes metabolic dysfunction in the animal. The
best thing to look for on a label is “organic” and “grass-fed” or “pasture-raised” for
meat and dairy, as this means the animal had access to pesticide-free natural diets
like grasses and moved more freely.

Regeneratively Grown Food:
Regenerative food practices focus on soil health and biodiversity, utilizing diverse
crop rotation, avoiding synthetic pesticides and fertilizers, minimizing tilling, and
employing composting and other practices. Regeneratively grown food increases
soil microbe count, enriches soils with nutrients, improves watersheds, decreases
water runoff, and requires less water. Animals are incorporated into the
regenerative farming ecosystem to roam freely in pastures and orchards and to
naturally and gently agitate soil through grazing. In doing so, they replete and
regenerate soil with nutrients and biodiversity from feces and urine. Regenerative
farming leads to cleaner water and air, 30 percent less water use (since the healthy
porous soil can store more water and it won’t just run off), nutrient-dense foods,
and enhanced carbon capture in the soil through significantly increased rootsystem growth. (Larger root systems are necessarily built by taking carbon from the
environment to print carbon-based plant tissue.)
Animals raised regeneratively have higher levels of omega-3 fats by large
margins, and their milk has six times more antioxidants and phytonutrients than
conventional milk. (These nutrients are undetectable in milk from conventional
cows.) Animals don’t receive routine antibiotics (unless they are acutely ill) on
regenerative farms, since the animals have resilient health from being able to
move, eat, and socialize freely.
Some people argue that conventional farming is cheaper and more efficient than
regenerative, and therefore necessary to feed our large population at scale. This
argument is a narrow view focusing on extremely short-term gains that are only
possible through Farm Bill subsidies. Conventional farming is fragile because it
renders ecosystems fragile. Dr. Mark Hyman points out that we pay at least four
times more for conventionally grown food that is artificially cheap: we pay for the
taxpayer subsidies to prop up the unsustainable practices, for the food itself, for the
detrimental health effects, and for the disastrous environmental outcomes. The
winners are the ultra-processed food companies. Moving to regenerative farming
practices at scale would slash our health care costs, rate of environmental damage,
energy use globally, and reliance on fossil fuels. Additionally, by converting to
regenerative practice, farmers are saving on input costs (like pesticides,
insecticides, and pesticide-resistant seeds). In the film Common Ground, one
farmer notes that he can save around $400 an acre on input costs with
regenerative practices, translating to $2 million in savings yearly.
Choosing regeneratively grown foods is one of the most powerful choices you
can make as a health seeker or environmentalist. Regenerative plants, cover
crops, and healthy soil sequester carbon from the atmosphere and 3D print it into
extensive root systems that grow immensely larger than conventional root systems

that must battle through hard, lifeless dirt. The aggressive composting in
regenerative farming practices produces little to no waste. It also drastically
decreases the use of fossil fuels (which get converted to synthetic fertilizer),
protects water systems from pesticide and fertilizer runoff (which kills marine life),
and mitigates drought by capturing rainwater in porous, absorbent regenerative soil
that would otherwise be lost to runoff. The Natural Resources Defense Council
estimates that a 1 percent increase in healthy soil increases water storage capacity
by over twenty thousand gallons per single acre.

DEFINING PROCESSED FOOD
Ultra-processed foods make up 60 percent of calories consumed by adults
and 67 percent of calories consumed by children, and they drive Bad
Energy diseases like obesity, high blood pressure, dementia, type 2 diabetes,
and insulin resistance. And the impact is major. In a recent study of twenty
thousand participants followed over fifteen years, more than four servings
of ultra-processed foods per day conferred a 62 percent increased hazard for
death during follow-up. Each additional serving of ultra-processed food
increased all-cause mortality by 18 percent. We must understand what ultraprocessed foods are and how to avoid them at all costs. (Spoiler alert: four
servings of ultra-processed foods in a day is not as much as you might
think; the total could look like a handful of pretzels, a serving of tortilla
chips, a slice of store-bought bread, and a cookie.)
So what counts as ultra-processed food? The NOVA classification
system splits foods into four categories based on how processed they are,
according to the physical, biological, and chemical manufacturing processes
used after “foods are separated from nature.”
The categories include:
Unprocessed and minimally processed foods
Processed culinary ingredients
Processed foods
Ultra-processed foods

Unprocessed and Minimally Processed Foods

Unprocessed foods undergo zero alteration following their removal from
nature—like eating an apple just off the tree. Whole foods that lack added
ingredients, such as fruits, vegetables, eggs, nuts, seeds, dried herbs, spices,
and raw cuts of meat, poultry, and fish, are generally regarded as minimally
processed or unprocessed. Within the minimally processed food category,
some processing may occur, such as washing, crushing, grinding, filtering,
roasting, canning, boiling, vacuum sealing, freezing, nonalcoholic
fermentation, pasteurization, or placing in containers. However, no part of
the food has been stripped away or concentrated. Additionally, no extra salt,
sugar, or other ingredients can be added.
In order to be metabolically healthy, unprocessed and minimally
processed foods must comprise the vast majority of what you eat.
Processed Culinary Ingredients

Processed culinary ingredients include oils, butter, sugar, maple syrup, lard,
and noncaloric ingredients, like salt. They are extracted from natural foods
or nature by milling, drying, pressing, grinding, crushing, and refining.
They are inherently “unbalanced,” concentrated, and generally energy dense
foods (salt being an exception) that are rarely consumed by themselves.
While certain processed culinary ingredients can be part of a healthoptimizing diet, many can have negative effects on metabolic health.
Industrially extracted vegetable and seed oils like soybean oil and corn oils
(the most common fats in the American diet), for instance, are harmful due
to their concentrated omega-6 content, which can promote inflammation. In
contrast, oils like olive oil and avocado oil, which are obtained by
essentially squishing fatty whole fruits (rather than mechanically and
chemically extracting oils from seeds or vegetables), are typically
associated with positive health outcomes.

Processed Foods

Processed food manufacturing increases the “durability” and “sensory
qualities” of foods by combining minimally processed foods with processed
culinary ingredients to make “highly palatable” items. For example, this
could include freshly made unpackaged whole grain breads, tomato sauce
with added sugar, bacon cured with salt, fruit preserved in syrup, or
vegetables or beans canned in a salty brine. The easiest way to identify
processed foods is by looking for oils, salt, or sugar on the label.
Some processed foods can be part of a healthy diet, and again, it comes
down to reading the label. For example, flaxseed crackers, like Flackers or
Ella’s Flats, may have just a few ingredients that are themselves healthy
(like organic flaxseed, apple cider vinegar, and sea salt) and not heavily
processed. You can visibly see the whole flaxseeds in the product.
Additionally, grass-fed organic raw cheddar cheese, made just of
unpasteurized milk and sea salt, is a well-sourced, natural processed food
that can be part of a healthy diet.
With that said, most foods in the processed food category are
problematic and include far too high levels of sugar, salt, and oil. This
happens in foods you wouldn’t expect, like ketchup, salad dressing, and
peanut butter. Avoid any processed food with refined vegetable or seed oil,
refined grains, added sugar, or an ingredient that is not an obviously
recognizable food.
Ultra-Processed Foods

Ultra-processed foods are created in industrial factories by combining
various extracted and adulterated parts from different foods with synthetic
ingredients, like preservatives and food colorings. These are
“Frankenfoods” you should never eat and never give to your children.
These foods now comprise the vast majority of the calories we eat today in
America. They should be zero percent of our diet. In a 2020 study of the
impact of ultra-processed food consumption and chronic diseases, results
show that the highest levels of ultra-processed food intake across studies

increased the risk of overweight or obesity by 39 percent, waist
circumferences by 39 percent, metabolic syndrome by 79 percent, and low
HDL levels by 102 percent.
To make ultra-processed foods, manufacturers break down whole foods
into parts and then often combine these parts with synthetic chemicals to
create shelf-stable chemical imitations of less processed foods. Foods are
first broken down into extracted parts like oil, sugar, starch, protein, and
fiber. Foods may then undergo chemical modifications to further reengineer
them, like using enzymes to extract natural flavors, colors, or proteins from
ingredients. Manufacturers may add hydrogen to oil to make fat solid at
room temperature and prevent the oil from going rancid, but these fats are
known to cause inflammation and impair glucose regulation.
Ultra-processed foods include mass-produced versions of pastries,
breads, cakes, cookies, nut milks, “nuggets” made of ground meat or soy,
chips, crackers, granola bars, and other snack foods. Below is a short list of
examples of ultra-processed foods. While these are considered normal foods
in our culture, you should avoid them as strongly as if they were illicit
drugs. Every item below has either refined sugar, ultra-processed grains, or
industrially refined seed and vegetable oils—three classes of foods that
need to be avoided for Good Energy. There are many brands that produce
the food items on this list, but I am highlighting some of the most popular
brands:
Beverages:
1. Sweetened juice (e.g., SunnyD, Ocean Spray)
2. Energy drinks (e.g., Red Bull)
3. Flavored coffee creamers (e.g., Nestlé Coffee mate)
4. Nondairy milks (e.g., Oatly, Silk)
5. Flavored milks (e.g., Nesquik, Horizon Strawberry milk)
6. Fruit-flavored drinks (e.g., Capri-Sun)
7. Sports drinks (e.g., Gatorade)
8. Sweetened teas (e.g., AriZona and Nestea)
9. Soda (e.g., Coca-Cola, Diet Coke, and Coke Zero)

10. Artificially flavored water (e.g., Dasani Drops)
11. Fruit punch (e.g., Hawaiian Punch)
12. Flavored ice beverages (e.g., Slurpee, Icee)
Bakery and Desserts:
1. Cake mixes (e.g., Pillsbury)
2. Store-bought icing (e.g., Betty Crocker)
3. Chocolate bars (e.g., Snickers)
4. Cookies (e.g., Oreo, Chips Ahoy!)
5. Doughnuts (e.g., Krispy Kreme, Hostess Donettes)
6. Frozen waffles and pancakes (e.g., Eggo)
7. Packaged bread (e.g., Wonder Bread)
8. Sweet rolls and pastries (e.g., Cinnabon and Pillsbury)
9. Packaged cakes (e.g., Twinkies)
10. Muffins (e.g., Entenmann’s)
11. Sweet crackers (e.g., Honey Maid)
Cereals and Granolas:
1. Cereal bars (e.g., Nature Valley)
2. Instant oatmeal packets (e.g., Quaker)
3. Granolas with refined sugars (e.g., Kellogg’s Special K Granola, Kashi
GO)
4. Sweetened cereals (e.g., Froot Loops)
5. Toaster pastries (e.g., Pop-Tarts)
Dairy:
1. Flavored yogurts (e.g., Yoplait and Go-Gurt)
2. Processed cheese slices (e.g., Kraft Singles)
3. Sweetened condensed milk (e.g., Eagle Brand)
4. Whipped toppings (e.g., Cool Whip, Reddi-wip)

Meat and Poultry:
1. Chicken nuggets (e.g., McDonald’s or Tyson)
2. Deli meats (e.g., Oscar Mayer and Boar’s Head)
3. Hot dogs (e.g., Nathan’s Famous)
4. Meatballs (e.g., Chef Boyardee)
5. Sausages (e.g., Jimmy Dean)
6. Bacon (e.g., Oscar Mayer)
7. Beef jerky (e.g., Jack Link’s)
Snacks:
1. Cheese puffs (e.g., Cheetos)
2. Chips (e.g., Doritos)
3. Crackers (e.g., Ritz)
4. Flavored popcorn (e.g., Smartfood)
5. Processed snacks (e.g., Combos or Dunkaroos)
6. Fruit snacks (e.g., Fruit Gushers, Welch’s, Mott’s)
Frozen Foods:
1. Frozen pizza (e.g., DiGiorno)
2. Frozen dinners (e.g., Hungry-Man)
3. Frozen burritos (e.g., El Monterey)
4. Frozen chicken wings (e.g., Tyson)
5. Frozen fish sticks (e.g., Gorton’s)
Sauces and Condiments:
1. Barbecue sauce with added sugar (e.g., Sweet Baby Ray’s)
2. Ketchup (e.g., Heinz)
3. Mayonnaise (e.g., Hellmann’s)
4. Salad dressings (e.g., Hidden Valley)
5. Vegetable and seed oils (e.g., Crisco or Wesson)

Packaged Meals:
1. Mac and cheese (e.g., Kraft or Annie’s)
2. Hamburger helper (e.g., Betty Crocker)
3. Pizza rolls (e.g., Totino’s)
4. Instant mashed potatoes (e.g., Idahoan)
5. Ramen noodle cups (e.g., Nissin Cup Noodles)
6. Lunch packs (e.g., Lunchables)
Frozen Desserts:
1. Ice cream bars and sandwiches (e.g., Magnum and Nestlé Drumstick)
2. Popsicles (e.g., Fla-Vor-Ice)
3. Sorbet (e.g., Häagen-Dazs)
4. Sherbet (e.g., Baskin-Robbins)
5. Ice cream (e.g., Ben & Jerry’s)
Soups and Broths:
1. Canned soups (e.g., Campbell’s Chicken Noodle)
2. Dry soup mixes (e.g., Lipton Noodle Soup)
3. Instant ramen noodles (e.g., Maruchan)
4. Bouillon cubes (e.g., Knorr)
5. Gravy mixes (e.g., McCormick)
Spreads:
1. Chocolate hazelnut spreads (e.g., Nutella)
2. Peanut butter with added sugar (e.g., Jif)
3. Jelly and jam (e.g., Smucker’s)
4. Marshmallow fluff (e.g., Fluff)
5. Sweet spreads (e.g., Smucker’s Goober peanut butter and jelly spreads)
Many new packaged food brands are working to bring to the market
healthier, sustainable versions of ultra-processed foods. Examples include
organic frozen pizzas made with simple cauliflower and seed-flour crusts

topped with mozzarella cheese and sugar-free tomato sauce, as well as
packaged pastas made with organic legume or nut flours. Many packaged
foods can be part of a healthy, Good Energy eating plan, but make sure to
look closely at the labels to ensure you’re buying organic ingredients
without added sugars, refined grains, or seed and vegetable oils.

A Tale of Three Yogurts: Which is Ultra-Processed?
Ultra-Processed (Never Eat)
Dannon Light + Fit Yogurt. Contains Cultured Nonfat Milk, Water, Fructose,
Natural & Artificial Flavors, Modified Food Starch, Acesulfame Potassium,
Sucralose, Citric Acid, Potassium Sorbate, Yogurt Cultures—eleven
ingredients, chemicals known to disrupt the microbiome
Yoplait Kids Cup. Contains Low Fat Milk, Sugar, Modified Corn Starch, Corn
Starch, Natural Flavor, Potassium Sorbate, Red 40, Blue 1, Yellow 5, Vitamin A
Acetate, Vitamin D3—eleven ingredients, zero active cultures, colorings known
to be toxic and require warning labels in Europe. For example, in vitro
experiments found potassium ascorbate to be genotoxic and have a negative
effect on immunity, and some research links hyperactivity and inattention in
children to coloring agents.

Minimally Processed (Good to Eat)
Straus Whole Milk Organic Greek Yogurt. Organic Whole Milk, Yogurt
Cultures—two ingredients, live active cultures, cows are pasture-raised on
pesticide-free grass
Choose a yogurt that is organic, has minimal ingredients (ideally just milk and
cultures), has no added sugar, and says “live active cultures” on the label.

Ultra-processed foods also have a massive environmental cost. For
example, a one-liter bottle of grapeseed oil requires about 120 pounds of
tiny grape seeds to produce, or about one ton of grapes. Frequently, ultraprocessed foods are stored in plastic and other unsustainable materials that
go into landfills. Most ultra-processed foods are made from crops that are

grown conventionally, so on top of decimating our health, these foods are
environmentally devastating and wasteful.
You might be thinking, Isn’t the cost of eating unrefined or minimally
refined, sustainably sourced foods too high for most people? Here’s a
possibly uncomfortable truth: you will either pay for healthy food up front
or you will pay for preventable medical issues and lost productivity in the
future. Medical issues are the cause of nearly 70 percent of U.S.
bankruptcies. Adults with obesity experience 100 percent higher annual
medical care costs. Those costs increase steeply as weight increases. People
with type 2 diabetes incur average medical expenditures of almost $17,000
annually. People with chronic illnesses, like cardiometabolic disease, lose
up to 80 annual work hours, with the annual cost of lost work productivity
spanning up to $10,000. The odds of having been absent from work are 1.4
times higher in people with obesity compared to those without. Obviously,
our health and food industries are letting us down: subsidizing ultraprocessed food and initiating health care only when we are sick with
metabolic diseases to “manage.” It is a shortcoming of public policy that it
is cheaper for a lower-income family to purchase a Coke than a bottle of
water at many supermarkets (because the Coke has so many subsidized
ingredients). We must change the incentive structures of our food and health
system—but until then do whatever is in our power to reject ultra-processed
food. Here are several tips to do this on a budget:

STOCKING THE GOOD ENERGY KITCHEN
Here are a few of my favorite ways to get organic food as cheaply as
possible.
Buy frozen organic fruits, vegetables, meats, and wild-caught fish in
bulk, or buy fresh and freeze. I get four pounds of organic frozen
cauliflower rice weekly at Costco for under $10, which makes close to
eight meals.

Cook large batches of organic beans or lentils in the slow cooker or
stovetop. Bulk organic beans and lentils are often less than $4 per
pound.
Purchase the cheapest organic nuts and seeds in bulk. For instance,
organic pine nuts can be upward of $44 per pound, while organic flax
and chia seeds are often less than $6 per pound.
Purchase whatever organic produce happens to be on sale. Doing so has
had the added benefit of getting me to try new foods!
Buy wild-caught canned fish, like salmon, instead of fresh fish.
Join a community-sponsored agriculture (CSA) program or sign up for
an organic produce delivery service that ships misshapen foods that
otherwise would go to waste (like Imperfect Foods).
Replace meat and fish with plant-based proteins, like beans and lentils,
for some meals to cut costs.
Talk to farmers at the farmers’ market to get the best deals. Farmers
will often reduce the price of certain items that they have in excess that
week. Additionally, there are many farms that use no synthetic
pesticides but have not gone through the costly and lengthy process to
obtain official USDA organic certification. Their products will be
chemical-free and likely cheaper than certified organic, and are a great
option.
Good Energy Foods

Working off our list above of what categories of foods will—and will not—
support Good Energy, we now need to zoom in on how to build a meal.
Aiming for a Good Energy–supporting dietary plan is as simple as making
sure you maximize five things and remove three things.
Every day (and ideally every meal) should include the following:
1. Micronutrients and Antioxidants
Micronutrients and antioxidants tell the mitochondria, “You are
resilient.”
Micronutrients are small molecules—like magnesium, zinc, selenium,
and B vitamins—that serve four main functions in the cell supporting Good

Energy.
They are structurally incorporated into proteins to enable them to
function properly.
Example: The micronutrient selenium gets incorporated into
proteins called selenoproteins, which have key roles as protective
antioxidants and in healthy immune cell function.
They serve as cofactors that allow for chemical reactions in the cell,
like those in the final stages of making ATP in the mitochondria.
Example: B vitamins bind to protein enzymes in the
mitochondria, creating slight shifts in the protein structure to
allow for sequential steps in ATP production.
They act as antioxidants to reduce damage from oxidative stress that
can impair metabolic processes and mitochondrial function.
Example: Vitamin E can insert itself into cell membranes and
donate electrons to neutralize reactive free radicals that can
damage and destroy the fats in cell membranes, leading to chronic
inflammation if left unchecked.
They become precursors for key biologic processes.
Example: Vitamin B₃, also called niacin, is a precursor for NAD+
and NADP+, which are involved in more than five hundred
chemical reactions in the cell, including serving as electron
carriers in the mitochondria during the production of ATP.
Micronutrients facilitate the optimal action of many key biological
processes, including how the body handles glucose. Unfortunately, our
ultra-processed diets are more micronutrient depleted than ever, due to poor
soil and excess processing.
Your roughly thirty-seven trillion cells can contain a thousand or more
mitochondria, each with innumerable proteins embedded in their
membranes that act as tiny molecular machines as part of the electron
transport chain (ETC) assembly line of making ATP. Those ETC proteins
require adequate levels of specific micronutrients to function correctly.

These vitamins, minerals, trace metals, and antioxidants are crucial links in
chain reactions that regulate every part of your body’s metabolism. In many
cases, these micronutrients are bound to these large protein complexes to
create the “just right” molecular conditions that let the tiny biological
machines work correctly.
Example: Micronutrient CoQ10 Supports Fertility

An example of how critical micronutrients are for Good Energy is CoQ10’s
role in fertility: CoQ10 is a micronutrient that is required for transferring
electrons in the ETC, while also embedding in the cell membrane to offer
antioxidant protection. After eggs are released from the ovary at ovulation,
they undergo rapid “aging” and degradation as they make their way to the
uterus, with many changes occurring to mitochondrial activity and
mitochondria structure. CoQ10, which serves as a mitochondrial cofactor
and improves mitochondrial function, significantly improves egg aging after
ovulation. It reduces levels of oxidative stress and DNA damage and
inhibits cell death pathways, thereby preserving egg (oocyte) quality. Give
your mitochondria what it needs, and it will perform for you with flying
colors, including supporting the health of a future baby.

Key Micronutrients for Good Energy:
MICRONUTRIENT: Vitamin D
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS

Enhances expression of insulin receptors and glucose transporter channels.
Increases the expression of mitochondrial genes involved in energy metabolism.
Reduces mitochondrial oxidative stress.
Regulates the expression of genes involved in inflammation and antioxidant
defenses.
SOURCES

Fatty fish (salmon, tuna, mackerel), egg yolks, mushrooms

MICRONUTRIENT: Magnesium
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Facilitates ATP synthesis by participating in the reactions that produce and utilize
ATP in the ETC.

Reduces oxidative stress and enhances activity of mitochondrial enzymes.
Regulates glucose and fat metabolism by activating enzymes involved in glucose
uptake, glycogen (stored glucose) synthesis, and fatty acid oxidation.
SOURCES
Nuts (almonds, cashews), seeds (pumpkin, sunflower), spinach, beans (black, kidney)

MICRONUTRIENT: Selenium
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Serves as a cofactor for antioxidant enzymes, such as glutathione peroxidase.

Enhances expression and activity of insulin-signaling proteins.
Enhances thyroid function by promoting the synthesis and conversion of thyroid
hormones, which regulate metabolic rate and energy production.
SOURCES

Brazil nuts, tuna, turkey, sardines, chicken, eggs

MICRONUTRIENT: Zinc
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS

Participates in the ETC as a cofactor.
Increases activity of antioxidant enzymes.
Regulates glucose and fat metabolism by activating enzymes involved in insulin
signaling, glucose uptake, and fatty acid oxidation.
SOURCES
Oysters, beef, pumpkin seeds, beans (chickpeas, kidney), dark chocolate

MICRONUTRIENT: Vitamins B₁, B₂, B₃, B₅, B₆, B₇, B₉, B12
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Participate in various steps of energy metabolism, such as the breakdown of
glucose before entering the mitochondria, the production of ATP in the
mitochondria, and the synthesis of fatty acids and amino acids.

Act as cofactors for enzymes in the ETC and by regulating the expression of
mitochondrial genes.

Regulate inflammation and oxidative stress by modulating the expression of genes
involved in these processes.
SOURCES
B₁: pork, brown rice, sunflower seeds, beans, nuts

B₂: milk, almonds, spinach, eggs, mushrooms
B₃: beef, chicken, peanuts, mushrooms, avocados
B₅: chicken, sweet potatoes, mushrooms, lentils, avocados
B₆: chickpeas, tuna, salmon, potatoes, bananas
B₇: eggs, almonds, sweet potatoes, spinach, broccoli
B₉: spinach, asparagus, avocados, beans (black, kidney)
B12: beef, clams, salmon, milk, eggs

MICRONUTRIENT: Alpha lipoic acid
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS

Acts as a cofactor for enzymes involved in the ETC.
Enhances glucose uptake and insulin sensitivity by activating proteins involved in
glucose transport and insulin signaling.
Reduces inflammation and oxidative stress by modulating the activity of genes
involved in these processes.
SOURCES
Spinach, broccoli, tomatoes, organ meats (liver, kidney)

MICRONUTRIENT: Manganese
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Participates in the synthesis of ATP in the ETC by stabilizing and activating protein
enzymes.

Enhances antioxidant defenses by serving as a cofactor for antioxidant enzymes,
such as superoxide dismutase.
Activates enzymes involved in glucose uptake and utilization.
SOURCES
Nuts (almonds, pecans), beans (lima, black), tea

MICRONUTRIENT: Vitamin E
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Acts as an antioxidant.

Enhances insulin signaling.

Supports immune function, which indirectly supports metabolic health by reducing
inflammation and infection.
SOURCES
Almonds, sunflower seeds, avocados, spinach, sweet potatoes

MICRONUTRIENT: CoQ10
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Shuttles electrons between respiratory complexes during the synthesis of ATP in
the electron transport chain.

Acts as an antioxidant by protecting against free radicals and reducing oxidative
stress.
Improves glucose metabolism and insulin sensitivity by enhancing insulin signaling
and reducing inflammation.
SOURCES

Organ meats (heart, liver), sardines, beef

MICRONUTRIENT: Taurine
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS

Supports mitochondrial function by enhancing the expression of genes involved in
energy metabolism and reducing oxidative stress.
Enhances insulin sensitivity by activating proteins involved in glucose transport and
metabolism.
Regulates inflammation and oxidative stress by modulating the expression of
genes involved in these.
SOURCES
Meat (beef, lamb), fish (mackerel, salmon), poultry (chicken, turkey), eggs

MICRONUTRIENT: L-carnitine
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Facilitates the transport of fatty acids into mitochondria for processing, thereby
promoting energy production and reducing lipid accumulation in tissues.

Reduces oxidative stress and improves the activity of mitochondrial enzymes.
Enhances insulin signaling and glucose uptake.
SOURCES

Red meat (beef, lamb), poultry (chicken, turkey), fish (cod, halibut)

MICRONUTRIENT: Creatine
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS
Converts to phosphocreatine, which can be rapidly converted to ATP during highintensity exercise or energy-demanding tasks.

Enhances activity of mitochondrial enzymes and reduces oxidative stress.
Helps regulate inflammation and antioxidant genes.
SOURCES

Red meat (beef, lamb), fish (salmon, tuna), poultry (chicken, turkey), pork, eggs

MICRONUTRIENT: Vitamin C
GOOD ENERGY BENEFITS

Promotes expression of mitochondrial genes involved in energy metabolism and
reducing oxidative stress.
Acts as an antioxidant by protecting against free radicals and reducing oxidative
stress.
SOURCES

Citrus fruits (oranges, lemons), strawberries, broccoli, bell peppers, tomatoes, kiwi

Another key class of micronutrients is polyphenols, which are tiny plant
chemicals that have incredible biologic effects, including acting as
antioxidants and feeding the microbiome. While we typically think of fiber
as being the food substance fermented by the microbiome, recent evidence
suggests that the microbial transformation of polyphenols through
fermentation can yield metabolites that can enter the body and promote a
range of positive biological effects, including acting as protective
neurotransmitters in the brain and directly reducing the growth of cancer
cells, including stopping cancer cells from taking up glucose for energy.
More than eight thousand known polyphenols exist in plants, and they offer
a Swiss Army knife of benefits for cells. Of course, ultra-processing ruins
this. When plants go through ultra-processing, like processing corn to make
cornflakes, the polyphenols are largely lost.
Foods with the highest polyphenol count are dried spices and herbs,
followed by cocoa, dark berries, seeds and nuts, many vegetables, coffee,

and tea.
Eating a diverse array of foods from the list on these pages will ensure
you get various micronutrients.

Best Antioxidant Sources
We’ve learned that antioxidant intake is a key aspect of promoting Good Energy by
reducing oxidative stress. Foods with the very highest levels of antioxidants or
polyphenols per 100 grams include the following:
Almonds
Allspice, dried
Amla berries, dried
Apples
Artichokes
Asparagus
Bay leaves, dried
Basil, dried
Black beans
Black chokeberries
Black elderberries
Black pepper, dried
Blackberries
Black tea
Blueberries
Broccoli
Capers
Caraway seeds, dried
Cayenne pepper, dried
Celery leaves, dried
Cherries
Chives, dried
Chili, dried
Cinnamon bark, dried
Clove, dried
Cocoa powder
Coffee beans
Cumin, dried
Curry powder
Dandelion leaves, dried
Dark chocolate
Dill, fresh or dried

Fennel leaves, dried
Fennel seeds, dried
Ginger, fresh or dried
Green mint, dried
Green olives, with stone
Green tea
Hazelnut
Kalamata olives, with stone
Lavender, dried
Mustard seed, dried
Nutmeg, dried
Oregano, fresh or dried
Paprika, dried
Peaches
Pecans
Peppermint, dried
Pistachios
Plums
Pomegranate, whole
Red lettuce
Red onion
Rose flower, dried
Rosemary, fresh or dried
Saffron, dried
Shallots
Spinach
Strawberries
Tempeh
Thyme, dried
Turmeric, dried
Vanilla seeds
Walnuts
White beans
Wild marjoram leaves, dried

2. Omega-3 Fatty Acids
Omega-3 fatty acids tell the cell, “You are safe.”
We’ve learned previously that omega-3 fatty acids—including ALA,
EPA, and DHA—are a type of polyunsaturated fatty acid, key for elements

of cell structure, inflammatory pathways, and metabolic pathways. Omega3s also contribute to artery elasticity.
Getting enough omega-3s also limits the impact of omega-6s, a fatty
acid that, in excess, is associated with inflammation. The standard Western
diet contains a ratio of as much as 20:1 omega-6s to omega-3s when it
should be closer to 1:1. The higher ratio is largely due to high consumption
of refined seed and vegetable oils (including canola, soybean, vegetable,
safflower, sunflower, and corn oils—all high in omega-6s) and less
consumption of omega-3-rich whole foods, like wild fatty fish, chia seeds,
flaxseeds, and walnuts.
Chronic inflammation is a key aspect of Bad Energy. Many people talk
about how omega-3 fats are “anti-inflammatory.” What does this really
mean? The first thing to understand is that the composition of omega-6 and
omega-3 fats in the diet directly determines the ratio of these types of fats in
your cell membranes, including all immune cells. In the cell membranes,
these fats serve very different purposes. Immune cells can harvest omega-6
fats in the membrane to manufacture signaling molecules that tend to
exacerbate and lengthen an inflammatory reaction. On the other hand,
immune cells can use omega-3s to manufacture signaling molecules that
decrease inflammatory genetic pathways and ultimately resolve the
inflammatory processes. Omega-3s can directly decrease the activity of NFϰB—the master inflammatory pathway—to turn it down after an
inflammatory episode.
Imagine a person with a high omega-6 concentration in the cell
membrane of their immune cells. They get infected with a virus, perhaps the
one that causes COVID-19. The body works to attack this virus. We expect
collateral damage to the body—swelling, inflammation, oxidative stress,
spewing toxic substances to kill virally infected cells. But once the person’s
immune cells kill the infected cells, all that warring needs to stop. And if
the person has adequate omega-3s in their immune cell membrane, the cell
will literally snip the omega-3s from the membrane and use them to
manufacture resolvins and protectins, two types of specialized pro-resolving
mediators (SPMs) to ease the war. But in the average American, where the

omega-6 to omega-3 ratio is now extremely high, the fatty acid the cell
grabs for and snips is much more likely to be an omega-6, which generates
signals to keep the war going. This is chronic inflammation. Remember, the
cells are blind and reach from whatever is around them. Your job with
eating a better omega-3 to omega-6 ratio in food is to increase the
probability that your cells manufacture the health-promoting, antiinflammatory signaling molecules you need, like resolvins and protectins.
How you feed yourself determines the likelihood of having chronic
inflammation.
The best way to get omega-3s in your meals is to eat the following:
Chia seeds
Basil seeds
Flaxseeds
Walnuts
Hemp seeds
Sardines
Mackerel
Herring
Anchovies
Salmon
Trout
Fish roe or caviar
Oysters
Pasture-raised, 100 percent grass-fed game (venison, bison), beef,
lamb, and eggs
3. Fiber
Fiber tells the microbiome, “I love you.”
Fiber is a type of carbohydrate found in plants that is not fully broken
down by the body and therefore does not get converted to glucose in the
bloodstream. Instead, the gut microbiome ferments fiber into beneficial

“postbiotic” by-products like short-chain fatty acids (SCFAs)—including
butyrate, acetate, and propionate—that get absorbed into the body through
the gut and regulate metabolism and improve insulin and glucose levels,
regulate hunger and appetite, as well as promote anti-inflammatory effects
in the gut and body. Fiber can help protect the gut’s lining and mucus
membrane, and slow digestion and absorption of nutrients. Colon cells are
unique in that they use microbiome-derived SCFAs as a key fuel source, so
the microbiome’s adequate production of these molecules through
fermentation of fiber is critical for a healthy gut lining. Without adequate
energy, the gut lining can become a weak barrier between what is in the gut
and what enters the bloodstream, a phenomenon called “intestinal
permeability” or “leaky gut.” When this happens, the gut becomes like a
tattered piece of fabric (on the microscopic level), and harmful substances
can enter the bloodstream and generate chronic inflammation, which we
know is a root of many chronic diseases. As one research group noted, “The
loss of (gut) barrier integrity is considered to contribute to inflammatory
bowel disease, obesity, and metabolic disorders.” In his book Fat Chance,
Dr. Robert Lustig describes fiber as being “half of the solution” to the
obesity epidemic. Despite this, the majority of people do not consume
nearly enough fiber. The USDA’s Dietary Guidelines for Americans state
that over 90 percent of women and 97 percent of men do not meet the
recommended daily intake of fiber, which is already set at an extremely low
25 to 31 grams per day (depending on age and gender). Ideally, we should
aim to consume 50 grams or more of fiber daily.
The best ways to get fiber in your meals include eating the following:
Chia seeds
Basil seeds
Flaxseeds
Beans, especially lupini beans
Tiger nuts
Konjac root
Artichokes

Chicory
Jicama
Avocados
Pistachios
Raspberries
Lentils
Split peas
Almonds
Hazelnuts
Pecans
The American Gut Project research showed that people with the
healthiest microbiomes eat at least thirty different plant foods per week.
Remember: conditions like depression and schizophrenia are so tied to poor
gut bacteria that researchers can identify a person with depression or
schizophrenia just by analyzing their gut bacteria composition. Get plant
diversity and fiber.
In clinical practice, I have found that patients often have
transformational improvement in their metabolic health and biomarkers
when they aggressively increase fiber from natural foods. This is akin to
magic for many. Beans and lentils have been shrouded in controversy
because the Paleo diet, autoimmune protocol diet (AIP), and ketogenic diet
eliminate these items out of concerns for inflammatory potential or
carbohydrate content. For people with autoimmune issues and/or severe gut
dysfunction, working with a functional medicine doctor can be beneficial to
ensure that any foods you’re introducing are supporting your healing
journey, including beans and lentils. There may be compounds in beans and
lentils that can promote inflammation in the context of a damaged gut
lining, so some people may benefit from improving the integrity of the gut
lining through a multi-modal diet and lifestyle strategy before introducing
certain foods. However, for most people with good gut function, I
recommend liberally including beans and lentils for their incredible
polyphenol and fiber content. Personalized testing can help guide and
empower you in all of this decision-making: for me, I eat beans and lentils

daily, and I know they do not produce an appreciable glucose rise on my
CGM data. Nor do they knock me out of a state of ketone production (based
on finger prick ketone testing). My hsCRP (inflammation) levels are
consistently less than 0.3 mg/dL (the lowest level possible), and my
autoimmune markers are all negative on my lab testing. Given this, I can
confidently say these foods are not leading to chronic inflammation or
autoimmunity in my body. Rather than adhering to a dietary philosophy
based simply on faith, test your biomarkers regularly and adjust your plan
accordingly.
For someone who does see a large glucose rise with beans or lentils, it
may be useful to either balance these foods with fat and protein, or aim to
get additional fiber through lower carbohydrate fiber-packed foods like chia
seeds, basil seeds, and flaxseeds. Over time with additional fiber and
polyphenols, the microbiome and insulin sensitivity may change such that
beans and lentils can be tolerated without a large spike.
4. Fermented Foods
Fermented foods tell the body, “You can do it.”
Our gut microbiome plays a critical role in digestion, nutrient
absorption, immune function, and mental health. Disruption to the balance
of beneficial and harmful bacteria in our gut can lead to various health
issues, including digestive problems, inflammation, and even mood
disorders. Probiotic-rich foods contain live microorganisms, such as
beneficial bacteria and yeast, that are like those found naturally in our gut
microbiome. When we consume these foods, the live microorganisms can
colonize and multiply in our gut, helping to maintain a healthy balance of
beneficial bacteria and supporting overall gut health. Fermented foods are
helpful because of their bacterial, probiotic content. But they are also
helpful because of the postbiotics in the food. Postbiotics are the products
of bacterial fermentation, like short-chain fatty acids (SCFAs). A major
benefit of fiber-rich foods is that the bacteria in your gut will ferment the
fiber to by-products, like SCFAs. But these SCFAs can also be present in

fermented foods themselves as a by-product of the live cultures doing the
fermenting.
Recent research shows that a diet high in fermented foods (around six
servings per day) significantly increases microbiota diversity and decreases
inflammatory markers. Six servings might sound like a lot. But adding a
little bit here and there in every meal will be easier if you load your kitchen
with various probiotic sources. I top almost every savory dish (like eggs,
tofu scrambles, salad, stir-fries, or fish) with about half a cup of colorful
sauerkraut or a dollop of spiced yogurt—logging an easy two to three
servings of fermented foods. I also use tempeh as a protein source, season
meals and sauces with miso, have yogurt in my midday snack and dessert
rotation, and drink very low-sugar kombucha as a treat.
The best ways to get fermented foods in your diet include consuming the
following:
Sauerkraut (Note: pickles are different from sauerkraut and do not
contain live cultures)
Fermented vegetables (like fermented beets, carrots, and onions; again,
these are not the same as pickles. Pickles get their sour flavor from
being submerged in vinegar and sugar rather than through natural
bacterial fermentation.)
Minimally processed yogurt
Kefir
Natto
Tempeh
Kombucha (Note: I only recommend kombucha that has less than 2
grams of sugar per serving, ideally from honey or fruit. Read labels
carefully.)
Miso
Kimchi
Brine-cured olives
Beet kvass
Water kefir

5. Protein
Protein tells the cells, “Let’s build!”
Dietary protein is an indispensable macronutrient that is essential for
maintaining metabolic homeostasis. Protein is composed of amino acids,
which serve as the structural and functional building blocks of numerous
metabolic and physiological processes. Adequate protein intake is necessary
for the synthesis and maintenance of skeletal muscle tissue, which plays a
key role in regulating metabolic health by both being a glucose-absorbing
sink as well as releasing hormones called myokines that can be antiinflammatory and improve insulin sensitivity.
Various amino acids have been identified as critical for protein synthesis
and the maintenance of skeletal muscle tissue. For example, leucine is an
essential amino acid that stimulates muscle protein synthesis and has been
shown to play a pivotal role in regulating muscle mass and function.
Sources of leucine include animal-based proteins, such as beef, chicken,
and fish, as well as plant-based sources, such as soybeans and lentils. Other
amino acids, such as lysine and methionine, are also important for the
regulation of muscle protein synthesis and the maintenance of muscle mass.
These amino acids are found in a variety of protein sources, including dairy
products, eggs, meat, and legumes.
Furthermore, protein intake has been shown to impact energy balance
and body weight regulation through its effects on satiety, thermogenesis,
and fat metabolism. High-protein diets have been shown to have positive
effects on weight loss and prevent weight regain. Protein has a high thermic
effect, meaning that it requires more energy to digest and metabolize
compared to carbohydrates or fats. This increased energy expenditure can
lead to greater energy balance and a potential reduction in body weight.
Additionally, dietary protein has been shown to increase satiety and reduce
food intake, which can lead to a reduction in overall calorie intake and
improved body composition. Certain amino acids in proteins have a
stimulatory effect on specific satiety hormones, like cholecystokinin and
GLP-1.
The best ways to get more in your diet include eating the following:

Meats: Beef, chicken, turkey, pork, and game meats like elk and bison
Fish and seafood
Dairy products: Milk, cheese, and yogurt are all good sources of
protein and leucine. Greek yogurt is especially high in protein.
Eggs: Eggs are a complete source of protein that contains all essential
amino acids, including leucine.
Legumes: Legumes, such as beans, lentils, and peas, are plant-based
sources of protein that are also rich in fiber, vitamins, and minerals.
They are a good option for vegetarians and vegans looking to increase
their protein intake.
Soy products: Soybeans and soy products such as tofu and tempeh
Nuts and seeds: Hemp seeds, chia seeds, pumpkin seeds, almonds,
sunflower seeds, flaxseeds, cashews, pistachios
If using protein powders, choose organic and/or grass-fed or
regenerative (if animal-based) with minimal ingredients, no added
sugars, no colorings, no “natural flavors” or artificial flavors, no gums,
and no ingredient names you aren’t familiar with.
You’ll find endless debates about protein—regarding bioavailability,
completeness, the amount needed for optimal longevity versus optimal
muscle growth, plant versus animal protein, and whether refined forms like
protein powders are okay. I’m not going to resolve these debates here, but I
recommend reading Dr. Gabrielle Lyon’s book Forever Strong for a deep
dive into protein. Protein cannot be an afterthought in our diet as it has been
for decades, as so many of the critical metabolic processes in our bodies
depend on it. As we get older and muscle mass naturally declines, we must
actively fight this process with thoughtful protein intake and regular,
consistent resistance training. The Recommended Daily Allowance (RDA)
for protein is 0.8 grams per kilogram (0.36 grams per pound) of body
weight, which doesn’t account for activity level or dynamic metabolic
needs (like recovering from illness). For a very active 79-kilogram (174pound) person like myself, the RDA would suggest 64 grams of protein per
day, or about 20 grams per meal. This is likely not enough. I favor a higher

value of a minimum of 30 grams of protein at every meal to promote
satiety, minimize blood sugar fluctuations, and provide my body with the
necessary building blocks for protein and muscle synthesis. Aim for
diverse, whole foods sources like those listed above.
Bad Energy Foods

If you remember one food principle in this book, remember that cutting the
unholy trinity of these three ingredients from your diet will completely
change your health and ensure you’re making room for more Good Energy
foods:
1. Refined added sugar
2. Refined industrial vegetable and seed oils
3. Refined grains
Let’s examine why these three ingredients contribute so much to Bad
Energy.
1. Refined Added Sugar
Refined added sugar causes astronomically more deaths and disability per
year than COVID-19 and fentanyl overdoses combined. We need to see
refined added sugar for what it is: an addictive, dangerous drug that has
been included in 74 percent of foods in the U.S. food system and for which
the body needs zero grams in a lifetime. Of all the levers most damaging
our cells and preventing Good Energy, I believe the worst offender may be
added sugar. This substance has become a mainstay of food that we and our
children eat regularly. As Dr. Robert Lustig has noted, sugar shows up on
labels in fifty-six different names and sneaks in everywhere.
While dozens of types of refined sugar are added to foods, chief among
the offenders is high-fructose corn syrup, which is a brand-new substance
(in the context of human history) wreaking havoc on the ability of our cells
to make energy. Fructose employs a glucose-independent mechanism to

compound the dysfunction of the cell’s energy-producing capabilities. As
we learned earlier, fructose (which is also found in fruit in its natural,
unrefined form) shuts down our body’s satiety signals to drive the consumer
(historically, an animal preparing for hibernation in the winter) to eat more
and store fat. But now we are in a constant fed state, and the industrial food
manufactured with this additive shuts down our satiety cues and drives us to
eat insatiably. Consider this: when a kid drinks one bottle of Coke, they
ingest as much added sugar as they might have had in an entire year if they
were living 150 years ago.

No Liquid Calories
Liquids make up 22 percent of the American diet, and almost all liquids, aside from
water, black coffee, and unsweetened tea, contain empty calories that promote bad
energy with no benefits. Not drinking your calories is one of the simplest and
easiest cuts to reduce sugar and other chemicals that hurt energy regulation.
Eliminate all juice, soda, Frappuccinos, flavored milks, sweetened nondairy
milks, Gatorade and other sports drinks, energy drinks, Slurpees, and sugary liquid
toppings like syrup. Sugar that comes in liquid form is digested quickly and
overwhelms the energy systems. (Homemade protein- and vegetable-packed
blended smoothies like the ones on these pages are an exception.). Alcoholic
drinks also destabilize blood sugar, in part by directly damaging mitochondrial
function and generating oxidative stress, and should be minimized.
Instead, focus on drinking water; sparkling water; tea; coffee with no added
sugar and either full-fat milk or unsweetened organic nondairy milk; or water with
lemon and a pinch of sea salt.
Note on alcohol: While some studies show that people who drink small amounts
of alcohol may have lower risk of type 2 diabetes, there is other research showing
that there may be no safe level of alcohol for the brain and that even small amounts
of alcohol (the amount in about one drink) can significantly reduce the recovery
impact of sleep and nervous system regulation. Heavy alcohol use increases
oxidative stress, disturbs the microbiome, damages the liver, decreases fat
oxidation in liver mitochondria (leading to stored fat in the liver), and generates
inflammation. Limiting alcohol intake is necessary for optimal metabolic health. If
you do consume alcohol, here are some strategies to follow for less negative
impact:
Always choose organic spirits and wine. For wine and champagne, try to
additionally source biodynamically farmed wine. Conventional (non-biodynamic)

wines can contain pesticides, additives, and sugars, many of which never need
to be disclosed on the label.
Avoid beer, which can increase uric acid levels.
When making cocktails, avoid excess sugars like simple syrup, store-bought
mixes, or excess fruit juice. If you are going to have a fruit-forward drink, opt for
freshly squeezed lower glycemic organic fruit juices like lemon, lime, grapefruit,
and muddled berries.
Experiment with mocktails! There are many great brands of nonalcoholic
cocktails cropping up, like Ghia and Seedlip.
Dilute cocktails with sparkling water!
Space out your last drink from bedtime by at least a few hours to minimize
sleep disruption.
Understand that alcohol is a highly addictive and toxic substance that is
normalized due to industry-influenced marketing and policy. If you choose to drink,
choose your sources and timing wisely and limit it to a few drinks per month.
Limiting exposure will diminish cravings for it.

2. Refined Industrial Vegetable and Seed Oils
When I was visiting my dad recently, I scanned the refrigerator. He had just
made a trip to Whole Foods, and his fridge was stocked with organic items.
At the front of the fridge was a bottle of Organic Almond Creamer. Looking
at the nutrition label, I wasn’t surprised: the second ingredient was refined
sugar, and the third was canola oil, a refined seed oil. Next to this was
organic hummus, and the third ingredient listed was canola oil.
My dad’s house is full of health books. He makes a huge effort to eat
healthily. He grows vegetables. But even with the best intentions—from the
organic hummus to the artisanal almond milk—refined seed oils are a
primary ingredient. Today, almost everyone is falling victim to hidden
inflammatory oils and it is wrecking our health.
These industrially refined seed and vegetable oils include canola, corn,
sunflower, soybean, grapeseed, safflower, peanut, and cottonseed. Look at
almost any packaged food label from a large processed-food retailer, and
you’ll almost certainly see one of them.
The case against these refined vegetable and seed oils is very simple.
These oils are extremely high in omega-6 fats, which skews our omega-6 to
omega-3 ratio and increases inflammation in the body.

Since seed oils are cheaper to produce because of Farm Bill subsidies,
they have taken market share in the American diet over fats that humans
have relied on for thousands of years—such as olive oil, avocado oil,
coconut oil, and animal-based fats (like butter, tallow, or ghee)—which are
simply pressed from the flesh of a plant or rendered from the animal.
Creating seed oils, on the other hand, requires intensive industrial processes
and often involves extraction with chemical solvents like hexane, heating to
over 150°F, bleaching, and dewaxing. (Watch a video of canola oil
production to lose your appetite.)
Since 1909, our consumption of soybean oil (the most popular seed oil)
has increased by a thousand times. Today, soybean oil is the largest source
of calories for people in the United States—more so than beef, pork, and
vegetables. Our soybean oil consumption, along with our following of the
disastrous 1990s guidance to reduce fat in favor of refined carbohydrates,
has robbed our diet of a key anti-inflammatory food (omega-3 fats) and
substituted it with inflammatory oils and sugar.
3. Refined Grains
A “whole grain” is a type of grain that has all of its main parts: bran, germ,
and endosperm. A corn kernel, an individual grain of brown rice, and a
wheat berry are examples of whole grains, as no part of the whole grain has
been removed. The bran is the outermost layer of the kernel and is generally
rich in fiber, B vitamins, and minerals. The germ is the small, nutrient-dense
part of the kernel that contains fat and micronutrients. Inside the bran is the
endosperm, which is the majority of the kernel and contains the most starch.
If you imagine a kernel as an egg, the bran is the shell, the germ is the yolk,
and the endosperm is the egg white. Crush a whole grain and use it for
making a product like bread and you get a “whole grain” processed item.
But refining a whole grain to remove the bran and germ (leaving just the
starchy endosperm), and you’re in ultra-processed, dangerous territory. This
is done because it can give the final product a chewier, fluffier texture (by
removing the fibrous bran) and increases shelf life (by removing the germ,
which contains fat that can go rancid). Since most of the vitamins are

removed when the bran is removed, manufacturers will often “enrich” a
refined grain product with synthetic versions of vitamins and minerals. As
fiber is removed with the bran during refining, manufacturers may also add
back in refined fiber products like inulin and pectin.
Ultra-processed grains are bad for health for many reasons. Without
natural fiber, endosperm-predominant preprocessed carbohydrates are more
rapidly absorbed into the bloodstream from the gut, which leads to
increased blood glucose levels soon after eating. Fiber slows digestion and
contributes to more stable blood sugar, while also supporting the health of
the microbiome. Consuming refined grains can lead to a diet low in
important nutrients and high in empty calories. They also are almost
invariably conventionally grown with heavy pesticide use. In addition,
many highly processed grain-based products are high in added sugars and
unhealthy fats, as these often get combined in ultra-processed foods.
Research in over one hundred thousand adults followed for an average
of 9.4 years showed that people who consumed the highest amount of
refined grains (more than 350 grams per day) had a 27 percent higher risk
of death and 33 percent higher risk of cardiovascular events (such as heart
attack or stroke) when compared with those who ate the lowest intake of
ultra-processed grains (less than 50 grams per day). To put it into
perspective, 350 grams per day or more equates to about a serving of
Cheerios (39 grams), two slices of bread (70 grams), a handful of pretzels
(30 grams), cooked pasta (110 grams), and a Starbucks chocolate chip
cookie (80 grams). You want to aim for zero grams of refined grains per
day. The body does not need them, and they are damaging. I do not
recommend whole grains either (brown rice, oatmeal, etc.), but they do
have more nutritional value than refined grains.
Instead, choose alternatives made with nut flours or, better yet, swap for
whole food substitutes. For example, make chia pudding instead of eating
cereal, use butter lettuce leaves instead of tortillas for your tacos, and
choose cauliflower rice instead of rice.
The following is a list of some easy and delicious grain alternatives:

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: White bread
GOOD ENERGY SWAP
Bread made from nut flours (like almond) or coconut flour

Sweet potatoes cut lengthwise and baked can make a bread alternative
Coconut Flour Flatbread

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: Flour tortillas or taco shells
GOOD ENERGY SWAP
Seaweed sheets (nori)

Butter lettuce wraps
Collard green wraps
Jicama wraps (e.g., Trader Joe’s)
Egg wraps (e.g., Crepini Organic Petit Egg Wraps with Cauliflower)
Lentil wraps (e.g., 2-Ingredient Lentil Wraps from ElaVegan.com)
Flax wraps (e.g., Flaxseed Wraps from SweetAsHoney.co)
Spinach-Chickpea Wraps

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: White rice
GOOD ENERGY SWAP

Cauliflower rice (buy frozen, or pulse cauliflower florets in food processor
until rice-like; see recipe on this page)
Broccoli rice (buy frozen, or pulse broccoli stems in food processor until
rice-like)
Shirataki rice, made from high-fiber konjac root (e.g., Miracle Noodle brand)
Sweet potato rice (pulse sweet potato in food processor until rice-like)

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: Pasta
GOOD ENERGY SWAP

Zucchini noodles
Sweet potato noodles
Beet noodles
Parsnip noodles
Note: the four noodles above are made with an inexpensive spiralizer
device that I highly recommend purchasing to make a range of healthy
noodles from vegetables.

Spaghetti squash (roast and scrape out squash flesh with a fork for noodlelike consistency)
Chickpea pasta
Lupini bean pasta (e.g., Kaizen Food brand)
Lentil pasta
Black bean pasta
Hearts of palm pasta (e.g., Trader Joe’s, Palmini, and Thrive Market all
make this type of pasta)
Konjac root pasta (also sometimes called miracle noodles or shirataki
noodles; e.g., Thrive Market brand or nuPasta)
Kelp noodles (e.g., Sea Tangle Noodle Company)

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: Pizza crust
GOOD ENERGY SWAP
Cauliflower crust (e.g., Cali’flour Foods)

Almond flour crust
Coconut flour crust
Pizza “bites” made with sliced eggplant
Sweet potato crust (e.g., Sweet Potato Pizza Crust from
thebigmansworld.com)

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: Cakes, cookies, pastries
GOOD ENERGY SWAP
Alternatives made with nut flours

REFINED GRAIN PRODUCT: Cereal or instant oatmeal
GOOD ENERGY SWAP
Chia seed or basil seed pudding

Grain-free granola made with nuts and seeds
No-oat oatmeal made with nuts, seeds, and coconut flakes

By avoiding added sugar, industrial seed and vegetable oils, and
processed grains, you avoid almost every ultra-processed food. And by
doing this, you also avoid the innumerable additives in ultra-processed
foods that directly damage us, like synthetic or ultra-processed
preservatives, flavorings, emulsifiers, and colorings. Many of the additives

in American ultra-processed foods are outlawed for use in other countries.
For instance, potassium bromate, a dough conditioner in hundreds of types
of baked goods, causes cancer (“strongly carcinogenic”) in animals and is
“possibly carcinogenic” to humans. In cells, it leads to free radical-based
oxidative damage to DNA and fats and leads to mutations and breaks in the
genome. Food coloring Red 40 is a synthetic food dye made from
petroleum that is thought to induce neurotoxic effects through contributing
to oxidative stress in the brain. It, along with the several other artificial food
colorings on the market, are manufactured in processes that include many
toxic chemicals like formaldehyde and have been shown to be contaminated
with cancer-causing substances like benzidine. Red 40 alone has been
linked to aggressive behavior in children, autism, and ADHD, and is
thought to “aggravate mental health problems.” Foods that incorporate Red
40 include Skittles, Fruit Punch Gatorade, Jell-O, Duncan Hines Butter
Golden cake mix, Betty Crocker strawberry icing, Flamin’ Hot Cheetos,
Takis, and hundreds of other ultra-processed foods. Never eat food with
“Red,” “Blue,” or “Yellow” in the ingredient list. There are so many natural
alternatives for colors, like organic beet powder for red color, spirulina for
blue color, or turmeric for yellow. Other common additives like titanium
dioxide, brominated vegetable oil (BVO), propylparaben, acesulfame
potassium, and many others are known to be directly damaging to cellular
health, many through their impact on oxidative stress and mitochondrial
dysfunction.

MANAGING GLUCOSE THROUGH DIET FOR GOOD ENERGY
We’ve covered five elements that are necessary to build a meal and dietary
pattern that will help you build and maintain a body that is capable of
making Good Energy. We’ve also covered five food categories to avoid. But
there’s an additional layer to explore, which is specifically focused on
eating strategies to stabilize blood sugar day to day. These strategies serve
to keep balance and optimal function throughout the body. As we learned in
Part 1, erratic glucose levels are a big problem for our health and are one of

the key negative outcomes of eating ultra-processed foods. Glucose levels
that are increasingly variable over time are an indication that the body has
lost “glucose tolerance,” meaning that it is becoming insulin resistant and
has Bad Energy. As we know, insulin resistance can result from all the
factors that lead to Bad Energy outlined in Chapter 1, and of those factors,
chronic overnutrition is largely reflected in the huge swings in glucose we
can experience after eating foods with added sugars and processed grains.
Erratic, variable blood glucose is both a cause and an effect of Bad
Energy. It is a cause, because overwhelming the body with huge influxes of
glucose gums up the system and creates metabolic stress on the cell and
mitochondria that leads to oxidative stress, mitochondrial damage, and
resultant chronic inflammation. And as we learned, another extremely
problematic feature of high glucose levels in the bloodstream is that high
concentration of sugar sticks to things and causes dysfunction: glycation.
Erratic, variable glucose is also an effect of Bad Energy. Any process
(like chronic stress, environmental toxin exposure, and sleep deprivation)
that generates oxidative stress, chronic inflammation, and mitochondrial
dysfunction contributes to insulin resistance and Bad Energy, which can
then make the body less able to handle any level of incoming glucose from
diet.
As a cause of Bad Energy, excess blood sugar exposure is one we need
to dig into. The glucose levels in our diet are downright astronomical and
one of the strongest levers in generating Bad Energy. Glucose is the only
biomarker we can track in real time, letting us finely tune our exposures for
the benefit of our health. Between refined sugars and refined grains and high
starch foods (which turn directly into sugar), 42 percent of our calories are
coming from foods that convert directly to sugar.
I cannot overstate how unprecedented this is—those calories are giving
the body nothing of what it actually needs to function, so no wonder we
have insatiable cravings and are so hungry. Imagine this: 42 percent of the
seventy tons of food we are consuming in our lifetimes is not useful for
building a healthy body or signaling for healthy cellular function. These
useless foods are poisoning our microbiome and overwhelming our

mitochondria, leading our cells to fill with fat and develop insulin
resistance. The result is that glucose builds up in our bloodstream, wreaking
havoc both inside and outside the cells. And, of course, the worst result of
all: those overwhelmed mitochondria can’t do their work, so we don’t
effectively make the energy to power our cells, so we get cellular
dysfunction, leading to diseases of all kinds. Learning to eat for stable
blood sugar is of paramount importance.
The following are nine strategies to keep post-meal blood sugar levels
under better control:
1. Don’t Eat “Naked Carbohydrates”: Naked carbohydrates are carbohydratepredominant foods that are eaten alone, like a banana (of which 92
percent of calories are from carbohydrates) or other fruits. Pair these
carb-rich foods with healthy protein, fats, and/or fiber to slow
digestion, increase satiety, and reduce the influx of glucose in the
bloodstream. For instance, research shows that eating 3 ounces of
almonds with a carb-heavy meal could significantly lower the postmeal glucose elevation.
2. Sequence Meals for Optimal Metabolism by “Preloading” with Low-Glycemic Foods:
Eat non-starchy vegetables, fat, protein, and/or fiber before the higher
carbohydrate part of a meal to lower post-meal glucose spikes. Unlike
nearly every restaurant suggests, you should avoid bread and chips
before your meal. This will spike your blood sugar, which can lead to
increased hunger. In one study, consumption of about 20 grams of
protein and 20 grams of fat about thirty minutes before eating
carbohydrates significantly decreased post-meal glucose elevation in
both nondiabetic and insulin-resistant individuals. Try these simple
ways to preload meals:
Always order a salad filled with greens and some protein (egg,
chicken, cheese) before eating a starchy entrée. Make sure the
dressing has no sugar.

Ask the waiter not to bring bread or chips before a meal.
If your plate includes a starch (e.g., potato or pasta), protein (e.g.,
chicken or fish), and vegetable, start with the vegetable, then eat
the protein, and then end with the starch.
Eat a handful of nuts, a hard-boiled egg, or some chopped veggies
about a half hour before sitting down to a meal or going to an
event.
3. Eat Earlier: Amazingly, the exact same meal will likely cause a lower
glucose spike if it’s eaten in the morning instead of late at night. Our
bodies are naturally more insulin resistant at night, so in a sense we get
“more bang for the buck” by eating carbohydrates earlier in the day,
when we can process them better. A study in the British Journal of
Nutrition with healthy, normal-weight participants wearing CGMs
showed that eating high-glycemic food later in the evening will cause a
significant increase in both insulin and glucose levels compared with
eating the exact same meal earlier in the day. In this study, evening
meals were consumed at 8:30 p.m., and morning meals were consumed
at 9:30 a.m. Avoid high-glycemic meals and desserts at night.
4. Tighten the Eating Window: Eating in a narrower window during the day
leads to lower glucose and insulin spikes compared to eating the exact
same amount of food spread out over a longer period of the day. Timerestricted feeding (TRF) involves eating all your food and calories for
the day in a limited window. A 2019 study in Nutrients showed that
when eleven overweight, nondiabetic individuals practiced TRF for just
four days, where all calories were eaten in a six-hour window, they
significantly lowered fasting glucose, fasting insulin, post-meal glucose
peaks, and mean glucose levels compared to when they ate the exact
same food over a longer, twelve-hour window. To put TRF into
practice, start by trying to limit the time when you eat to twelve hours
(e.g., 8:00 a.m. to 8:00 p.m.), and then tighten the window to ten hours
(e.g., 8:00 a.m. to 6:00 p.m.) and eventually to eight hours (e.g., 10:00
a.m. to 6:00 p.m.). As your body becomes more metabolically efficient

through Good Energy living, TRF becomes easier because your body
becomes more adept at processing stored fat for energy.
5. Avoid Consuming Liquid Sugar: Any sugar that is delivered to the GI tract in
liquid form will be absorbed fast, potentially causing glucose spikes.
Liquid sugar sources include soda, juice, and drinks with added sugars
like Frappuccinos, sweet tea, and the many alcoholic beverages that
contain sugar. One exception is a well-balanced blended smoothie,
filled with vegetables, fat, low-glycemic fruits, and protein. These types
of smoothies can often be consumed without an appreciable glucose
rise, based on Levels data. See these pages for recipes.

How About Artificial Sweeteners or Natural Nonnutritive Sweeteners?
Research has found that consuming artificial sweeteners, such as aspartame
(Equal), sucralose (Splenda), and saccharin (Sweet’N Low), can lead to higher
weight, microbiome disturbance, and alteration of GI hormone levels, and they
can cause insulin release. Avoid these completely.
Natural nonnutritive sweeteners like allulose, monk fruit, and stevia, as well as
sugar alcohols like erythritol, are all better options than sugar or artificial
sweeteners. However, these natural sweeteners can still trigger the reward
pathways in the brain that drive cravings for sugar. They can also cause
bloating and other GI symptoms (especially sugar alcohols). Use them
sparingly, and wean to none over time.

6. Add Fiber to All Meals: Fiber slows digestion, promotes microbiome
health, and lowers post-meal glucose rises. A study in Diabetes Care of
eighteen individuals with type 2 diabetes looked at the differences in
metabolic markers between four weeks of a higher-fiber, lowerglycemic-load diet as compared with four weeks of a lowercarbohydrate, higher-fat diet. They found that on the higher-fiber diet,
the participants experienced a significant drop in LDL cholesterol, postmeal glucose levels, and post-meal insulin levels, as well as blood
triglycerides three hours after lunch. This study’s fiber sources included

legumes, vegetables, fruit, and whole grains. Other good sources of
fiber include chia seeds, flaxseeds, other nuts or seeds, avocados, beans,
high-fiber fruits or vegetables, lentils, and tahini. Aim for at least 50
grams of fiber per day.
7. Use Food Adjuncts, Like Vinegar and Cinnamon, to Lower Glucose Responses:
Apple cider vinegar is known to have a glucose-lowering effect when
taken before or with a meal, and the effect can be pronounced, with
some studies showing a 50 percent reduction in post-meal glucose in
healthy individuals. There are several ideas of why this happens,
including the possible impact of vinegar on slowing how fast the
stomach empties food, thereby making you feel fuller longer.
Additionally, vinegar may modulate the activity of insulin, allowing for
improved insulin sensitivity and glucose uptake. In cell culture studies,
the acetic acid in vinegar may also suppress the activity of a class of
gut enzymes called disaccharidases, which break down sugars for
digestion, thereby lowering the total sugar absorbed from food. Just
two teaspoons of vinegar have been shown to reduce post-meal glucose
levels by 23 percent when eaten with a meal of complex carbohydrates;
but of note, this effect was negated for consumption of simple sugars
(which include dextrose, glucose, and fructose), presumably since these
are not processed by disaccharidases that can be potentially inhibited
by vinegar.
Similar to vinegar, cinnamon may improve glucose levels and insulin
sensitivity in people with and without type 2 diabetes. Natural compounds
in cinnamon, including methylhydroxychalcone polymer (MHCP) and
hydrocinnamic acid, may mimic insulin’s activity or enhance insulin
receptor activity and contribute to glucose being taken into cells and
packaged into a healthy storage form called glycogen. Cinnamon is rich in
plant chemicals that reduce oxidative stress, which may also contribute to
its metabolic benefits. A study of forty-one healthy adults randomized
participants to consume 1 gram, 3 grams, or 6 grams of cinnamon mixed
with food for forty days. All doses of cinnamon led to a drop in the postmeal glucose levels, but this was largest for those taking 6 grams, for whom

post-meal glucose levels dropped around 13 percent, from a post-meal
mean of 106 mg/dL on day one to 92 mg/dL on day forty.
8. Walk for at Least Fifteen Minutes After Meals: This simple step can reduce the
glucose impact of your meal by up to 30 percent and is an unbelievably
high-yield habit to incorporate after as many meals as you can.
9. Eat Mindfully and with Gratitude: Research has shown that by addressing
mealtime behaviors and thought patterns while eating, it can change the
metabolic response to food. Mealtime behaviors like paying attention to
the sensory and spiritual dimension of food, paying attention to the
dining atmosphere, and awareness of emotional eating have been
shown to be part of plans that lower hemoglobin A1c levels over twelve
weeks in patients with type 2 diabetes. Additionally, research has
shown that eating your meals faster is associated with a significantly
increased risk of type 2 diabetes, with one study showing a twofold
increase in risk for type 2 diabetes among those who eat faster and
another showing that incidence rates of metabolic syndrome among fast
eaters were over four times higher than for slow eaters! The proposed
reason for this is because speedy eating may cause you to consume
more calories before feeling full. It’s astonishing to think that just
slowing down and appreciating the spiritual dimension of food could
impact blood sugar, but research suggests that it can.

—
The pathway to Good Energy starts with your fork. The journey begins by
simply putting more of the helpful molecular information on this utensil.
The transition to an ultra-processed diet over the last hundred years has
been disastrous for our physical and mental health, and our journey to Good
Energy moves us away from an ultra-processed diet toward whole,
unprocessed, nutrient-rich foods grown in thriving, healthy soil. But food is
not the only unprecedented threat our cells are facing, and the following
chapters will explore other factors to be aware of.

Recap: Creating a Good Energy Meal
Good Energy Foods:
1. Micronutrients and antioxidants (see these pages for comprehensive lists)
2. Omega-3 fatty acids (see these pages for top foods)
3. Fiber (see this page for top foods)
1. Fermented foods (see these pages for top foods)
2. Protein (see this page for top foods)

Bad Energy Foods:
1. Refined added sugar
2. Refined industrial vegetable and seed oils
3. Refined grains

To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

7

Respecting Your Biological Clock
Light, Sleep, and Meal Timing

Empty bags of blood were already covering the operating room floor as I
walked in.
I was in my second year of residency, and I was “on call,” meaning that
I was the only ENT surgeon awake covering three major hospitals for all
issues related to my specialty. I had already been up for twenty-four hours
and was trying to sneak a couple of minutes of rest in the break room when
my pager went off.
At least fourteen doctors and nurses were running around the operating
room in a frenzy as I came in. A woman’s neck was splayed open on the
table, and multiple trauma surgery residents were trying to stymie bleeding
with their hands and clamps. She had been stabbed numerous times in the
neck while at home, and her arteries were gushing blood. The attending
trauma surgeon asked me to scrub in and help her explore the neck. I put on
surgical gear and prepared to assist.
Within minutes, I was fishing through the gashes in the woman’s neck,
looking for any significant tears of vessels that could be repaired. I was
immersed in this task for minutes until I looked up to realize that others in
the room had stopped and were stepping away from the body. The patient
was dead. Looking at the raw, tattered, exposed skin on the neck from the
stab wounds, I envisioned what had happened to this woman less than an

hour before: the violence, the anger, the fear, the screaming, the blood, the
sharpness of the knife.
I considered myself an extremely empathetic person. I had been honored
with the Gold Humanism Award at Stanford, my house was littered with
personal development books, and I was nicknamed the “peacemaker” in my
family. But during that moment, my most pressing thought was the need to
go to sleep.
I called my supervising physician to alert him to the situation. He
quickly cut me off and barked, “Are you seriously waking me up to tell me
about a dead person?” and hung up. I was stunned at the time, but in
retrospect, his response was understandable: this man was getting woken
every night by residents, still had a full operating room schedule every day,
and was similarly desperate for sleep, even thirty years into the job.
By my fifth year, when I was a chief resident, I looked back on my time
in residency as if it were a blur. For most days, I stood in a windowless
operating room, stealing sporadic sleep when I could find small breaks and
shoving packaged food into my mouth at all hours of the day and night. I
later learned that sustained disruptions to the ingrained sleep needs of our
bodies result in measurable brain damage, emotional dysregulation,
metabolic issues, and even memory deficits.
My residency years are an extreme case. But, in similar ways, our
modern, Western, technology-driven culture distorts our natural schedules
—our circadian rhythms. We no longer sleep or eat at times and with
patterns in line with how our cells are biologically programmed to thrive.
These changes to a natural schedule of eating and sleeping represent a
profound contributor to Bad Energy.
In the past hundred years, average sleep duration has decreased 25
percent. Until several thousand years ago, humans spent most of their lives
outside or in exposed shelters—there was no true “indoors.” We’ve only
had artificial light for about 0.04 percent of human history. Today, modern
education and work environments expect kids and adults to sit at desks in
sealed rooms with limited sunlight for most of the day. Then we go back to
our homes, where we largely remain indoors. Sadly, in the modern world, a

successful life looks like living inside a box, working inside a box, staring
at lighted boxes, and being buried in a box. We are largely separated from
our life-giving forces: the sun and the earth.
I’m not suggesting we go back to prehistoric times and ban artificial
light, homes, or digital technology. But I think society should step back and
appreciate how new and biologically disruptive these inventions are and
how closely they are linked to our profound rates of mental and physical
dysfunction rooted in Bad Energy.
Over millions of years, we have developed very complex chronobiology
—a pattern of biological activity based on time—that has been coded into
our cells through features like “clock genes” and specialized brain regions
responsive to light. While our cells have their own internal clocks, they
must synchronize with external light cues to make sure things stay on track.
The two main external synchronizing cues are the timing of exposure to
light and the timing of exposure to food. Our chronobiology sets off the
dominoes each day of when we should wake up, when we should eat, when
we will best metabolize food, when we release hormones, how our genes
are expressed, and when we should sleep.
Humans are diurnal animals, meaning that our biology is set for activity
and feeding when it is light out, and for sleeping and fasting during the
dark. Plenty of nocturnal animals have flipped biology (in which they are
active at night and sleep during sunlight). But that’s not us. In our modern
world, however, we have completely desynchronized our behavior from our
chronobiology. We now eat late and flood our eyes with artificial light late
into the night. To the trillions of cells expecting one set of activities at a
certain time but experiencing another, this is mass cellular confusion. And it
manifests as the symptoms and diseases many of us suffer from today.
Research shows clearly that our modern erratic sleep schedules, light
exposure, and eating schedules directly lead to mitochondrial dysfunction,
oxidative stress, and chronic inflammation—the three hallmarks of Bad
Energy.
Today, most people—and even most doctors—go through life without
deeply considering their circadian rhythm. But step back and think about

how little sense this makes. If the battery of an electric car can run for four
hundred miles and requires eight hours to fully charge, you operate the
machine within those parameters. If you instead charge the car for six hours
and expect it to travel seven hundred miles, you’ll be sorely disappointed at
its output. What’s happening to our cells is that simple. We have decimated
the schedule that the stunning machines of our bodies are encoded to run
on. Then we throw up our hands in confusion as to why so many people
experience fatigue, insomnia, brain fog, sluggishness, or anxiety. So we
reach for the prescription pad to “treat” these conditions, further disrupting
our circadian rhythm.
Of course, we’ve all heard the perfunctory calls for getting enough
sleep, but understanding the why is necessary for long-term behavior
change. And shockingly, we rarely ever hear about how getting direct
sunlight into our eyes at the right times is profoundly important for
metabolic and overall health, despite masses of research that shows this.
Most of what we hear about the sun is that we should avoid it, to our huge
detriment. Nobody should go through life without understanding the
schedule our cells are wired for and how profoundly important this is for
our energy regulation.
And this understanding comes down to three interconnected factors:
sunlight, sleep, and when we eat.

WE ARE MADE OF SUNLIGHT
This isn’t a metaphor. Almost all energy we consume from food comes
directly from the sun. For most of us, photosynthesis is a term we learned in
middle school and promptly forgot. But remember this miraculous fact: the
energy transferred from the sun—traveling ninety-two million miles
through space—is stored in the chemical bonds of glucose molecules
generated in plants. Even if you stick to a more carnivorous diet, many
animals we eat are herbivores, so most of the energy we receive from food
can be traced to the sun. It’s our life source.

Let’s also not forget that photosynthesis creates oxygen, which every
cell in our body needs to create energy.
The reason we have life on Earth is because of the sun. That we aren’t
taught about the three key ways it is crucial to our body’s functioning is a
shameful medical blind spot.
Turning the Machine On

Since the dawn of the simplest life-forms, a regular pattern of sunlight and
darkness has been a consistent environmental stimulus driving our biology.
Human cells are encoded to be on a twenty-four-hour sleep-wake cycle,
entrained to function in two separate modes: activity-feeding mode during
sunlight, followed by resting-starvation mode during darkness. The biology
of these two phases is very different, with different genetic expression,
metabolism, and hormonal activity. Light exposure dictates which phase
we’re in. Giving the body mixed signals with erratic or irregular light and
dark exposure leads to dysfunction and disease.
Sun entering our eyes is the body’s “on” switch. The amount of light a
human is exposed to outside on a clear day is a hundred times more than the
amount inside with artificial light. Even sitting under a shaded tree, a
human is exposed to over ten times or more light than when sitting inside
with artificial light. One study showed that lux—a measure of light intensity
—is generally lower than 100 indoors and can be higher than 100,000
outdoors. Despite the transparency of windows, glass is still a physical
barrier to photons reaching your eyeballs and key information getting to
your cells. Just as food is molecular information that dictates how cells
function, light can be thought of as energetic information that dictates to the
body what time it is and therefore how the cells should function. Modern
children now spend only about one to two hours experiencing light
intensities greater than 1,000 lux, an unnatural travesty contributing to
metabolic disease, obesity, vision problems (which have risen dramatically
in recent decades), and more. Unsurprisingly, the amount of time spent

outdoors confers significant protection against being overweight and
developing chronic diseases.
When light hits the photoreceptors in our eyes, it triggers an electrical
impulse sent along from one cell to the next. These reactions lead to the
brain’s suprachiasmatic nucleus (SCN), which is a master conductor of our
body’s many functions. The little three-millimeter holes in the skull that the
optic nerves travel through are the primary way our body knows what time
it is. These optic nerves are just waiting to transmit that light signal to turn
“on” the body’s proper biology in the morning. But modern living largely
prevents us from spending much time outdoors in the morning.
While the SCN—and nearly every cell in the body—has its own internal
twenty-four-hour pattern of activity, light “synchronizes” our internal
cellular clocks, confirming the time and orchestrating the release of the
hormonal and genetic processes that are responsible for all aspects of our
biological activity. These activities include energy production, melatonin
release, digestion and hunger, and stress hormones.
“Irregular photic signals”—meaning experiencing light during naturally
dark times or being indoors when it is light outside—can profoundly disturb
our metabolism and increase the risk for all sorts of Bad Energy diseases.
More light in the morning and less at night signals to the SCN what time
of day it is and sets our bodies up to time genetic and hormonal signals
appropriately. Simply put: a key way that you regulate your hormones,
metabolism, weight, and risk for disease is by showing your cells what time
it is by exposing your eyeballs to direct sunlight throughout the light part of
the day and by hiding your eyeballs from as much light as possible when
the sun is down.
Directing Energy

Experts studying sleep and diabetes have been aware since the 1960s that
insulin sensitivity and glucose tolerance undergo a rhythmic cycle
throughout the day. This phenomenon is believed to be caused by the

influence of melatonin, a hormone that is secreted by the brain during
darkness and induces drowsiness, on insulin sensitivity.
Studies suggest exposure to bright light during the day is also crucial for
maintaining insulin sensitivity. In a study conducted in Brazil, obese
women who received bright light therapy three times a week for five
months after daytime exercise experienced a notable reduction in insulin
resistance and fat mass compared to women who did the same workouts but
did not receive light exposure.
Moreover, scientists from the University of Geneva discovered that even
minor changes in light exposure (such as an hour of light exposure in the
middle of the dark cycle or light deprivation for two days) can have a
significant impact on insulin resistance. This finding may help explain why
people who are exposed to light at inappropriate times are more likely to
develop metabolic disorders like diabetes.
Sunny Mood

Sunlight has been found to have an impact on mood, which is
interconnected with our metabolic health. Decreased sun exposure has been
known to trigger depression in some individuals, while in others, the mood
changes may be more subtle. Research has established a connection
between reduced sunlight exposure and lower levels of serotonin, which
regulates our mood. There is also a correlation between more exposure to
natural light and higher levels of serotonin. This could be attributed to the
fact that natural light enhances serotonin-1A receptor binding in the brain
and can potentially stimulate serotonin production in the skin. Studies also
suggest that increased serotonin signaling can reduce appetite and improve
glucose control.

SLEEP
Want to kill a puppy? Subject it to sleep deprivation for just nine days.
Want to give yourself prediabetes? Reduce sleep to four hours a night
for just six days.

Every time you skimp on the quantity, quality, or consistency of sleep,
you inch toward the grave—and toward metabolic symptoms and diseases
—by generating oxidative stress, mitochondrial dysfunction, chronic
inflammation, plus a big helping of microbiome dysfunction. You could eat
a perfect “Good Energy” diet, but if you don’t sleep, your cells will spew
out excess free radicals, send out danger signals, recruit the immune
system, struggle to make energy, and become insulin resistant. Lack of
quality sleep is a profound “danger” signal to the body, throwing off proper
metabolism and promoting fat storage.
Lack of sleep also creates a vicious cycle. Once you develop Bad
Energy—from any constellation of the many contributors (food, sleep,
stress, being sedentary, toxins, etc.)—it has a negative impact on your
ability to get good sleep. People with metabolic diseases have more trouble
with sleep, worsening their conditions. You must break this cycle for a
symptom-free life, and society—to have a healthy and well-functioning
culture—needs to overcome the modern pervasive phenomena of poor
sleep. Sleep-deprived cells are engines of Bad Energy.
Looking specifically at Bad Energy processes, we see that sleep affects
all of them.
Mitochondrial Dysfunction: A study of chronic sleep deprivation in mice,

where mice could rest for four hours per twenty-four-hour period over
four months, deliberated that “the structure of mitochondria was
destroyed by long-term sleep deprivation.” Electron microscopy images
of the healthy versus sleep-deprived mitochondria in the paper show
that the latter look like comical misshapen blobs compared to the
healthy version. “Destroyed mitochondria,” unsurprisingly, rapidly led
to heart failure in mice because an underpowered heart muscle will fail.
What’s more, additional research in mice shows a significant decrease
in the activity of the mitochondrial electron transport chain—the key
final steps in making ATP—after seventy-two hours of sleep
deprivation.

Oxidative Stress: Sleep deprivation has been shown to increase free

radicals and subsequent oxidative stress all over the body, including in
the liver, gut, lungs, muscles, brain, and heart. In a recent paper from
the premier medical journal Cell, sleep deprivation in animal models
led to a significant accumulation of damaging free radicals in the GI
tract, associated with early death. Free radical accumulation gradually
increases with each day of sleep deprivation and gradually decreases
after stopping deprivation. Since reactive oxygen species are a natural
by-product of metabolic processes, researchers have hypothesized that
one of the key functions of sleep is to help neutralize free radicals
accumulated during the day.
Chronic Inflammation: Even modest sleep restriction—from eight hours to
six hours per night for a week in a laboratory setting—can significantly
increase pro-inflammatory chemicals in the blood, including IL-6 and
TNF-ɑ, both of which are the body’s danger signals that are known to
induce insulin resistance.
What’s more, gene expression studies in mice show that chronic sleep
deprivation increases the expression of 240 genes and decreases the
expression of 259 genes, and many of these are related to metabolism.
Amazingly, sleep deprivation can profoundly alter microbiome
composition, and researchers think that the impact of this dysbiosis is part
of what mediates the Bad Energy hallmarks, like chronic inflammation. In a
lab, you can deprive a mouse of sleep and then transfer that mouse’s
microbiome to a mouse that isn’t sleep deprived and doesn’t have a
microbiome, and the latter mouse will develop chronic inflammation
throughout the body and in the brain, as well as cognitive impairment.
In humans, a tight link between sleep deprivation, gut dysfunction, and
oxidative stress exists. In a survey of hundreds of college students, almost
90 percent slept fewer than seven hours per night, and 42 percent suffered
from bowel disorders. In these students, sleep restriction decreased the gut
bacteria that produce the SCFA butyrate that we learned about in Chapter 5,
which serves as fuel for gut cells, impacts the expression of genes involved
in energy metabolism, and positively regulates mitochondrial function.

Remember, a healthy and strong gut barrier is protective against chronic
inflammation by preventing foreign substances from leaking through the gut
lining. The intestinal microbiome is acutely sensitive to a lack of sleep and
may be responsible for fueling the Bad Energy fire that leads to many of the
consequences of sleep deprivation. We need to sleep not only for ourselves
but also for our microbiome!
Additionally, we’ve learned that chronic overnutrition is a key driver of
Bad Energy, and sleeping too little will vastly increase your likelihood of
overeating by altering hunger and satiety hormones. In one study, twelve
healthy young men who had their sleep restricted for two days had an
elevation in the hunger hormone ghrelin and a decrease in the satiety
hormone leptin. They also reported increased hunger and appetite,
especially for calorie-dense, high-carbohydrate foods. Other research has
shown that experimental limitation of sleep will induce a significant
increase in the consumption of protein, fat, and overall calories, plus weight
gain, and abdominal fat increases. To protect against the urge for
overfeeding and hunger: sleep.
Today, you often hear medical leaders say the causes for the increase in
obesity are “complicated.” This infuriates me. The main causes are
straightforward: the explosion of highly processed food coupled with the
systematic erosion of healthy sleep, which causes the dysregulation of
hormones, making us want to eat more.
We wonder why we feel terrible after not sleeping well for just one
night, and hopefully, this section helps flesh it out: it’s like putting a bomb
inside your cells.

Obstructive Sleep Apnea
Close to a billion people globally are estimated to be suffering from obstructive
sleep apnea (OSA), a sleep-breathing disorder characterized by symptoms such as
daytime sleepiness, nighttime snoring, and periods of obstructed breathing at night.
Due to its impact on sleep quality and quantity, a diagnosis of OSA greatly
increases risk of metabolic sequelae like heart disease, heart failure, arrythmias,
type 2 diabetes, obesity, dementia, and stroke. In the other direction, obesity puts

people at much higher risk of OSA, as excess tissue and weight in the neck, throat,
lungs, and abdomen can all contribute to airway and breathing obstruction at night,
and rates of OSA are increasing as overweight and obesity rates increase. Some
research suggests OSA prevalence has increased by up to 55 percent from 1993 to
2013, in lockstep with rising rates of obesity. According to JAMA, “patients with mild
OSA who gain 10% of their baseline weight are at a sixfold increased risk of
progression of OSA, and an equivalent weight loss can result in more than 20%
improvement in OSA severity.” If you snore or have been told you stop breathing or
choke at night, experience daytime sleepiness and fatigue, have disrupted sleep, or
are having stagnating health progress, make sure to get tested for OSA. Weight
loss can significantly reduce or eliminate OSA for many patients.

Light hitting the eyes is an “on” signal for many bodily processes. And
exposure to dark prompts the release of melatonin in preparation for sleep, a
time of fasting when metabolic activity shifts dramatically, with a 15
percent drop in metabolic rate and when we burn through stored fat and
glucose for energy. During sleep, the brain undergoes changes in electrical
activity and cerebral blood flow that support memory consolidation,
cognitive function, and metabolism. Professor Matthew Walker has noted in
his book Why We Sleep that the Guinness Book of World Records still
recognizes “Most Motorcycles Driven over the Body While Lying on a Bed
of Nails” but has stopped recognizing attempts to break the sleep
deprivation record because these attempts are just too dangerous.
We are not made to go without regular, consistent sleep in a single time
zone. And until the last split second of human evolution, we likely never
did. Railroads were popularized just 120 years ago, air travel just 65 years
ago. Our great-grandparents and everyone before them rarely traveled out
of a time zone in their lives. And when the sun went down, they didn’t have
much else to do other than sleep.
We accept irregular and inconsistent sleep as a hallmark of modern life.
But I don’t think we appreciate that it is a completely new phenomenon.
Almost half of all people in the United States say they feel sleepy during
the day between three and seven days per week. And 35.2 percent of adults
report sleeping on average for fewer than seven hours per night. As many as

30 percent of adults meet the definition of obstructive sleep apnea (OSA), a
condition inextricably linked to insulin resistance as both cause and effect.
At sixteen hours of no sleep, the body begins experiencing mental and
physiological deterioration. At nineteen hours of no sleep, a person is as
cognitively impaired as someone with a blood alcohol level at the legal
limit of .08 percent. It gets much worse from there, as I saw in hospitals.
Lack of sleep dramatically impairs cognitive ability. A University of
Pennsylvania study showed that if participants experience four hours of
sleep for six nights, they experience a 400 percent increase in the number of
microsleeps they experience during the day. The study defines “microsleep”
as a period of no conscious response or motor response during a task. Most
worrying is that the participants did not realize they were experiencing
microsleeps when they were occurring.
Even more concerning is if that sleep-deprived person is controlling a
knife deep inside your unconscious body. Research shows residents
working thirty-six-hour shifts will commit 36 percent more serious medical
errors and make 460 percent more diagnostic mistakes in the intensive care
unit than a well-rested doctor. They will also be significantly less
empathetic to patients’ pain at the end of a twenty-six-hour shift. After a
thirty-six-hour shift, a resident is 73 percent more likely to stab themselves
with a needle or cut themselves with a scalpel. When a sleep-deprived
resident finishes a long shift and gets in their car to go home, they are 168
percent more likely to be involved in a motor vehicle incident resulting
from fatigue.
The fact that doctors are some of the most sleep-deprived and least
knowledgeable people about sleep is a huge problem. Doctors receive, on
average, seventeen minutes of education on childhood sleep and three hours
total of sleep education across four years of medical school. You can
assume your doctor knows virtually nothing about sleep, despite good sleep
being one of the most effective tools in preventing and reversing diseases of
all kinds. When a doctor pays lip service to “getting sleep” and sends you
on your way, they aren’t being direct enough. Every medical leader should

be speaking urgently and plainly: every person should prioritize the
quantity, quality, and consistency of sleep like their life depends on it.
Quantity

We need to get seven to eight hours a night of good-quality sleep for our
bodies to be protected from Bad Energy physiology. Sleep deprivation
almost immediately impacts our ability to make energy, with studies
showing that sleep deprivation decreases ATP production in several brain
regions in mice. No one wants a brain with less energy to run itself.
One study found healthy, normal-weight individuals who slept fewer
than 6.5 hours per night had to produce 50 percent more insulin than normal
sleepers to achieve similar glucose results—placing the short sleepers at
significant risk of developing insulin resistance in the long term.
Remember, prediabetes and type 2 diabetes are insulin resistance—a root of
nearly every other chronic symptom and disease.
Just a couple of nights of low sleep can severely impact insulin
sensitivity. In one study, eleven healthy young men were examined after
being subjected to six nights of sleep deprivation, where they were limited
to only four hours of sleep per night. Following the deprivation period, the
participants were given a full week of twelve hours of sleep per night. This
study showed that the participants experienced impaired metabolism and
insulin resistance during the low-sleep period. In particular, their capacity to
remove sugar from their bloodstream was 40 percent slower than when they
were adequately rested. Interestingly, this relatively short six-night sleep
deprivation period led to metabolic changes in the young men that made
them exhibit glucose responses characteristic of prediabetes.
Cortisol (a key stress hormone) tells our body that something “stressful”
is happening. It also partially controls the regulation of glucose and insulin.
Unfortunately, in cases like chronic sleep deprivation or chronic
psychological stress, chronic cortisol stimulation causes damage. Cortisol
decreases insulin sensitivity, meaning cells are less likely to use glucose.
When cells don’t use glucose, it remains in circulation, elevating blood

glucose levels and further fueling inflammation and glycation. Getting only
four hours of sleep for six days can increase evening cortisol levels, which
in turn can elevate blood sugar.
The research consistently points to the “magic number” of getting seven
to eight hours of sleep. Warning signs blare if you average below seven
hours per night. Interestingly, the risk for metabolic dysfunction increases if
you average more than eight hours by disrupting your sleep-wake cycle.
Children are often subjected to truncated sleep resulting from early
school start times. For them, the relationship between Bad Energy and sleep
deprivation is especially distressing. This culturally sanctioned sleep
deprivation sets kids up for a lifetime of metabolic illness. Several studies
have shown that children who do not get sufficient sleep for their needs at a
given age experience higher insulin levels, insulin resistance, higher fasting
glucose, and higher BMI. What’s more, the magnitude of short sleep for a
young child has a linear relationship with the risk of obesity a few years
later in childhood.
Quality

Minimally interrupted sleep is also a critical component of metabolic
health. Reduced sleep quality is linked to Bad Energy conditions such as
type 2 diabetes, obesity, heart disease, Alzheimer’s disease, and stroke.
One study followed over two thousand adult men for eight years and
found that subjects who reported difficulty maintaining sleep had a twofold
to threefold higher risk of developing type 2 diabetes.
And in the short term, studies showed a link between sleep quality and
the immediate ability to manage blood sugar efficiently the next day. In
these studies, the better sleep quality a person had, the more likely they
were (on average) to have a lower blood glucose response to breakfast the
next morning, compared to those who had poorer sleep. Poor sleep quality,
measured by sleep fragmentation, may affect glucose responses by
changing cortisol and growth hormone levels, both of which have a strong
impact on insulin sensitivity, metabolism, and glucose levels.

Sleep quality can also be assessed by the amount of time spent in deep
and REM sleep, which are metabolically restorative for the body and are
impacted by lifestyle factors like late meals, alcohol, late caffeine intake,
and light at night. Recent research looking at cancer mortality,
cardiovascular mortality, and all-cause mortality over twelve to twenty
years showed that mortality was 13 percent higher for every 5 percent
reduction in REM sleep. Based on this study, the threshold we really want
to meet for lower risk is 15 percent or more REM sleep per night. But more
is better. The lowest-risk individuals had more than 20 percent REM sleep.
Consistency

In recent years, I have been surprised to learn how keeping a consistent
bedtime matters profoundly to our metabolic health. Our biology is set up
for regular, consistent rhythm, so it’s not too surprising, but the magnitude
of the impact is.
Research has found that social jet lag of greater than two hours in people
sixty years or younger yields an approximately twofold increased risk of
metabolic syndrome and diabetes or prediabetes. Social jet lag is a measure
of sleep consistency looking at the difference in bedtime and wake time
between workdays and days off as measured by the “midpoint” of sleep.
For example, if a person sleeps from 10:00 p.m. to 6:00 a.m. on weekdays,
the midpoint of their sleep is 2:00 a.m. If they sleep from midnight to 10:00
a.m. on weekends, their midpoint is 5:00 a.m. This represents three hours of
social jet lag, doubling the risk of metabolic disease. Almost half of U.S.
adults report at least one hour of social jet lag. Similar associations are seen
in night shift workers, who experience significantly higher rates of type 2
diabetes.
The impact of poor sleep consistency has also become clear through
research on the health effects of daylight savings time (DST), where an
entire population is forced to shift their sleep and wake time by one hour
twice a year. Research has shown that these biyearly shifts are associated
with increased heart attack, stroke, hospital admissions due to arrhythmias,

missed medical appointments, emergency room visits, inflammatory
markers, high blood pressure, car crashes, and mood disorders, as well as
changes in gene expression, including in clock genes. The American
Academy of Sleep Medicine has released a position statement advocating
for getting rid of seasonal time changes, as this one-hour shift appears to
“incur significant public health and safety risks” and “misalignment
between the biological clock and the environmental clock.”
We ignore the science of circadian clocks at a societal level, most
disastrously when it comes to kids. During puberty, teens experience a shift
in their circadian rhythms that causes them to naturally want to stay up later
and sleep in longer. However, most schools still have start times that are
very early in the morning, some before 8:00 a.m. This can be incredibly
damaging to the metabolic health of teens, as research has shown that
insufficient sleep can lead to insulin resistance, weight gain, and an
increased risk of type 2 diabetes, and up to 45 percent of teens are getting
inadequate sleep.
Studies have also shown that delaying school start times to match the
natural circadian rhythms of teenagers can have significant benefits. A study
published in the Journal of Clinical Sleep Medicine in 2017 proposed that
when middle schools and high schools shifted their start times to 8:30 a.m.
or later, students experienced improvements in sleep duration, daytime
sleepiness, and academic performance.
Artificial Light

We’ve all heard that artificial light at night can disrupt our sleep, and the
reason is that this light at unnatural times signals to your SCN and cells that
it is daytime when it’s not, confusing our deeply ingrained biological clock.
Light at night is so strongly detrimental to our health that it is now
considered an “environmental endocrine disruptor,” meaning that it can
directly alter hormone signaling, just as a medication or toxin could do. As
a hormone disruptor, light can starkly alter melatonin production, increase
inflammatory responses, and elevate circulating stress hormones. A study in

the International Journal of Obesity showed that even when controlling for
food intake, artificial light at night helps to explain about 70 percent of the
excessive body mass prevalence among people worldwide. This sounds
shocking until we think about how profoundly new and disruptive artificial
light is to our biology, with this recent invention completely changing the
secretion of several hormones in our bodies in the blink of an eye in 1806.
That’s when the first incandescent bulb was turned on. The advent of the
first home TVs in 1938 and then computers in 1971 vastly exacerbated the
issue.
Research has found that increased exposure to light late in the evening is
associated with increases in insulin resistance and glucose levels, with one
study linking higher light intensities at night to a 51 percent increase in type
2 diabetes in elderly subjects. What’s more, research shows that being
exposed to indoor room light of just 200 lux as opposed to dim light of less
than 3 lux before bedtime causes later melatonin release onset by ninety
minutes, and presleep levels of melatonin were reduced by 71.4 percent.
Some of the known functions of melatonin include inducing sleep,
suppressing cancer, supporting bone health, acting as an antioxidant,
providing neuroprotection, protecting against mood disorders, and serving
as an anti-inflammatory molecule. Melatonin is also involved in pathways
related to healthy reproduction and egg quality. Given this, disrupting
melatonin with excessive artificial light at night is a lifestyle factor to take
seriously.
Even ambient light in our bedrooms has an effect. In one study of more
than one hundred thousand women, exposure to light while sleeping was
strongly associated with a higher BMI, higher waist circumference, and
higher waist-to-hip ratio.
Meal Timing

Earlier in the chapter, we discussed how properly timed light exposure
plays a key role in telling your brain’s SCN what time it is, so it can set up
the proper genetic, hormonal, and metabolic activity for the day. Another

key signal for telling your cells what time it is involves when you eat. If we
eat during the dark period of the twenty-four-hour cycle—when our
physiology is biochemically ready to support rest and fasting—we
experience a desynchronization of our metabolic processes, which increases
the risk for metabolic problems. In animal studies, when mice are fed their
normal diets but during the time when they’re meant to be asleep, they
rapidly gain weight. The misalignment between feeding time and the body’s
natural circadian cycles induces glucose intolerance, altered gene
expression, and weight gain.
Human circadian biology primes us to be more insulin sensitive and
generate more heat from metabolizing food in the morning instead of the
evening. Overall, research suggests that we do much better by frontloading
the day with food—especially higher carbohydrate foods—and stopping
eating as early as possible in the evening. One study showed that eating
food later in the evening (at 8:30 p.m.) caused a significant increase in both
insulin and glucose levels compared with eating the exact same meal
consumed in the morning (at 9:30 a.m.).
Unfortunately, U.S. adults display erratic eating patterns that are
completely out of line with our natural circadian biology. As modern
Americans:
We have up to eleven eating events per day.
Only 25 percent of food intake occurs before noon.
35 percent of intake occurs after 6:00 p.m.
More than half of us eat over a period of fifteen hours or more a day.
On weekends, eating windows are shifted to later.
Erratic daily food patterns and ultra-frequent food intake predispose us
to metabolic dysfunction. In contrast, choosing to eat at consistent times,
and cutting off the last food intake earlier in the evening, is an example of
time-restricted feeding (TRF), which represents a promising approach for
the prevention and therapy of metabolic disturbances. Research conducted

on overweight individuals without diabetes revealed that practicing TRF for
just four days can considerably reduce fasting glucose, fasting insulin, and
mean glucose levels.
TRF is under the umbrella of fasting, which is an intentional restriction
of food. Far from a health fad or hip wellness trend, fasting is a practice that
has been part of our history and biology, given that we didn’t always have
constant access to food. Our bodies are primed to function optimally when
they must flip-flop between discrete periods of eating and discrete periods
of not eating. Remember, the two primary fuel sources for your cells to
make ATP are glucose and fat.
Glucose circulating in the bloodstream and stored in chains in the
muscle and liver is more readily accessible for quick energy (like a
debit account).
Fat is a long-term energy storage source to tap into when glucose is low
(like a savings account).
The problem today is that almost everyone is in a constant fed state—
fueling their bodies off glucose instead of fat, from first thing in the
morning (with a carb-heavy breakfast) till late at night (with dessert). This
constant feast—with no famine—keeps our body in glucose-burning mode
and deprives us of the benefits of utilizing fat for fuel, making those fatburning pathways less efficient.
When people say they are hungry (or even “hangry”!) after not having a
meal for a few hours, likely this reflects metabolic inflexibility: a problem
switching from glucose burning to fat burning. Metabolic inflexibility
results from the body’s reliance on carbohydrates and glucose for energy
because it’s rarely given an opportunity to flip into fat burning. When we
prepare our bodies to transition more effectively, we can alleviate some of
the unpleasant symptoms, such as nausea, irritability, and fatigue, that we
experience when our glucose levels are low. Additionally, this adaptability
can enhance our ability to burn fat, particularly following a high-fat meal.

Conversely, when our bodies become accustomed to constant glucose
intake, they become less proficient at burning fat and lose metabolic
flexibility. Metabolic inflexibility is linked to metabolic syndrome, type 2
diabetes, and chronic inflammation.
Most normal-weight humans can go well over a month without eating a
single morsel of food with minimal negative health consequences just by
tapping into their natural, healthy fat stores. One extremely obese man—
Agostino Barbieri—fasted for 382 days without eating a piece of food. He
came out the other side healthier. Obviously, this was an extreme case given
Barbieri’s severe obesity, but it makes the point that our perceptions around
the time we can go between eating are incorrect.
Fasting lets your body practice—and over time, improve—its process of
switching between burning available carbohydrates and glucose (when you
eat) and burning fat for energy (when you’re not eating). Insulin normally
promotes fat storage and restricts fat breakdown, so when we fast, we allow
insulin levels to fall and let fat get mobilized for energy. Fasting is also a
stressor on the body, so it should be used with intention and thoughtfulness,
particularly in menstruating women. The Complete Guide to Fasting by Dr.
Jason Fung, Fast Like a Girl by Dr. Mindy Pelz, and Women, Food, and
Hormones by Dr. Sara Gottfried are great books to learn more about fasting
protocols.
No matter which fasting style you follow, you should try to reduce your
daily eating window to avoid food in the late evening, and try to eat your
last food before dark as often as possible. This tweak alone will be lifechanging.

RESETTING YOUR RHYTHM
Unfortunately, our Western cultural norms are in direct opposition to
optimizing chronobiology. Schools, the medical system, and workplaces are
ignorant of the profound and inescapable impact of our sleep and meal
timing on our cellular function. So you must take things into your own
hands and be a counterculture circadian warrior in your journey to generate

Good Energy. Doing so will involve hard choices that may seem like a
sacrifice. But waiting on the other side for you is better mental and physical
health.
If factors in your household or living situation are preventing you from
getting enough sleep, you need to take steps to rectify them if you want to
minimize any symptoms you have. If a pet is jumping on your bed,
preventing you from sleeping through the night, you should consider
intensive pet training or finding a new home for your pet. If your partner
snores so loudly that you can’t sleep, they should address the problem, and
you might consider earplugs or sleep in a different room until it’s resolved.
Many of you may be thinking, I would sleep more, but I have trouble
sleeping! You wouldn’t be alone: around a third of all adults experience
insomnia. Many factors that lead to Bad Energy are the same factors that
lead to insomnia, and when you work toward Good Energy habits, you are
improving your chances at good sleep. For instance, a high intake of ultraprocessed foods, which we know contributes to metabolic issues, also
confers fourfold higher odds of having insomnia. Artificial light contributes
to Bad Energy and insomnia. Chronic stress contributes to Bad Energy and
insomnia. Eating late at night contributes to Bad Energy and insomnia. It’s
all connected.
Good Energy results from good sleep, but as we know, many other
factors contribute to Good (or Bad) Energy. So if sleep is a struggle for you,
start with some of the other pillars of Good Energy (food, movement, stress
management, toxin avoidance, etc.), and you may find that sleep gets a lot
easier, creating a positive and compounding virtuous cycle.

Tips for Protecting Your Circadian Rhythm
1. Understand Your Sleep Patterns
Get a baseline assessment of your sleep quantity, quality, and
consistency by wearing a sleep tracker. My preferred sleep tracker is
Fitbit (more examples in Part 3).

Quantity: Assess your average sleep duration per week and whether it is
less than seven hours per night. Do you have days that tend to be outliers
for getting more or less sleep?
Quality: Most sleep trackers will tell you how long you take to fall asleep
and how much time you spend awake each night. Additionally, trackers
will help you understand whether you are getting adequate REM and
deep sleep, and what factors (like alcohol, eating late, nighttime light
exposure, etc.) may be negatively impacting your sleep.
Consistency: Assess whether you are experiencing social jet lag of more
than one hour by figuring out the midpoint of your sleep window and
comparing it day to day throughout the week.
Once you understand your baseline, create a strategy to work toward a
more consistent bedtime and wake time, as well as a goal for increasing
the quantity of sleep to at least seven hours per night without any outliers.

2. Find Accountability for Your Sleep Goals
Once you set goals for bedtime, wake time, and quantity of sleep per
night, share them with a friend, partner, or coach and commit to sending
them your sleep data daily to ensure you stay accountable. I like to put
my money where my mouth is with my accountability partner. If I don’t
adhere to my sleep goals, I must go clean my best friend’s house! New
digital services, such as Crescent Health, pair you with a sleep coach to
stay accountable.

3. Log Your Food Temporarily to Understand When and What You Are Eating
Food logging is an excellent way to understand exactly what and when
you are eating. When I reviewed my own food logs with a nutritionist, I
realized for the first time that I had a small snack almost every night at
11:00 p.m. Logging my food helped me set realistic goals for my eating
cutoff time.
I track my food in the Theia app while wearing a continuous glucose
monitor and in MacroFactor when I’m not. Both are seamless ways to
know exactly what and when I’m eating. The Theia link is https://theiahealth.ai/c/ladetectivedelasalud?el=ladetectivedelasalud

4. Pick a Cutoff Time for “Last Call” on Daily Eating
Set a reasonable goal for when your last bite of food will be. Start with
something achievable (for instance, if you eat something at 9:30 p.m.
most nights, set your first goal for 9:00 p.m.). As you reach the goal for
two weeks straight, bump it up a half hour or so every two weeks until you
reach your final goal.

5. Work to Minimize Bright, Artificial Light After Dark
Purchase red light bulbs for the main rooms you spend time in after dark,
such as your bedroom, bathroom, kitchen, and family room. Using red
light instead of standard bulbs will minimize the blue light your brain
receives. If these bulbs are impossible to obtain, install dimmers on your
lights and dim them to minimal brightness after dark.
Use blue light–blocking glasses after dark. I use Ra Optics.
Turn your screens to “night mode” after dark. This mode reduces the
intensity of blue light your screen emits.
Aim to stop looking at screens—even backlit e-readers—during the hour
before bed. If you want to read for work or fun, print out the material, use
a non-lit screen (like a reMarkable tablet), or read a paper book.

6. Create a Light-Free and Sound-Free Bedroom
Remove all light and sources of noise from the bedroom. Even small
amounts of light from windows, alarm clocks, or TVs can significantly
disturb sleep. Invest in blackout curtains.
Invest in well-fitting earplugs and a comfortable eye mask.

7. Get Outside in the First Hour of the Day
Your body needs to know when it is day and night to function properly.
Your brain will set you up for a Good Energy day if it knows when it is
daytime. But you have to “show” your brain sunlight.
Within one hour of waking, get outside, no matter what. Don’t stare
directly at the sun, but make sure the photons have a direct path from the
sky to your eyeballs—with no windows or sunglasses in the way. It
doesn’t matter if it’s raining or snowing or if it’s cloudy or sunny—being
outdoors gives you vastly more solar energy than if a window is blocking
the sunlight. You may need to invest in the right outdoor gear so that you
have no excuse to avoid this. For instance, when I moved to a snowy
town, getting comfortable snow pants, tall waterproof boots, and a long
parka allowed me to quickly suit up for a comfortable walk despite months
of freezing (and sometimes blizzarding) conditions.
Ideas for implementation: I like to use the two to three minutes while I’m
brushing my teeth to walk around my front yard. Doing so ensures I get
sunlight in the first ten minutes of the waking day. Make a habit of walking
around the block while you drink your coffee or take your first morning
call. Even spending ten minutes outside in the first hour of the day can
have a significant positive impact on synchronizing your body’s internal
clock with the sunlight.

8. Spend Significantly More Time Outdoors During Daylight Hours
Aim to get outdoors more frequently throughout the day by scheduling
moments to pop outside.
Learn to take pride in how many cumulative hours you can spend outside
in twenty-four hours. Bonus points if you’re exposed to natural areas like
parks or forests, which independently boost health.
Try to move activities you regularly do indoors to the outdoors, like eating
meals, reading, taking phone calls, catching up with your partner at the
end of the day, or playing with your kids. Get creative.

To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

8

Replenishing What Modernity Took Away
Movement, Temperature, and Nontoxic Living

The first two years of med school consist of wall-to-wall lectures. At
Stanford Medical School, we sat for eight hours per day in a dark
subterranean classroom, with ten minutes of breaks between classes. During
these breaks, we could sneak a meal at the adjacent café, which served
pizza, cheesy pasta, sandwiches, fries, and chips.
Even at this time, before my full awakening regarding metabolic health,
I found something discordant about budding doctors sitting all day while
learning about cardiovascular disease, diabetes, and hypertension. I read a
New York Times article that described sitting for long periods of time as a
“lethal” activity for our health because of increasing metabolic and
cardiovascular dysfunction. I installed a makeshift standing desk in the back
of the lecture hall made from an IKEA storage tub turned upside down on
top of a desk. This sparked curiosity among my classmates. So I sent a
survey to students about their interest in standing desks in classrooms, and
to my surprise, most students responded. One hundred percent of
respondents said medical school causes them to sit too much. Nearly 90
percent said standing options in classrooms would increase their quality of
life.
Emboldened, I reviewed dozens of academic studies showing the deadly
impact of excess sitting and presented the findings to the medical school
administration, along with survey results from students. I explained how

installing standing desks would be great marketing to promote Stanford’s
innovative image, as well as support medical student health and well-being.
My proposal was rejected. I was told I needed formal evidence to support
that this would be a valuable intervention. I agreed. Thus began my twoyear journey of a grant-funded, ethics board–approved interventional study
of the impact of standing desks in classrooms. I implemented a trial with
Stanford medical students and conducted structured interviews and surveys.
I pursued training in qualitative research coding and interpretation and
analyzed the data. The results were clear: students reported increased
alertness, attention, and engagement during the intervention and wanted
standing desk options in classrooms.
Two years after my first meeting, I stood before the Stanford Medical
School administration and presented the data they had requested. Again, the
proposal for standing desks was rejected. I was told that the new Li Ka
Shing building—a $90 million architectural marvel donated by the richest
person in Hong Kong—had design guidelines and safety codes. There
would be no standing desks.
At nearly every medical school in the country today, young doctors, in
their first two years, still spend most of their time sitting for long periods.
We now know sitting is one of the fastest ways to ensure increased risk for
the exact diseases med students are learning how to treat. Up to 73 percent
of physicians are overweight or obese, and the leading causes of death for
doctors are all the largely preventable Bad Energy killers, with heart
disease, cancer, and stroke at the top.
Our obsession with sitting represents a greater theme contributing to
Bad Energy: our desire to be comfortable. We like to sit and we like
comfortable temperatures—which is understandable. Unfortunately, these
two comforts of modern life aren’t conducive to optimal cellular physiology
or longevity. We celebrate our comfortable, seated, climate-controlled world
as a win—and to some extent, it is! But the reality is these factors of
modern life conspire to lull our cells into a state of cellular complacency.
Don’t push the body much, and it will break down. Push a body too hard
for too long and it will also break down. But push a body just past the point

of comfort—specifically with movement and temperature—and magic
happens: the cells rise to the occasion, adapting and turning on dormant
pathways to make us more resilient, happier, and healthier, especially if we
follow that stress with time to adapt, recover, and amplify resilience
pathways.
Many complex biological systems improve their function when their
environments push them a bit. For example, the most phytonutrient- and
antioxidant-rich plants are grown in the harshest, rockiest climates, like
those of the steep mountainsides of Sardinia. These plants activate their
own antioxidant stress resilience pathways to survive, which translates into
potent health benefits for us when we eat them. Outdoor cats exposed to
harsher environments have significantly less obesity than indoor cats. And
50 percent of domesticated dogs over age ten develop cancer, yet this rarely
happens to dogs or wolves in the wild. Depression afflicts 75 percent of
domesticated dogs but is rare in wild animals. While 40 percent of modern
humans will get cancer, our closest relatives—chimpanzees—rarely get it,
despite sharing nearly 99 percent of our genes.
Something about a more natural, wilder life is good for our biology. Is it
possible that the comforts of domestication are hurting us?
As modern life has stripped away basic realities of historical life—like
regular movement and large swings in external temperature—massive
industries have cropped up, getting us to pay to add them back in. Among
the offerings are fitness classes, gyms, cold plunges, saunas, and light
therapy. The constant stress we feel to exercise and purchase these
“healthy” products is a perverse trick. It is ironic that we pay for the luxury
of comfort and then are sold solutions to remedy the resulting deficiencies.
The Good Energy solution is not just incorporating more biohacking
“protocols” and tools into your day, which often add stress as more boxes to
check. The solution is about changing your mindset to see controlled
discomfort and adaptive stressors as critical biologic information and about
building your days to incorporate such stressors as the default. It’s also
about being skeptical, and frankly critical, of our “normal” built
environments and cultural norms around movement. These norms include

sitting at desks all day; having sitting areas serve as the centerpieces of our
homes; being shuttled constantly in cars, on scooters, and on escalators and
elevators; and getting upset if our thermostat is more than a few degrees
from 70°F.
In addition to harming us by shielding us from these stressors, industrial
modernity has also taken away our opportunity to live in a nontoxic world
that protects our cells from being overburdened and damaged.
Approximately eighty thousand synthetic chemicals are now used by
industry, filling our air, water, food, and homes with substances that interact
with our cells, many in ways that are either known to be harmful to our
cells or have unknown effects. Many of these substances are part of a class
of chemicals called obesogens, meaning they are known to directly impair
Good Energy processes and contribute to accumulation of fat and obesity.
We throw our hands up in confusion at the plummeting mental and physical
health of our population, while simultaneously bathing our cells (and those
of our fetuses and children) in a constant invisible “chemical soup” of labcreated toxins that directly impair neurotransmitters, the microbiome,
mitochondria, our genetics, and our hormones.
This chapter examines the Bad Energy effects of our move to an indoor
lifestyle and away from the natural world, and what we can do to start
feeling better today.

MOVEMENT
Despite the miraculous capabilities of the human body as the only bipedal
primate, we choose to spend nearly 80 percent of our time sitting. The 2008
Pixar movie Wall-E portrays a dystopian future with obese humans zooming
about in robotic hover-chairs, seeking entertainment via holographic
screens, consuming packaged food delivered by robots, and never needing
to lift a finger. This, sadly, is close to our current reality.
People in the United States have a desire to be fit, with sixty-four
million belonging to fitness centers and spending nearly $2,000 on average
on health and fitness per person annually. But we are getting sicker every

year. Despite a doubling of fitness center memberships since the year 2000,
obesity has gone up 10 percent in that time. Our nation has the most gyms
of any country in the world, yet we are among the fattest. The CDC reports
that over 75 percent of U.S. adults do not engage in the recommended
amount of activity, and 25 percent are not active at all.
What explains this disconnect between our clear desire to be healthy and
our disastrous failure to develop movement habits? I believe the answer lies
in the fundamental concept of “exercise.” We have characterized exercise as
an isolated bout of activity—separate from the rest of our daily life—and an
item on the to-do list. Our metabolic processes function best when
movement is a regular, consistent part of our lives, not a task to be
performed in an hour or two. Until very recently, continual movement was
essential for daily survival: hunting, gathering, and traveling long distances
on foot. As recently as 1820, 79 percent of Americans worked in the
physically demanding job of agriculture. There was no SoulCycle, Barry’s
Bootcamp, or gyms on every city street corner in 1900, yet the obesity rate
was close to 0 percent.
Today, just 1.3 percent of people in the United States are employed in
agriculture. We now sit or lie down virtually all the time. Unlike many
cities in Europe and Asia, most American urban areas are designed for cars,
not people. Astonishingly, parking takes up about one-third of the land area
in U.S. cities. If you live in a low walkability area, prediabetes incidence is
32 percent higher, and the likelihood of developing type 2 diabetes is 30 to
50 percent higher. If you’re lucky enough to live in a highly walkable city,
the rates of obesity and overweight magically drop from 53 percent to 43
percent. The CDC reports that the average U.S. adult today takes between
3,000 to 4,000 steps per day, which is less than two miles. Compare this
with modern hunter-gatherer populations, who take closer to 20,000 steps a
day and spend less than 10 percent of daily hours sitting (and notably, have
the lowest level of heart disease of almost any population ever studied).
Dan Buettner’s book The Blue Zones demonstrates that the populations that
live the longest don’t “exercise” in the modern sense of a targeted, focused
spurt of activity. Movement is just naturally built into their daily life. Again,

our challenge is not how to fit more fitness classes in. It’s how to design our
daily lives to make movement the norm, which is simple but requires
creativity and boldness.
Spurts of focused physical activity are certainly great for health. But
optimal metabolism results from regular low-level physical activity, which
continuously stimulates cellular pathways that promote Good Energy
physiology. Excess sitting is associated with all three hallmarks of Bad
Energy: more inflammation, more oxidative stress, and more mitochondrial
dysfunction. And just squeezing in a workout once a day doesn’t counteract
the problems with sitting too much. Research suggests that prolonged
sedentary time is associated with bad health outcomes, regardless of
physical activity. Sitting itself is the monster, no matter whether you
exercise. Dr. Andrew Huberman recently noted that “even if we get our 180
minutes of zone 2 (moderate) cardio per week, the benefits are largely (or
entirely) erased by sitting more than five hours per day.” If exercise is going
to improve metabolism in a major way, it’s going to look very different
from today’s fitness industry. Instead, it’s going to look like regular
movement reentering the fabric of our everyday lives.
We’re made for movement: our muscles, bones, and joints work together
in a finely tuned orchestra, allowing us to run, jump, climb, and lift with
remarkable precision and efficiency. Unfortunately, we’re squandering these
miraculous gifts.
Muscle Contraction Is Medicine

The reason that moving regularly is important is because a body in which
muscles are contracting frequently (even at low intensities for short periods)
is experiencing totally different physiology than a body where the muscles
are worked in only a one- to two-hour exercise block per day (no matter
how intense that block). Muscle contraction is miraculous medicine. At a
basic level, muscle cell activity kicks off two processes: it prompts the entry
of calcium into cells, and it depletes ATP. The increase in calcium and dip in
ATP set off a slew of signaling pathways that ultimately push the cell to

process glucose or fat to make more ATP to keep fueling the muscle. At the
center of this is a key protein called AMPK, which is like an “energy
sensor” in cells. Sensing a decline in ATP as muscle contractions use it up,
AMPK activates and stimulates the incredible PGC-1ɑ, which increases fat
burning, glucose uptake, and the creation of more mitochondria (to make
more ATP).
In addition, AMPK also stimulates mitophagy, whereby cells clear out
old, dysfunctional mitochondria to make room for healthy, new
mitochondria. Without effective mitophagy, we accumulate poor-quality
mitochondria that produce excessive free radicals, generating one of the key
hallmarks of Bad Energy: oxidative stress. And while exercise induces
some free radicals, the stimulation of PCG-1ɑ promotes the expression of
several antioxidant genes, thereby increasing the oxidative defense systems
in the body. Exercise can also acutely increase inflammation, but research
has shown that muscle activity decreases chronic inflammation over the
long run. In fact, research increasingly shows that muscle is an antiinflammatory hormone-secreting organ. It releases myokines, immunemodulating proteins, into the blood that limit the inflammatory response. In
the case of both oxidative stress and inflammation, the controlled stressor of
increased movement and exercise leads the body to lower levels of both
over time.
Muscle contraction is vital to metabolic health because it disposes of
excess glucose, and incredibly, muscle can do this without needing insulin
to stimulate the entry of glucose into the cells. In fact, when exercising,
people with type 2 diabetes—despite being extremely insulin resistant—can
clear glucose from the blood at levels near or identical to people without
diabetes, all because they can clear glucose without needing to use insulin.
Why? Exercise stimulates AMPK, which directly signals for glucose
channels (GLUT4 channels) to travel from the inside of the cell out to the
cell membrane to let glucose in.
By clearing glucose from the blood without requiring as much insulin
secretion, exercise increases our body’s sensitivity to the hormone. In fact,

studies show that a single exercise session can increase insulin sensitivity
for at least sixteen hours.
The ability of GLUT4 transporters to clear glucose from the blood isn’t
marginal. According to Theia data, adults often see a 30 percent lower
glucose spike when they take a gentle walk after eating a high-carbohydrate
meal. Muscle contraction is a silver bullet for processing excess food
energy that otherwise can clog up our cells and lead to dysfunction.
Exercise stimulates the production of more and healthier mitochondria to
generate Good Energy, upregulating antioxidant defenses and quelling
inflammation over the long term.
Just Move More

Moving more frequently means more glucose clearance from the blood
continuously throughout the day. Every time you stand up from your desk
and take a five-minute walk or do thirty air squats (bending your knees so
that you mimic a sitting position while keeping your feet flat on the
ground), remember that you are giving your body a signal that brings
glucose channels to the membrane to keep clearing glucose to make ATP.
You can see how different this situation is from someone who sits all day
and exercises for an hour in the evening. All day, the muscles lack a signal
to soak up and use excess glucose, leaving it circulating in the bloodstream
and requiring insulin to get it into cells.
Your daily movement doesn’t need to be hard to be effective, but it
needs to be frequent. A study of eleven participants completed four
movement regimens:
No exercise
Twenty minutes of jogging before breakfast, lunch, and dinner
Twenty minutes of jogging after breakfast, lunch, and dinner
Short spurts of jogging for just three minutes every half hour
throughout the day.

All three movement patterns added up to sixty total minutes of jogging
per day. But the results showed something fascinating: the short threeminute bursts of jogging every half hour significantly reduced post-meal
glucose spikes, compared to the longer pre- and post-meal jogs.
You don’t need to jog to see this effect; walking works, too: a study of
seventy healthy, normal-weight adults looked at three similar scenarios:
Sitting for nine hours
Walking for a thirty-minute period once per day and then sitting
Regular activity breaks of walking for one minute and forty seconds
every thirty minutes.
While both activity groups walked a grand total of thirty minutes per
day, the study showed that people who took the short walks every thirty
minutes had the lowest post-meal glucose peaks and insulin levels. Here’s
an analogy to drive the point home: If your body needs about 90 ounces of
water per day for optimal function, it wouldn’t make sense to chug it all in
thirty minutes, and not drink the rest of the day. Sipping the 90 ounces
throughout the day would obviously be much better. Same with movement.
You might find those constant “stand up” reminders on the Apple Watch and
other wearables annoying, but those recommendations are backed by solid
science and might be the most important prompt these wearables can offer.
Be Hot

A catchy term has arisen to refer to more movement through the day outside
of exercise: non-exercise activity thermogenesis (NEAT). NEAT refers to
any spontaneous physical activity that is not the result of voluntary
exercise. I find it odd that we’ve had to give this concept a fancy name and
acronym. Before the urbanization of work and the transition to a desk-based
existence, NEAT was just life. NEAT includes activities of daily living that
require movement, like cleaning, grocery shopping, gardening, puttering
around the house, walking from the car to a store, going upstairs, using a

standing desk, and playing with kids—even fidgeting counts.
Unsurprisingly, available data support that more NEAT could be an
essential tool for body-weight control.
Treadmill desks are an example of attempting to fit more NEAT into the
day. Researchers hypothesize that if you have obesity, using a treadmill
desk at slow speeds for just 2.5 hours per day could lead to a weight loss of
44 to 66 pounds in a year. This hasn’t yet been proven with data over a full
year. But research has shown that using a treadmill desk at work for just 2.5
hours per day for ten days led to an average drop of 2.6 pounds of fat mass
and an increase of 2.2 pounds in lean mass (muscle).
It’s worth thinking more about the thermogenesis part of non-exercise
activity thermogenesis, which refers to how exercise is “heat generating.”
Why is this relevant? When we contract our muscles, we need more ATP for
energy, which means we split it from adenosine triphosphate into ADP, or
adenosine diphosphate, releasing a phosphate. When that phosphate splits
off, the energy from the chemical bond is either used to fuel cellular
activities (like muscle contractions) or dissipated as heat. The more we
make and use ATP, the more heat we generate, which is why people who
have higher muscle mass tend to generate more heat at baseline. Some
studies have shown that exercise training can raise baseline body
temperature. Concerningly, Stanford research shows that our body
temperatures on average have gone down by close to 2 percent since
preindustrial times, corresponding to lower metabolic rates. I find it
disturbing that our temperature, as a species, is consistently declining. Heat
is a marker of our life force, our mitochondrial function, our engine, our
Good Energy, our yang, our light, and it’s dimming because we’re sitting.
You can stoke your internal fire by simply moving more (and building more
muscle).
Marketing over Science

Like the mass confusion about what to eat, the mass confusion about the
“right” form of movement and exercise can be paralyzing for consumers,

while fueling an $800 billion global fitness economy that has us
continuously doubting our strategy. I think this creates a defeating lack of
confidence in the average person that hurts the larger mission to get us to be
more active. The United States as a whole is the largest fitness consumer,
yet our population’s health worsens yearly. Nearly three hundred thousand
scientific studies on physical exercise have been published in the last ten
years, yet we’ve never been fatter or more sedentary. We have blindly
relinquished common sense in pursuit of “evidence.” The top podcasts in
the country debate the nuances of exact minutes per week and time of day
to do zone 2 training versus high-intensity interval training (HIIT), lactate
thresholds, eccentric versus concentric training. But only 28 percent of
Americans meet the basic guidelines for physical activity. All this
information is interesting, but let’s not miss the forest for the trees: it’s not
like there’s an epidemic of exercising too much in America.
Here’s the reality: Research has shown that all kinds of physical activity
benefit metabolic health and slash the risk of metabolic diseases. In large
populations, when total energy expenditure is the same, people who do the
most walking (relatively low intensity) and those who do the most vigorous
activities (relatively high intensity) profoundly reduce their type 2 diabetes
risk to a comparable degree.
Simply walking about 10,000 steps per day (as compared with lower
amounts) is associated with the following:
50 percent lower dementia risk
50 to 70 percent lower risk of premature death
44 percent lower risk of getting type 2 diabetes
31 percent (or more) lower risk of obesity
Significant reductions in cancer occurrence, major depression, gastric
reflux, and sleep apnea
Zero medications or surgeries can do for chronic disease prevention
what walking about 10,000 steps a day can do. Despite this, physicians

rarely prescribe exercise to patients. If a medication could slash
Alzheimer’s risk by 50 percent, it would be front-page news and prescribed
to every patient. But this “drug” does exist—it’s walking! Yet less than 16
percent of doctors prescribe movement to their patients, and 85 percent of
practitioners report zero training in prescribing exercise.
Even when the science on movement is clear, the medical system does
not adjust. Take, for example, the impact of physical activity on COVID-19
outcomes. A study of 194,191 people with COVID-19 showed that people
who were consistently inactive prior to contracting the coronavirus were
191 percent more likely to be hospitalized and 391 percent more likely to
die than those who were the most active (“most active” meant logging an
average of just 42.8 minutes of moderate to strenuous physical activity per
day). The benefits of exercise held even for those with preexisting
conditions. Given that mitochondria are the coordinators of cell immunity
and cell survival, mitochondrial function was implicated as early as 2020 as
a key factor in the likelihood of getting COVID, dying from COVID, and
experiencing long COVID. Researchers made recommendations to
“urgently” pursue preventive avenues to “strengthen the mitochondria” for
best COVID outcomes, with the leading recommendation being exercise (in
addition to fresh foods, breathing practices, and general preventive
medicine practices). None of this science made it into public health
recommendations or any formal guidelines.
As a thought experiment, imagine if we took just a fraction of the $4
trillion of annual health care spent and put it toward incentivizing more
movement: making cities more walkable; putting treadmills throughout
office buildings; subsidizing short hourly movement breaks in every school,
hospital, and workplace; or even outright paying at-risk populations to
move more!
Keep It Simple

With food, we covered three simple rules that get you quite far: don’t eat
added sugar, don’t eat industrially processed vegetable and seed oils, and

don’t eat highly processed grains.
With fitness, I also suggest three simple rules.
1. Walk at least 7,000 steps per day and space these steps out throughout
the day. Work up to 10,000 per day.
2. Get your heart rate above 60 percent of your maximum for at least 150
minutes a week. (That’s 30 minutes, five days a week.)
3. Lift heavy things multiple times per week in a way that hits every
major muscle group.
Are there important personalized and nuanced diet and movement
strategies beyond these simple rules? Of course. But here’s the key:
following these simple guidelines will make you feel so much better and
facilitate the awe, curiosity, and energy to go deeper. When you experience
the benefits of cutting refined sugars, grains, and industrial oils from your
diet, I can almost guarantee that you’ll start researching more whole-food
recipes and exploring other books and podcasts for more personalized
nutrition strategies. And if you commit to walking at least 7,000 steps a day
and doing 150 minutes per week of aerobic exercise as nonnegotiable,
you’ll inevitably explore different varieties of fitness and find the routine
that’s right for you. Start with the basics, and in the form of any activity you
enjoy, and make sure you’re hitting your goals. When you do this, the next
levels tend to bloom like a stunning flower.
I want to drill deeper on the recommendation for logging that 150
minutes of activity with elevated heart rate per week. Zone 2 aerobic
training is defined as an activity that generates a heart rate at 60 to 70
percent of your maximum heart rate (often defined as your age subtracted
from 220). Think of a brisk walk or light jog that you can continue for an
hour without much difficulty. Consistent zone 2 exercise confers powerful
metabolic benefits by stimulating mitochondrial health without excessive
strain on the body. The benefits of zone 2 are proof that you don’t have to
run your body into the ground for effective metabolic workouts. Zone 2
typically feels oddly easy. But the proof is in the research: sustained

moderate exercise increases the number of mitochondria, improves glucose
uptake, increases the efficiency of your heart, and reduces the risk for
nearly every chronic disease.
How do you know you’re in zone 2? Many fitness trackers, including
Apple Watch, now show zone scores based on your age and weight. Or you
can use the talk test: when you’re on the upper edge of zone 2, you
shouldn’t be able to say a sentence out loud without slowing down to catch
your breath.
While you can stay in zone 2 for the entire 150 minutes each week
(again, the key part of this habit is doing anything consistently), there is
evidence that getting your heart rate higher for short bursts by incorporating
HIIT can have powerful metabolic benefits. The American College of
Sports Medicine defines HIIT as any kind of workout that alternates short
bursts—anywhere from five seconds to eight minutes of intense activity—
where your heart rate reaches 80 to 95 percent of its maximal capacity, with
equal or longer periods of rest or physical activity, where your heart rate is
at 40 to 50 percent of your max.
Lastly, I implore anyone working to optimize their metabolic health or
weight to incorporate resistance training (otherwise known as strength
training or weight training). Resistance training simply means intentionally
making your muscles work against a weighted force, which could be
functional movements such as lifting or pushing heavy things in your home
or at work, lifting or pushing weights, or using your body weight as a force
to work against (think pull-ups or push-ups). Since we know that muscles
play an important role in clearing glucose from the blood, muscle mass
correlates with insulin sensitivity. A study from the NIH reported that
“resistance training has a favorable effect on metabolic syndrome since it
decreases fat mass, including abdominal fat. It also enhances insulin
sensitivity, improves glucose tolerance, and reduces blood pressure values.”
Think of a thick layer of muscle covering your skeleton as a metabolic
shield and a gateway to a longer and happier life. In my experience,
incorporating resistance training can be transformational for people who are
feeling “stuck” in their progress toward metabolic optimization or weight

loss. Focused weight training is especially important for women entering
middle age, who can greatly benefit from a metabolic boost as metabolism
takes a big hit with the natural decline of estrogen at menopause. Muscle
expert and geriatrician Dr. Gabrielle Lyon goes as far to say, “We aren’t
over fat; we are undermuscled.” The idea is that if you focus attention on
building more muscle rather than just losing weight, you’ll be much better
off in succeeding in improving body composition and metabolic health. And
since muscle mass naturally (and rapidly) declines each decade beginning at
age thirty, and low muscle mass is a risk factor for premature mortality, we
need to start weight training early in life and continue for life. It’s never too
late to start.

GOOD ENERGY BIOMARKERS AND MOVEMENT
When you’re striving to be part of the 6.8 percent of metabolically healthy
Americans, regular movement will help you get there. Research shows that
exercise improves all five of the following basic biomarkers of metabolism:
Glucose Levels Above 100 mg/dL: Twelve-week exercise programs of either

high-intensity running (40 minutes per week) or low-intensity running
(150 minutes per week) both brought participants’ blood sugar from the
prediabetic range (100 mg/dL or greater) to the nondiabetic range
(<100 mg/dL).
HDL Cholesterol Less Than 40 mg/dL: A 2019 review of the literature showed
that exercise increased HDL cholesterol, “with exercise volume, rather
than intensity, having a greater influence.” Meanwhile, “raising HDL
levels pharmacologically has not shown convincing clinical benefits.”
Triglycerides Above 150 mg/dL: Numerous studies have demonstrated that
physical activity effectively lowers triglyceride levels. In a 2019 study,
an eight-week moderate aerobic exercise program significantly reduced
triglyceride levels in participants. Furthermore, even a single session of
intense aerobic exercise has been found to decrease triglyceride levels
the following day. This positive effect could be due to the increased

activity of hepatic lipase in the liver, an enzyme that facilitates the
absorption of triglyceride from the bloodstream.
Blood Pressure of 130/85 mmHg or Higher: Research has shown the effects of
exercise among populations with high blood pressure were similar to
the effects of commonly used medications.
A Waistline of More Than 35 Inches for Women and 40 Inches for Men: Not
surprisingly, regular exercise can help decrease obesity by increasing
energy expenditure and promoting weight loss. Research shows a clear
inverse relationship between the amount of movement people do each
week and the size of their waistline: more movement, smaller waist
circumference. What’s more, lower activity (fewer than 5,100 steps per
day) yields a 2.5 times higher risk of central obesity than higher
activity (more than 8,985 steps per day).

TEMPERATURE
We know that too much stress on the body all the time is bad, but controlled
increases in specific stressors can cause adaptations that lower our chronic
levels of oxidative stress and inflammation.
A valuable mechanism to stress cells into positive adaptation is exposing
them to extreme temperatures. You’ve probably heard about cold plunging.
It’s been gaining a cult following among the biohackers, despite the upward
of $5,000 price tag for many of these specialized tubs. Getting cold or hot
isn’t something we could control for much of human history. “Indoors” is a
very new concept, and air-conditioning and central heat are even newer.
Our ancestors from the nineteenth century had inconsistent heating—and no
cooling systems—in their homes. Extreme heat and cold between seasons
and even in a single day was the norm for most humans for much of history.
In the Sahara Desert, for example, temperatures can reach up to 122°F
during the day and drop to 50°F or below at night. In the Rocky Mountains,
temperatures drop from 80°F during the day to 40°F or lower at night.
Our modern lives of “thermoneutrality” makes for bored mitochondria.
Mitochondria are heat-generating structures, like furnaces, but if we don’t

stimulate them to do the work to generate heat and ATP, they won’t do as
much. Our mitochondria are so bored and abused that our species appears to
be cooling. Body temperature seems to have dropped by as much as 1.06°F
over the past two hundred years, possibly because of a generally lower
metabolic rate. In recent years, we’ve seen compelling research showing
how adding large temperature fluctuations back into our lives brings
metabolic benefits by stimulating vascular activity, increasing the cells’
ability to generate their own heat, and increasing our cells’ antioxidant
capacity.
Heat and Cold

Our bodies have several mechanisms for regulating our internal temperature
when we’re exposed to cold. One way is through shivering, where the
muscles contract rapidly, splitting ATP molecules and, in doing so,
producing heat. Another way is through non-shivering thermogenesis,
where our body produces and utilizes more of a special type of
metabolically healthy fat (called brown fat) to help keep us warm.
Brown fat is different from the white fat that most people are familiar
with. While white fat stores energy, brown fat burns energy to produce heat.
It is sometimes referred to as “thermogenic fat.” Brown fat is brown
because it is filled with mitochondria and expresses high levels of a protein
called uncoupling protein 1 (UCP1). UCP1 is unique to brown fat and
allows it to produce heat instead of ATP. The UCP1 protein is a channel that
lets protons that were destined for driving ATP production instead leak out
from the inner membrane of the mitochondria, dissipating as heat instead of
generating ATP. Brown fat levels increase in winter as the body adapts to
stay warmer. Interestingly, HbA1c levels (a marker of average glucose
levels) tend to be lower in the winter, when temperature is colder and brown
fat levels are higher, although a causal relationship between HbA1c and
brown fat has not been established.
Studies have shown that brown fat readily takes up and utilizes glucose
and that people with more brown fat tend to have lower body mass and

lower glucose levels. In fact, a 2021 study found that the prevalence of type
2 diabetes in people with obesity and with brown fat was nearly half that of
people with obesity without brown fat, about 8 percent versus 20 percent,
respectively.
Exposing yourself to cold can activate your brown fat, which can help
you manage your blood sugar levels. Research shows that sleeping in a
room at 66°F for a month can increase insulin sensitivity and double the
activity and volume of brown fat in healthy men. Even short periods of cold
exposure can improve insulin sensitivity and glucose disposal, especially in
people with brown fat. In one study, wearing cooling vests for five to eight
hours increased resting energy expenditure by 15 percent in subjects with
brown fat. Whole-body glucose disposal also increased by about 13 percent
for subjects with brown fat, but there was no significant change for those
without brown fat. Cold acclimation can also improve metabolic health,
even in people with little brown fat. A ten-day cold acclimation program led
to a 43 percent increase in insulin sensitivity in men with type 2 diabetes
compared to their levels under normal temperatures. The program also
increased the activity of the GLUT4 glucose channel.
Researchers have also found that higher brown fat levels are related to
lower glycemic variability, helping maintain stable whole-body glucose
levels even when a person is not exposed to cold. In a 2016 study in Cell
Metabolism, participants were given a 75-gram glucose drink in a
comfortable 75°F room. The researchers found that brown fat activation and
resting energy expenditure both rose in response, even though the
participants weren’t exposed to cold, as the brown fat’s glucose uptake and
processing generated heat. The paper suggested that a brown fat deficiency
could be a clinical indicator of the development of blood sugar
dysregulation. Simply put, we want much more brown fat, and the best way
to get it is to expose the body to cold and inspire it to adapt.
Studies on deliberate heat exposure show that it has positive impacts on
metabolic health. Researchers surmise that regular sauna use produces “a
general stress-adaptation response” that is “possibly analogous to the . . .
responses of exercise.” Heat exposure can also increase the production of a

protein called heat shock protein 70 (HSP70). HSP70 is involved in a
variety of cellular processes, including stress response and inflammation.
Research has suggested that HSP70 may play a role in improving insulin
sensitivity and reducing inflammation.
Additionally, heat exposure has been shown to increase the production
of nitric oxide, the molecule that helps to relax blood vessels and improve
blood flow. Improved blood flow can enhance glucose uptake in skeletal
muscle, which can improve insulin sensitivity. These mechanisms have led
research findings to show that heat exposure is linked to reduced blood
pressure, improved cardiac function markers, decreased total and LDL
cholesterol levels, and decreased fasting blood glucose levels.
An observational study of Finnish men found striking reductions of
metabolic conditions in people who regularly used saunas: “reductions [in]
sudden cardiac death (63%) and all-cause mortality (40%) as well as for
dementia (66%) and Alzheimer’s disease (65%), in men who used a sauna
4−7 times per week compared to only once per week.”
Cold and heat exposure can lead to a significant improvement in mood.
Research has shown that cold-water submersion can increase dopamine
levels by 250 percent. Cold exposure has been shown to activate the
sympathetic nervous system and release neurotransmitters like
norepinephrine, which can increase alertness and mood. Repeated sauna use
has been shown to lower cortisol, the main stress hormone.
Heat seems to also upregulate our antioxidant defenses, positively
impacting the oxidative stress that contributes to Bad Energy.
Before you go running to purchase an expensive sauna and ice bath, I
would recommend trying one of these free or inexpensive ways.
1. At the end of your showers, turn the water to cold for two minutes. This
is how my coauthor, Calley, started doing regular cold exposure, and he
came out of the shower feeling great and ended up looking forward to
it.
2. Jump into cold bodies of water. From October to about April in Oregon,
the river and lakes near my house are all extremely cold, so I frequently

jump in with friends. Now, nearly everywhere I go that has cold water,
I’ll take a dip, from glacier lakes in Montana or Wyoming during
hiking trips, to the ocean in Northern California, to unheated pools in
winter.
3. Find a cold-plunging or sauna group in your town on Meetup, social
media, or Google.
4. Take a hot yoga class, like Bikram or Modo Yoga, which keeps the
temperature above 100°F during the class.
5. Get outdoors and move when it’s hot outside (but make sure to stay
hydrated, consume enough food and electrolytes, and don’t get
sunburned.)
6. Find a local gym or community center with a sauna or hot tub.
How much to do? Exact numbers are unclear and will differ between
people, but in a review of the research, Dr. Andrew Huberman
recommended fifty-seven minutes of hot sauna per week and eleven
minutes of cold exposure per week “as reliable thresholds to derive major
benefits on metabolism, insulin and growth hormone pathways.”

SYNTHETIC CHEMICALS AND ENVIRONMENTAL TOXINS
Synthetic chemicals and environmental toxins envelop us and are a key,
grossly underrecognized driver of Bad Energy. Since World War II, over
eighty thousand synthetic chemicals have entered our environment and
approximately fifteen hundred new chemicals are released each year, many
of which have never been tested for safety in adults, children, or fetuses.
Artificial chemicals and toxins are now found in dangerous levels in our air,
food, water, homes, and soil and present a constant assault on our cells that
directly impair the microbiome, gene expression, hormone receptors, the
folding of our genome (epigenetics), intracellular signaling pathways,
neurotransmitter signaling, fetal development, enzyme activity, hormonal
control of eating behavior, thyroid function, resting metabolic rate, liver
function, and more. These chemicals are drivers of all three hallmarks of
Bad Energy: oxidative stress, inflammation, and mitochondrial dysfunction

—and the link is now so well defined that many of these chemicals are
being classified as obesogens, meaning that they are known to impair
metabolism in such a way that they causatively contribute to obesity and
insulin resistance. Dr. Robert Lustig, professor emeritus of
neuroendocrinology at UCSF, believes that at least 15 percent of the obesity
epidemic is directly tied to environmental chemicals.
Examples of obesogens include household disinfectants and cleaners,
fragrances and perfumes, air “fresheners,” makeup, lotions, shampoos,
deodorants, body wash, household paint, the ink on receipts, plastics, vinyl
flooring, food preservatives and colorings, many pharmaceutical drugs,
clothing, furniture, children’s toys, electronics, flame retardants, industrial
solvents, car exhaust, and the pesticides that cover our food. The emerging
understanding of the obesity-promoting qualities of industrial chemicals
tells us that eating an ultra-processed food like Cheerios means that you
may be getting a quadruple dose of Bad Energy potential: one in the ultrarefined food itself, one in the additives and preservatives, one in the
pesticides, and one in the plastic packaging. Wash it down with
conventional milk and a glass of unfiltered water and you compound the
issue.
Many of these synthetic chemicals support industry interests but not
cellular health. Adding chemicals to products increases shelf life, allows for
the cheapest packaging, or gives a product a scent without using natural
essential oils—but they also pose significant harm to humans. While the
GRAS (generally recognized as safe) designation given by the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration (FDA) is intended to allow for the commercial use
of substances deemed safe for use in food and other consumer products, this
oversight is grossly inadequate. Companies are able to self-determine
GRAS status via their own review of scientific literature, and the program is
entirely voluntary, meaning that a company does not need to get the FDA’s
approval if the company determines that the chemical in question is GRAS
—talk about conflict of interest! Many chemicals that have been given
GRAS status at one time are now clearly linked to serious health issues
such as cancer, neurologic problems, metabolic disruption, or infertility,

including artificial sweeteners, propylparaben (an antimicrobial preservative
found in lotions, shampoos, and food), butylated hydroxyanisole (BHA, a
food preservative), and brominated vegetable oil (a food additive).
Moreover, GRAS is predicated on the idea that chemicals exist in isolation
and ignores the synergistic adverse effect of layering hundreds of these
chemicals on a human body simultaneously, every day, which is the overt
reality of our world. GRAS is not protecting you, and you should focus on
consuming and using products that are as natural as possible in all domains
of life.
The Endocrine Society has come out strongly for increased precautions
around synthetic chemicals, stating “strong mechanistic, experimental,
animal, and epidemiological evidence” for the impact of hormonedisrupting environmental chemicals on “obesity, diabetes mellitus,
reproduction, thyroid, cancers, and neuroendocrine and neurodevelopmental
functions.” They add that while “ten years ago, there simply was not the
body of evidence that there is today about the . . . disease consequences of
endocrine disrupting chemicals,” the state of evidence now “removes any
doubt.”
The following list describes nine classes of chemicals in the
environment that are known to hurt human health directly through
metabolic mechanism:
1. Bisphenol A (BPA)—commonly found in plastic products such as plastic
water bottles, food containers like cans, and thermal receipts, BPA is a
known hormone disruptor that accumulates and sticks around in fatty
tissue. (Of note, studies have found that a thermal receipt—like the
type you might get at a grocery store—can contain 250 to 1,000 times
more than a can of food.) It increases the risk of obesity, insulin
resistance, type 2 diabetes, male and female fertility, and chronic
inflammation. Studies have suggested that BPA reduces antioxidant
capacity, increases oxidative stress, and impairs mitochondrial
dynamics.

2. Phthalates—commonly found in cosmetics, fragrances, nail polish,
lotion, deodorant, hair spray, gel, shampoos, toys, plastics, and artificial
leather, phthalates are hormone disruptors that are “significantly
related” to insulin resistance, high blood pressure, earlier menopause,
pregnancy loss, birth complications, genital development and semen
quality, early puberty, asthma, developmental delay, and social
impairment. Phthalates induce mitochondrial toxicity and increase
oxidative stress in a dose-dependent manner, meaning that the more
exposure, the worse the effects.
3. Parabens—commonly used as preservatives in moisturizers, shampoos,
makeup, deodorant, shaving cream, foods, beverages, and
pharmaceuticals, parabens are absorbed through the skin and oral
ingestion and have been shown to be present in several body fluids and
human tissues like blood, breast milk, semen, placental tissue, and
breast cells. Parabens are problematic in how they bind to hormone
receptors like those of our sex hormones (estrogen, progesterone, and
testosterone) and stress hormones—thereby altering hormonal activity
—and impact the metabolism of hormones. Hormones dictate all
aspects of our biology, like neuronal development, immune function,
thyroid function, metabolism, fetal development, and reproduction.
Parabens directly bind hormone receptors and impart functional
changes to the delicate balance of hormones regulating our lives and
feelings. Parabens have been associated with DNA damage in sperm,
sperm death, and infertility. Unfortunately, current wastewater
treatment technology does not effectively remove parabens.
4. Triclosan—commonly used as an antimicrobial agent in personal care
products, such as toothpaste and hand sanitizer, triclosan is absorbed
into the body through skin and mouth tissues. It has been linked to
hormone disruption, immune system impairment, thyroid problems,
and antibiotic resistance, mostly in animal studies. Triclosan has been
found in human body fluids, with peer-reviewed research suggesting
that “humans are unequivocally exposed to significant and potentially
unsafe levels.” Triclosan causes “universal disruption of mitochondria”

as a mitochondrial uncoupler, leading to changes in mitochondrial
shape to a dysfunctional “doughnut” shape, inhibition of the electron
transport chain, mitochondrial splitting or “fission,” prevention of
mitochondria from moving around the cell effectively, and reduction of
proper calcium levels in mitochondria (which are required for
function). Overall, triclosan’s multifarious impacts on the mitochondria
negatively impact ATP production and increase oxidative stress.
5. Dioxins—a group of “highly toxic” compounds that are by-products of
industrial processes (like bleaching paper pulp and making pesticides)
and burning trash, coal, oil, and wood. These “persistent organic
pollutants” (POPs) don’t readily degrade and persist in our environment
while accumulating in animal fat. According to the World Health
Organization, more than 90 percent of human exposure is through fatty
animal foods like fish, dairy, and meat. Through animal and human
research, dioxins are known to cause developmental and reproductive
problems, skeletal deformity, kidney defects, reduced sperm count,
increased rate of miscarriages, immune system disorders, lung cancer,
lymphoma, stomach cancer, and sarcomas. Dioxins may impact human
health by generating “mitochondrial stress signaling,” which activates
the NF-𝜅B pathway, and can induce chronic inflammation and disturb
microbiome activity.
6. Polychlorinated Biphenyls (PCBs)—Fortunately, PCBs have been banned.
However, these slowly degrading chemicals are still “ubiquitous
environmental contaminants” found in air, water, soil, and fish
worldwide and through interactions with PCB-containing products or
equipment made before 1977. Considered dioxin-like, PCBs were
widely used in making hydraulic and lubricating fluids, flame
retardants, plasticizers, paint, adhesives, lubricating fluids, and other
industrial products. Like many synthetic chemicals, they
“bioaccumulate and biomagnify as they move up the food chain,”
meaning that if you eat a food like a bottom-feeding fish that may
regularly dine on PCB-laden sediment or other PCB-containing fish,
the level of PCBs in the fish could be as much as one million times

higher than the water it lives in. In cell culture studies, PCBs are toxic
to neurons due to impairment of the mitochondrial electron transport
chain, impairment of the initial breakdown of glucose in the cell (a
process called glycolysis), and, ultimately, reduction in ATP production.
7. Perfluoroalkyl and Polyfluoroalkyl Substances (PFAS)—commonly found in
nonstick cookware, grease-proof coatings for paper and cardboard food
packaging (like microwave popcorn bags, fast-food wrappers, and takeout containers), firefighting foams, and coatings for carpets and fabrics,
these are often referred to as “forever chemicals” because they do not
readily decompose or get excreted from the human body. A key source
of PFAS in the environment is drinking water. Research has shown that
PFAS possibly increase the risk of cancers of the liver, breast, pancreas,
and testicles in animals, and cancers of the testicles, kidneys, thyroid,
prostate, bladder, breast, and ovaries in humans (although some data
conflicts). When PFAS accumulate in tissues of the body, they damage
mitochondria, which contribute to the recruitment of immune cells and
the development of chronic inflammation. They also generate oxidative
stress by both creating more free radicals and impairing the activity of
antioxidants.
8. Organophosphate Pesticides—5.6 billion pounds of pesticides are used
each year globally, despite being strongly linked to oxidative stress,
cancer, respiratory problems, neurotoxic effects, metabolic problems,
and adverse child development. These pesticides cover our food and
enter the water system, with the USDA estimating that the drinking
water of fifty million people is contaminated with pesticides and
agricultural chemicals. This not only hurts consumers but especially
discriminates against farmers and children. Acute pesticide poisoning
(APP) is estimated to affect 44 percent of farmers every year, for a total
of 385 million cases per year worldwide and approximately twenty
thousand deaths. Children are uniquely at risk from pesticides because
of pesticides’ impact on their tiny bodies during critical developmental
windows, and they can be exposed through the air, food, water, pets,
and touch by playing on carpet, upholstered objects, lawns, grass in

parks, and eating conventional and processed food. Forty-five percent
of all reports of pesticide poisoning to poison control centers involve
children. Studies have suggested that organophosphate exposure may
affect mitochondrial function by inducing oxidative stress and
impairing mitochondrial respiration. Do not use pesticides, like
Roundup, on your lawn, and avoid conventionally grown foods. As
with many chemicals, the liver primarily metabolizes pesticides before
they are excreted in feces or urine. Protecting liver, gut, and kidney
function is paramount to the effective elimination of many toxic
synthetic chemicals, which Good Energy habits can help.
9. Heavy Metals—commonly found in contaminated soil, water, and food,
heavy metals like mercury, cadmium, arsenic, and lead are naturally
occurring substances that can be toxic when concentrated at high levels
through manufacturing and industrial processes. Excess heavy metals
can cause various health problems, including neurological damage,
developmental delays, cancer, and other health issues. Research has
shown that metals can both increase oxidative stress and lead to
mitochondrial dysfunction.
A common theme among many of the most dangerous chemicals in our
modern world concerns plastic production and food preservation. We must
limit our societal use of plastics: We have now produced nine billion tons of
plastic since it was patented less than two hundred years ago, the vast
majority of which is now trash, littering our oceans, rivers, and streams,
leaching toxic Bad Energy chemicals into our water, soil, food, and even
our air. The rise of ultra-processed and packaged food—and the hoards of
toxic “preservatives” we now use to make them shelf-stable—is a
phenomenon less than one hundred years old. These recent problems could
quickly scale back with collective effort and will, and they must.
Contaminated water is another key theme, and I don’t believe it’s an
overstatement to say that drinking water is unsafe to drink without filtering
for most Americans. The Environmental Working Group (EWG)’s database
that analyzes water contaminants based on zip codes shows that it’s not
uncommon for substances like arsenic to be over one thousand times the

EWG health guideline in many cities. Research estimates that tap water is
contaminated with PFAS for over two hundred million Americans. The fact
that our water is poisoned with chemicals that diminish our body’s
capability to power itself can sound dispiriting. But to me, it is empowering
to understand in plain language that many institutions impacting our health
are broken, so we can be motivated to protect ourselves and work toward
better solutions.
Regarding water, health leader Dhru Purohit has aptly popularized the
truism: “Either you have a filter, or you become the filter.” This applies to
all aspects of our environment: we either thoughtfully source pesticide-free
food, filter our air, filter our water, buy less-toxic toys and furniture, stop
touching receipts and thermal papers, minimize plastic use, and eliminate
conventional household products and personal care products with synthetic
scents and obesogens, or our bodies and poor organs become the filters for
the thousands of synthetic chemicals that these products contain. Without
this vigilance, we damage our bodies and force our cells to manage the
overwhelming task of responding to these threatening toxic substances
rather than letting the cells do their work of producing Good Energy to let
us thrive. Minimizing the toxic burden in your environment through simple
swaps and filters is easy, inexpensive, and high yield for metabolic health.

Principles for Replenishing What Modernity Took Away
Exercise Principles:
Moderate intensity movement for at least 150 minutes per week
Calculate your max heart rate by subtracting your age from 220, and
then determining what 64 percent of this is, which is the floor for
moderate-intensity movement.
Log 10,000 steps per day.
Measurable on any fitness tracker.
Move a little bit during at least eight hours every day.
Measurable on any fitness tracker.
Aim for resistance training three times per week.
Incorporate exercises that fatigue the arms, legs, and core every
week. You can resistance train with body-weight exercises or with

weights.

Temperature Principles:
Get at least one cumulative hour per week of heat exposure.
This can be through a dry sauna, infrared sauna, or a heated exercise
class like hot yoga.
Get at least twelve cumulative minutes per week of cold exposure.
This can be through cryotherapy, cold showers, or cold immersion in a
cold plunge tub or cold body of water (like a lake, river, or pool in
winter).

Toxins Principles:
Filter air and water in your home.
Using an activated charcoal filter and reverse osmosis are the best
options for water, and a HEPA filter for air.
Eat unprocessed organic or regeneratively grown food.
Avoid plastics wherever possible; opt for glass or other materials instead.
Take stock of the plastic products in your home, closet, and kitchen
and work to minimize.
Swap out home care and personal care products for clean alternatives with
transparent ingredients that you know.
A great first step is to remove any products in your home that have
scents and replace with unscented products or eliminate entirely: air
“fresheners” in the car and home, detergents, fabric softener, dish
soap, dishwashing liquid, laundry sheets, shampoo, conditioner, body
wash, body soap, deodorant, shaving cream, perfume, lotion. The
scents in all of these products are overtly toxic. Unscented organic
castile soap (like Dr. Bronner’s) can replace hand soap, body soap,
body wash, and dish soap; vinegar and water can replace all-purpose
cleaning sprays; and organic jojoba oil or coconut oil can replace
lotions.
Check the EWG databases for toxicity ratings on various consumer
products.
Support the body’s natural detoxification pathways that involve the liver, gut,
kidney, skin, and circulatory system by practicing Good Energy habits.

To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

CHAPT ER

9

Fearlessness
The Highest Level of Good Energy

Humans have evolved to experience potent feelings of fear, anxiety,
sadness, and judgment, and for good reason: these feelings help keep us
safe by generating unpleasant sensations to get us to respond in the face of a
real threat to our survival. Without the ability to respond to threats in our
surroundings, we’d quickly perish. Throughout human history, most of the
threats we’ve been exposed to would be in our immediate surroundings,
like a natural disaster, a snake slithering into your dwelling, or an invading
army. But in the span of just a century, we now have the technological
capability to be exposed to the threats facing any person, anywhere in the
world, twenty-four hours a day, all live-streamed to a screen in our hands.
Overnight, the traumas and fears of eight billion others have all become
ours to process.
This is potentially the most abnormal thing we face as modern humans,
more than the ultra-processed food, the excess sitting, the constant artificial
light, or the thermoneutral existence. The human mind and body were never
meant to experience constant terrorizing messaging, and we now cannot
avoid it (billboards, newspapers, social media, TV!). And we also can’t
seem to look away, because we are biologically hardwired to pay attention
to threats. Technological connectivity has ushered in an era of full-blown
digital terrorism that we are, oddly, glued to. As CNN’s technical director
was caught saying about the news, “If it bleeds, it leads.” When the stories

are morbid, they get attention. On top of this, all humans will experience
personal challenges and traumas throughout our lives, and in the face of our
cultural stigmatization about mental health care, we have limited resources
to process them. With all this, we are getting crushed:
Close to 40 percent of U.S. women report a diagnosis of depression in
their lifetime, and a full third of Americans report an anxiety disorder
in their lifetime.
Three-quarters of young Americans feel unsafe daily.
A survey published in February 2023 by the CDC revealed that in
2021, 57 percent of high school girls reported experiencing “persistent
feelings of sadness or hopelessness in the past year,” a significant
increase from the 36 percent reported in 2011.
Seventy-six percent of Americans reported health impacts from stress
in the past month, with the main drivers of that stress being health
concerns.
Many other leading surveys show a pronounced increase in depression,
particularly among adolescents around the 2011 period (which happens
to be the year Instagram burst onto the scene).
It’s easy to gloss over these statistics, but take a moment to take them in:
in a time when life expectancy and standard of living seem to be higher
than ever, hundreds of millions of people in the wealthiest country in human
history—including children—are suffering from sadness, fear, and profound
stress. There has always been suffering in the world, but now we can see
exponentially more of it than ever, all at once, on screens we hold in our
beds and at the dinner table.
In response, modern humans have looked for salvation and coping
anywhere we can get a hit of dopamine-fueled “pleasure” and distraction:
things like processed sugar, alcohol, soda, refined carbs, vapes, cigarettes,
weed, porn, dating apps, email, texts, casual sex, online gambling, video
games, Instagram, TikTok, Snapchat, and the relentless novelty of

experiences. As Johann Hari, author of Stolen Focus, has said, “We’ve
created a culture where really large numbers of people can’t bear to be
present in their daily lives and need to medicate themselves throughout the
day.” The impact of our modern psychological reality—and the unhealthy
coping mechanisms—is that our cells’ ability to produce Good Energy is
dimmed, creating a vicious cycle that robs us of the full potential of our
human experience.
A cell living in a body experiencing chronic fear is a cell that cannot
fully thrive. When our cells sense sustained danger, they divert resources to
defense and alarm pathways instead of normal functions that generate
sustainable health. Given this, no matter how pristine your dietary intake is,
how much you’re moving, how much sunlight you’re getting, or how many
hours of quality sleep you’re getting, if the cells are bathed in a stew of
stress created by the way psychology translates to biochemistry (via
hormones, neurotransmitters, inflammatory cytokines, and neurologic
signals), all the other healthy choices will fall flat.
It is our most fundamental job to take stock of the persistent fear triggers
in our life and work to heal them or limit their exposure. We do this through
psychological modalities like boundary setting, introspection, meditation,
breathwork, therapy, plant medicine, spending time in nature, and many
others outlined at the end of this chapter.
Don’t confuse setting boundaries to what information you allow in your
ears and eyes with putting your head in the sand; it’s understanding and
protecting your biology so you don’t implode. This allows you to show up
with maximal energy to positively impact the world.
Everyone’s threat signals are going to be different. It could be chronic
work stress from a challenging relationship with your boss. It could be
residual childhood trauma from a strained relationship with a parent. It
could be a feeling of lack of safety in your home or neighborhood. It could
be a news article about a murder that happened twenty-five hundred miles
away. It could be from a sense of danger from a virus sweeping across the
globe. It could be from news of war five thousand miles away. It could be
about rights or liberties being threatened by a political agenda. It could be

from a worry about not being good enough, pretty enough, or smart enough.
Take stock of your own so you can protect your cells from constant
psychological harm and create an environment of peace for them.

THE FEAR MACHINE THAT KEEPS US SICK AND
DEPENDENT
In medical school, I was taught that anything—no matter the cost, side
effects, or societal toll—is justifiable to prevent death, even if it only
squeaks out a few more painful, vegetative days. The message patients
receive from hospitals and pharma companies isn’t that “we are going to
keep you healthy and help you have the best possible life”—it is that “we
are going to keep you alive.”
Attend your annual physical. Get your screenings. Take your pills. Get
this surgery. And if you don’t, you just might die. The fear of death is
weaponized to get patients to do anything: more meds, procedures,
operations, and specialists. The subtext is that if you say no, delay
treatment, or take a more natural route, you just might die sooner. These
dynamics are especially powerful in the modern West, where—unlike many
indigenous and Eastern cultures—we tend to be culturally avoidant of
talking about death or having curiosity about it, leading it to be an
existential fear for many. So many of the texts that have stood the test of
time—spanning Rumi, Khalil Gibran, Hafiz, Marcus Aurelius, Yogananda,
Seneca, Lao-tzu, Thích Nhất Hạnh, and more—implore us to examine
death and trust that it is both natural and not to be feared. Somehow these
messages haven’t remotely made it to the mainstream health care
ecosystem, where death is unacceptable.
For me, death was my greatest fear from childhood and into adulthood
and the one I have had to address head-on to unpeel the layers shielding me
from Good Energy. I have spent more of my life worrying about the ways I
or my family could die than about any other issue. Death was the reason for
my mind racing countless nights. Death is why I got into medicine.

A set of experiences with my mother beginning in early 2020 changed
my perspective on worry—particularly about death—forever. Concerned
about her rising glucose and cholesterol levels, I took her to Sedona for “Dr.
Casey’s Bootcamp” of proven actions to improve metabolic health:
extended fasting, cold plunging, exercise, morning sunrise hikes. It was a
year before we’d discover her pancreatic cancer.
Having not eaten for three days and on a ketone high, I felt euphoric as
my mom and I looked at the towering Red Rock Mountains together. My
mom and I had hiked to the top of a ridge in the dark for a full-moon drum
circle that we’d heard about from a local art gallery, and she and I danced
together in the moonlight with abandon.
Looking at the towering rocks, I couldn’t get the idea out of my head
that the mountains and I were made of much the same thing. The atoms that
make up my body have been on the earth since its creation some 4.6 billion
years ago. And for a brief sliver of time, my mitochondria produce ATP to
power the organization of these atoms into my tissues, organs, and
ultimately me.
In Sedona, my mom and I talked about how the ideas of “self” and the
finality of death were illusions. In reality, large portions of our bodies are
dying on a regular basis—we each shed more than a pound of cells each
day. Our cells make up to 88 percent of dust in our homes. In medical
school, I looked at slivers of body parts on slides under the microscope and
was surprised to see the full spectrum of life and death happening inside
what seemed like an “adult” living body. But at the microscopic level, cells
were dying, dividing, being born, aging at vastly different rates. At the
cellular level, we die and are reborn trillions upon trillions of times in one
“lifetime.” The discarded matter from our bodies returns to the earth and
eventually creates new things. Fossil fuels, which supply 80 percent of the
earth’s energy today, are nothing more than the remains of animals and
plants that existed millions of years ago. We are literally powering our cars
and homes with the atoms that made up our ancestors.
It is merely a limitation of our visual systems that we don’t see these
innumerable reactions happening every second in our body and the constant

creation and re-creation that makes up our world.
I speculated with my mom about whether the discarded pieces of myself
would be taken up into a delicious piece of broccoli that feeds a child. Or
maybe I would supply some carbons that will be pounded into a perfect
diamond. Or maybe I will donate some atomic dust to a gust of wind that
helps form mountain ranges that are yet to exist. Probably all the above,
plus other forms I can’t even conceive of.
The impact we have on others—the people we love, the people we
mistreat, the people we teach, the people who read our writing—literally
changes their biology and lives forever. As my mom and I danced and
hugged under the moonlight, I thought about how this loving experience
with her was literally changing the physical neural pathways and biology in
my body through neurotransmitter and hormone release, reinforcing
synapses, and transferring microbiomes to each other. My experience of her
—and all people with whom I choose to interact—will physically encode
itself in me.
On January 7, 2021, I received a Facetime call from my mother while I
was preparing dinner, tears streaming down her face as she told me that she
was dying, that she had to leave me, and that she would not meet my future
children. She relayed that she had learned earlier that day that her vague
stomach pain had actually been widely metastatic stage 4 pancreatic cancer
and she had softball-sized tumors all throughout her belly.
Over the next thirteen days, the final days of my mom’s consciousness,
she received hundreds of letters about the impact she’d had on people’s
lives. I will never forget the gratitude and poignant emotion on her face as
she sat reading them, while outside on the porch overlooking the Pacific.
Every note was from a human who’d been biochemically changed because
of my mother’s impact on them. Just as we had talked about in Sedona, I
could feel that she was fundamentally immortal due to her impact on
everyone in her life and her energetic ripple effect in the universe, which
every one of us is connected to and contributes to by our sheer existence.
She was without fear as she held my hand and told me that she could feel
her life force rapidly retreating.

Days after she died, we buried her in a natural cemetery along the
coastline. How profound to lower her beautiful body into a small patch of
dirt among the endless expanse of the ocean. This woman—whom my
brother and I had lived inside of, our source, who built my body and
consciousness, who traveled the world, and who impacted thousands of
people—disintegrated into the earth to feed the trees and flowers and
mushrooms above her in an eternal cycle. Worrying about the years her
physical body existed on Earth seemed so irrelevant. All my years of
anxiety about my mortality and the mortality of my family had been wasted
energy. Death is uncontrollable and it is OK. I feel that because when I held
my mother as she took her last breath, she was OK. In her final waking
moments, she whispered to me that we are here to protect the energy of the
universe. That it all—the life, the death—was perfect.
Lowering my mother into the soil, I felt the deepest sense that my
mother and I—and everything and everyone else—are inextricably
intertwined, and nothing about death can change that. Despite the humanmade forces creating the overwhelming perception of separation, scarcity,
and fear in order to exert power, create dependency, and extract money
from humans and nature—just as the forty-two specialties of medicine
obfuscate the reality of one body—we can push back and we can embody a
different truth of total connectedness and limitlessness. I felt Rumi’s words
wash over me: “Don’t grieve. Anything you lose comes round in another
form” and “Why think separately of this life and the next when one is born
of the last?” And in the solidification of that belief, I felt the next layer of
Good Energy open for me: fearlessness.
The grip of existential worry and chronic low-grade fear that had lived
in me from early childhood started to be processed and released, and in that,
I felt my health baseline shift and I felt compelled to continue the journey
of becoming empowered by my true nature as a dynamic, eternal process, a
concept I’d never been taught in my medical training. My mind was
relaxing and my cells were becoming free to do their best possible work.

HOW THE MIND CONTROLS METABOLISM
Why is overcoming chronic fear so critical to Good Energy? Because in
many ways, our mind controls our metabolism. When it comes to Good
Energy and the brain, it’s a vicious cycle: a lack of healthy habits weakens
the brain’s defenses to chronic stress, and chronic stress and fear can
directly cause more metabolic dysfunction that worsens mood and
resilience. Consider that 75 to 90 percent of human diseases are related to
activation of stress-related biology, and much evidence points to a common
pathway between psychological stressors and metabolic dysfunction. Your
cells “listen” to all your thoughts through biochemical signals, and the
message they are getting from chronic stress is to halt the production of
Good Energy. In fact, intense acute stress and chronic stress trigger all the
hallmarks of Bad Energy:
1. Chronic Inflammation: In mice, just six hours of acute stress leads to a
“rapid mobilization” of the immune system, with the increase in
concentration of inflammatory cytokines. Cytokines are specific
immune chemicals involved in early attacks of infections and wounds,
as well as gene expression of pathways related to immune cell
migration (the way immune cells get to the place they need to go to
fight). Stressful thoughts trigger neuroinflammation (inflammation in
the brain). Neuroinflammation leads to metabolic dysfunction in the
brain and predisposes us to metabolic diseases, like depression and
neurodegeneration. It also impacts the whole body by kicking off the
“stress arm” of the nervous system—the sympathetic nervous system
(SNS) or fight-or-flight system. Overactivation of the SNS drives
insulin resistance, hyperglycemia, and mobilization of inflammatory
cells and cytokines throughout the body, further compounding Bad
Energy everywhere. Longer periods of psychological stress, like
childhood abuse, are associated with elevated levels of the
inflammatory cytokines CRP, TNF-α, and IL-6. One researcher notes
that chronic stress–induced inflammation represents the “common soil”
of a wide variety of metabolic diseases like cancer, fatty liver disease,

heart disease, and type 2 diabetes. Remember, inflammation directly
leads to Bad Energy by blocking the expression of glucose channels,
blocking the insulin signal from transmitting inside the cell, and
promoting the release of free fatty acids from fat cells, which can then
be taken up by the liver and muscle and generate insulin resistance.
2. Oxidative Stress: In 2004, a study examined the blood of fifteen medical
students both before and after their significant exams to measure
oxidative stress biomarkers. The findings showed that the students had
lower levels of antioxidants leading up to the exams and experienced
higher levels of DNA and lipid damage from oxidation. These results
suggest that their cells were subjected to oxidative stress during the
stressful period. There is evidence to suggest that work-related stress
also contributes to oxidative stress. For example, a study in Japan
demonstrated a correlation between 8-hydroxydeoxyguanosine (8-OHdG), an oxidative stress marker, and female workers’ perceived
workload, psychological stress, and sense of impossibility in reducing
stress. Similarly, a study in Spain found a relationship between high
levels of work-related stress and malondialdehyde, another oxidative
stress biomarker. In rats, chronic stress induces oxidation of fats and
decreases antioxidant activity. This correlated with higher LDL
cholesterol and triglycerides, lower HDL, and, ultimately, plaque
development in the rodents’ arteries. Interestingly, animal studies have
shown that ingested antioxidants may protect against stress-induced
mitochondrial dysfunction, “indicating the existence of stresssensitizing and stress-buffering factors for the effects of induced stress
on mitochondria.” Similarly, when mice are engineered to overexpress
mitochondrial antioxidant enzymes, they seem to have increased
capacity to handle stressors.
3. Mitochondrial Dysfunction: While almost all research on psychosocial stress
and mitochondrial function has been done in animals, the results
indicate a clear theme that “chronic stress induced through a form of
psychosocial stressor decreases mitochondrial energy production
capacity and alters mitochondrial morphology.” This showed up as

reduction in the function of mitochondrial proteins, lower rate of
oxygen consumption (which is needed to make ATP in the
mitochondria), and lower mitochondrial content.
4. High Glucose Levels: Elevations of stress hormones resulting from acute
psychological stressors can lead to diabetogenic effects, meaning that
they immediately raise blood sugar rapidly while also causing fat cells
to break down fat and release it into the bloodstream, which promotes
insulin resistance. During stress, the body mobilizes a “quick” and
robust source of energy, so stress hormones prompt the rapid
breakdown of stored glucose from the liver (glycogenolysis) and
increase production of glucose from the liver (gluconeogenesis). As
stress hormones trigger the rapid breakdown of triglycerides (stored
fat) in fat cells, one of the breakdown products is glycerol, which can
be transported to the liver to manufacture glucose via gluconeogenesis.
Researchers believe that repeated acute stress responses could “induce
repeated exposure to transient hyperglycemia and hyperlipidemia, and
insulin resistance, which could evolve toward type 2 diabetes onset in
the long term.” Levels members often report being surprised by the
impact a stressful day at work can have on their blood sugar, and how
increases in blood sugar can indicate stress.
5. Worse Metabolic Biomarkers: Chronic stress is associated with obesity,
lower HDL, increased visceral fat, larger waist circumference, and
higher blood pressure, LDL, heart rate, insulin levels, and triglycerides.
What’s more, cortisol levels have been shown to be a predictor of
elevated levels of HOMA-IR, a key marker of insulin resistance.
Traumas Crush Good Energy

It’s not just the day-to-day low-grade stressors that add up to problems for
health. Traumatic events also have a long-term impact on our metabolic
health. A significant body of research shows that stressful events during
childhood, called adverse childhood experiences (ACEs), can have longterm effects on the regulation of stress hormones in our bodies. These can

include emotional or physical neglect or abuse, household dysfunction,
insults or put-downs, bullying, crime, death of a loved one, severe illness,
life-threatening accidents, and natural disasters. Research suggests that up
to 80 percent of people experience one or more of these events, and they
contribute to increased risk of developing conditions such as obesity,
diabetes, heart disease, and metabolic syndrome. In one study, children who
were maltreated (as defined by maternal rejection, harsh discipline, physical
or sexual abuse, or multiple changes in caregivers) were 80 percent more
likely to have high inflammatory marker levels (CRP), while social
isolation conferred a 134 percent higher risk of having elevated metabolic
biomarkers. Early life adversity has been consistently associated with
dysregulation of the stress regulation pathways in the body that persists into
adulthood, which can predict stress-related chronic illness like metabolic
diseases. What’s more, childhood abuse may be related to altered reward
processing in the brain and may predispose to excess food intake and food
addiction into adulthood.
So often in my practice, I would ask patients if they were “stressed” or
had past traumas, and they would flatly say no. But in digging into the
details over a two-hour visit, they often had significant childhood adverse
experiences that had not been fully processed. Many times, they also
reported feeling trapped in their job, being overburdened by caregiving
responsibilities without adequate support, experiencing strained family
relationships with parents, spouses, extended family, or children, social and
financial anxiety, loneliness, a history of intimate partner violence, and
many other traumas or negative situations in their lives that they didn’t
necessarily label as “stress” or “trauma” but that were still very real and
present.
Training Our Brain to Heal

No matter what has transpired in our lives or what is going on in the world
around us, we have to find a way to feel safe in order to be as healthy as
possible. “Being safe” is somewhat of an illusion: I, you, and everyone we

love are going to die. But feeling safe is something we can cultivate inside
our minds and bodies through intentional practice. This is lifelong work,
and there will not be a single path for everyone. A first step is awareness of
the impact of chronic threat triggers and life traumas on our health. We then
have to improve the “hardware” (the physical structure and function of the
body) and the software (the psychology and frameworks). To improve the
hardware, it involves all the Good Energy habits: food and lifestyle
strategies that create a biological reality in the body most conducive to
mental health. To improve the software, it involves pursuing modalities that
help manage and heal the stressors, traumas, and thought patterns that limit
us and contribute to our poor metabolic health and thriving.
Eating healthily, sleeping well, and working out might seem like trivial
matters if you are facing existential dread or depression, but I promise you
this: if you get your heart rate up for at least 150 minutes a week and follow
the food principles in Chapter 5, you will notice an improvement and your
brain will be more equipped to navigate the stresses of life. If you sleep an
adequate amount, your world will automatically look far more aweinspiring. Focus on the inputs—the habits—and the results will begin to
happen. Especially in a place of stress or fear, it can be very hard to get
motivated to do any of this work. A good first step is to find anything
healthy from this book that feels inspiring and give it a shot, because small
wins beget more wins.
We are animals in cages right now, surrounded by encroaching threats
that are entering our homes and daily lives through technology, chemicals,
and more. Since our brains use a disproportionate 20 percent of the energy
in the body despite being just 2 percent of total weight of the body,
dysfunction at the cellular level hits the brain extra hard. Focus on Good
Energy habits, and slowly but surely, Good Energy will take over your life.
The Work

Healing trauma, developing unconditional self-love, feeling limitless, and
making peace with death are tall orders. The following fifteen strategies are

research-supported modalities that can help:
1. Form a Relationship with a Mental Health Therapist, Coach, or
Counselor
We have doctors for our physical health, mechanics for our cars, trainers for
our workouts, accountants for our taxes, lawyers for our contracts, and
financial advisers for our investments, and yet we still find it niche or
stigmatizing to get professional help for the most important aspects of our
lives: our minds. I implore you to ignore any cultural messaging and stigma
around “mental health” and instead view therapy, counseling, or coaching
as one of the highest leverage investments you can make to maximize your
life. If you shy away from the concept of “mental health,” think of it as a
“brain coach” or “brain optimizer.” One hour per week of introspection and
unpacking feelings with a professional could make the difference between
being imprisoned by repetitive maladaptive thought patterns and being
psychologically free. Finding a great therapist can take time; don’t get
discouraged if you don’t click with the first one.
Online services like BetterHelp.com simplify getting paired with a
therapist. Or ask people in your community, whom you find resilient and
happy, if they have a therapist they’ve worked with and liked.
2. Track Your Heart Rate Variability (HRV) and Work to Improve It
Use wearables like Whoop, Apple Watch, Fitbit, Oura, HeartMath, or Lief
to monitor HRV and identify triggers that lower HRV. With Lief, you can
see your HRV in real time and can note which experiences cause HRV to
drop (indicating more stress) and which interventions—like taking a deep
breath—help when HRV is low.
3. Practice Breathwork
Breathwork is a powerful way to stimulate the vagus nerve and activate the
parasympathetic nervous system (PSNS), which is the “rest and digest” arm
of the nervous system. Activating the PSNS can help calm you down

rapidly. You can also try simple breathwork techniques—like box breathing,
which is a relaxation technique involving taking slow, deep breaths in a
pattern of inhaling, holding, exhaling, and holding again for a count of four
seconds for each phase. You can find many guided videos on YouTube, as
well as on apps like Open and Othership.
4. Practice Mindfulness Meditation
Consistent mindfulness meditation for eight weeks, with daily sessions as
short as twenty minutes, has been shown to significantly decrease several
metabolic biomarkers, including uric acid, triglycerides, ApoB, and blood
sugar, while also improving mood, anxiety, and depression. These changes
are likely a result of meditation’s impact on lowering stress hormones and
the positive metabolic effects that result. Both NF-ϰB gene expression and
hsCRP are reduced in people who practice mindfulness meditation
compared to the general public. Expert meditators can lower the expression
of pro-inflammatory genes and change epigenetic pathways in a single
extended meditation session. Through the activity of our minds, we can
literally change our genetic expression, blood glucose levels, and immune
system activation.
Mindfulness meditation can seem extremely intimidating and hard, but it
needn’t be. Meditation can be as simple as sitting quietly and just mentally
noting whenever a thought pops into your head. As each thought emerges,
notice it, note thought in your head, let it go, and reset. In doing that, you
flex the muscle of returning to the “present moment.” In a ten-minute
session, you might have one hundred thoughts pop into your head. Having
so many thoughts pop up might seem like a failure, but noticing them is
actually the work. The alternative is that you don’t notice as they pop into
your head, and you let them take you on a ride on the “train of thought”
without your ever noticing. By simply noting the thought, you get off the
“train of thought” and back to the present moment. In doing this, you
solidify the understanding that your identity is separate from the rush of
stressful thoughts running through your brain. Most of us spend the entirety
of our life jumping from thought to thought, never getting off the “train,”

thinking that this is “reality” or “you.” It’s not: you can simply step off and
reset into the present moment, and this is like waking up from a dream and
stepping into a blissful spiritual space.
The voices in our head—the fear, anxiety, anger, sadness—are not us.
Many get frustrated with meditation because they “aren’t good at it” and
“get distracted.” The point of meditation is distraction. Meditation shows us
that no matter how hard we try, our head will produce thoughts and that we
can choose to let those thoughts pass or change them. We then can take this
insight to our daily life, letting us disassociate from the weight of the outof-control inner voice, so we can more clearly tune into our limitless
spiritual nature, while also being more present to fully experience playing
with our kids, taking a walk, or having a conversation with a loved one.
Another way to practice mindfulness at any moment is to close your
eyes and scan every sensation in your body: your heartbeat, your butt on the
chair, any areas of warmth or cold, your toes on the ground, the air moving
into your nose and lungs. Because this body scan forces you into the present
moment, it takes you away from mental states of anxiety or stress.
My favorite meditation apps are Calm and Waking Up, and there are
many guided meditations on YouTube. Even a ten-minute meditation can
transform a day.
Devices like Muse can help you train your meditation practice and help
you know when you are reaching a more relaxed brain state with
biofeedback.
5. Try Movement-Based Mindfulness Practices, Like Yoga, Tai Chi, or
Qigong
Research has shown that mind-body interventions that deal with both
physical and mental well-being, like yoga and qigong, can improve
depression, anxiety, and stress. They also increase activity of the PSNS,
lower cortisol, reduce inflammation, and change genetic folding and
expression (epigenetics), all of which can positively impact metabolic
issues.

6. Spend Time in Nature
Some doctors are now prescribing “nature pills”—prescriptions to spend
time in nature—because evidence shows that it lowers stress hormones
significantly, and it increases the PSNS and mood. Even going to a city park
has measurable impacts on health and stress markers.
In closely observing nature, we get the opportunity to meditate on the
profound harmony, interconnectedness, and cycles that thread through the
natural world. We see many polarities and cycles that surround us to create
life, health, and beauty: polarities like sleeping and waking, night and day,
cold and hot, parasympathetic and sympathetic nervous system, high and
low tide, alkaline and acidic. Cycles like spring to summer to fall to winter,
new moon to first quarter moon to full moon to last quarter moon, and
menstruation to follicular phase to ovulation to luteal phase. These rhythms
surround us in nature, and they are our best teachers in achieving
fearlessness, because they show us that the world is fundamentally
harmonious even when things swing between different states. But in the
modern world, living inside and so separate from nature, we have begun to
ignore, fight, or suppress polarities and cycles, under the illusion that they
are suboptimal and we can outsmart them. Through industrial agriculture,
we’ve asked the soil to give us endless summer. Through widespread use of
oral hormones for everything from acne to PCOS to contraception, we’ve
trivialized the stunning—and life-creating—rhythmicity of women’s bodies,
as well as the cycle’s potent utility as a biofeedback tool of a woman’s
overall health. Through around-the-clock artificial light, we’ve created the
illusion that we don’t need night. Through thermostats, we’ve pushed a
thermoneutral existence where we’re never too hot or cold. The results
haven’t been good. We have forgotten that we get the best out of natural
systems not through dominance, oppression, and overworking, but through
respect, care, and gentle support.
In our busy, distracted, industrial lives, we’ve become separate from
nature, and therefore we’ve become fearful and controlling of its natural
rhythms and realities, getting stressed by a sense of scarcity when we aren’t
in the phase or pole of our liking. The “yin” periods of cycles and polarities

appear unproductive and wasteful, so we squash and rush them, thinking
we’re brilliant for creating a world of constant “yang.” How foolish we are.
Attention toward and awe for nature is the best teacher in gaining comfort
with death and anxiety based on a sense of scarcity. When you look up and
really spend time with nature and learn from it with humility and awe, you
realize that you have nothing to fear. Don’t allow yourself to be separated
from your source: soil, sun, water, trees, the stars, and the moon. Get
outside often to feel more peace.
7. Read Inspirational and Thought-Provoking Books and Texts About
Mindset, Trauma, and the Human Condition
I keep these authors’ works all throughout my house as a constant reminder
of the “bigger picture.” Audiobooks and podcasts work great for this as
well.
I highly recommend the following books about mindset, mental health,
and reshaping our relationship with stress and trauma: Mindset, A Return to
Love, Untethered Soul, How to Do the Work, Brain Energy, Hacking of the
American Mind, Brain Wash, How to Change Your Mind, Waking Up, The
Four Agreements, You Are More Than You Think You Are, The Book of
Boundaries, Getting the Love You Want, 4,000 Weeks, and Attached. Many
of these books are great on audio, and I find that listening to ten minutes of
books, podcasts, or texts that address mindset and mental fortitude while
I’m getting ready for the day puts me in a positive headspace.
Authors and poets who address the human condition, mortality, eternity,
and continuity with nature that I recommend are Mary Oliver, Pema
Chödrön, Paramahansa Yogananda, Michael Pollan, Clarissa Pinkola Estés,
Seneca, Marcus Aurelius, Robin Wall Kimmerer, Rumi, Lao-tzu, Khalil
Gibran, Hafiz, Walt Whitman, W. S. Merwin, Thích Nhất Hạnh, Diane
Ackerman, Alan Watts, Lewis Thomas, Ram Das, Rainer Maria Rilke,
Deepak Chopra, and Wang Wei.

8. Try Aromatherapy
Clinical research supports that natural scents can be powerful triggers of
relaxation. Lavender oil is well studied and especially potent in minimizing
stress and helping with sleep, as outlined in the peer-reviewed paper
“Lavender and the Nervous System.” Rub a few drops of lavender essential
oil between your hands, cup your face, and inhale deeply a few times.
9. Write
If you’re feeling down or stressed and can’t get “unstuck,” set a timer and
write about any problems for five minutes. Writing is also an incredible way
to channel creativity and to connect with “the bigger picture.” Many studies
have shown that writing is a way to lower distress and improve clinical
benefit in patients with anxiety or inflammatory diseases. “Positive affect”
journaling for twelve weeks, which may include focusing on writing about
positive emotions like gratitude or reflection on how someone else has
helped you, has been shown to reduce mental distress in patients with
medical issues and anxiety, while improving resilience and social
integration.
Books I recommend for starting a regular writing practice include The
Artist’s Way by Julia Cameron, The War of Art by Steven Pressfield, Big
Magic by Elizabeth Gilbert, and The Creative Act by Rick Rubin.
10. Intentionally Focus on Awe and Gratitude
Focus on awe, abundance, and gratitude every day. My best days start with
a blank sheet of paper where I list all the things I’m grateful for, helping
engender a profound sense of abundance that calms me and helps me act
from a place of security rather than fear.
Take walks where you intentionally focus on finding the awe in things
around you: a cloud rapidly moving across the sky, a fruit tree in a
neighbor’s yard, a weed sprouting out from a crack in the concrete, the
moon beaming down at you, snow falling from above, a bird sitting on your
fence. Let yourself be humbled by taking in things that are much bigger

than you and totally out of our control, like mountains, sunsets, rivers,
oceans, and forests.
Until recent history, humans were less distracted by constant assaults on
our attention that trigger our dopamine and keep us coming back for more.
We had space to be humbled by the grandeur of nature and life cycles, with
animals, harvests, the sun, the moon, birth, and death being experienced as
cosmic powerful forces. We’ve been robbed of this connection to our bodies
and nature and need to make conscious efforts to train our brains back to
being able to see and appreciate the majesty of all of it. Miracles are hiding
in plain sight everywhere, obscured by the “distraction industrial complex”
in the zero-sum game of attention. It is an act of rebellion and independence
to refocus your attention on awe.
Rick Rubin shares in The Creative Act, “Zoom in and obsess. Zoom out
and observe. We get to choose.” I spent a lot of mental energy concerned
about gun violence because I see it plastered on every screen around me,
and sometimes I let it control a lot of my mind space and behavior,
obscuring my ability to “see” the awe-inspiring beauty around me. We
should never ignore societal problems or avoid working to improve them.
But by allowing ourselves to create space for our attention to dwell on awe,
we can generate physical and mental health that lets us show up most
potently and limitlessly to help bring more energy and commitment to
positively impacting the world and overcoming devastating societal trends.
11. Practice Active Self-Love
Be mindful of negative self-talk and find ways to become your biggest
supporter and the greatest love of your life. Sometimes the biggest form of
threat in our lives—and that our cells “hear”—is our own voice berating
ourselves for our perceived shortcomings. Often we might just be
mimicking damaging voices that berated us in our past or from culture that
we internalized. Actively change the narrative. You have the power to talk
to yourself with kindness and support, telling yourself messages like: “I
love you so much. You are resilient and have gotten through so much in life.
I’m proud of you for taking the time to read a book about health.” Speak to

yourself (and your cells) as you would speak to a newborn in your arms, a
life that need not do anything to deserve unconditional love and care. If this
is a struggle, loving-kindness meditations and professional therapy can
help.
12. Be Less Busy
Embrace “JOMO,” the Joy of Missing Out. Get comfortable with periods of
unstructured time, alone, without constant distractions. Find pleasure in
saying no when you aren’t completely excited about a particular activity or
event. A good metric of when to skip something is when it’s not a “whole
body YES,” a term coined by leadership coach Diana Chapman, author of
15 Commitments of Conscious Leadership. When missing out feels
uncomfortable, remind yourself of the abundance of opportunities in life,
such that “missing out” is really a scarcity-based illusion. Every no to
something you feel lukewarm about is a yes to time that can be spent doing
something more meaningful.
13. Cultivate Community
Loneliness, which one-third of U.S. adults feel frequently, can directly
contribute to poor metabolic health, according to a 2023 article published in
Frontiers in Psychology. Given that social connections are evolutionarily
valuable for survival, loneliness is thought to have “evolved as an alarm
signal, akin to hunger or thirst, to seek out social contact to promote
survival.” The link between loneliness and poor metabolic health is not
fully understood, but may be due to dysregulation of the balance of SNS
and PSNS and increased stress signaling, which can dampen the function of
the mitochondria. Positive social connection can counteract this possibly
through the release of oxytocin, a hormone and neurotransmitter that may
protect against stress and suppress the release of stress hormones.

14. Commit to a Digital Detox
Research suggests that excess smartphone use is associated with negative
“psychiatric, cognitive, emotional, medical, and brain changes.” Reducing
smartphone use by just one hour a day has been shown to decrease
depressive and anxiety symptoms and improve life satisfaction. Choose
activities that force you to be away from your phone, devices, social media,
and the news. Such activities might include paddleboarding, surfing,
swimming, rafting, wilderness backpacking, or rock climbing. Leave your
phone behind when you leave the house, like going to the grocery store, to a
concert, or on a long hike. Have a friend change your social media
passwords and not give you the passwords back until a specified time. Or
take the suggestion from Johann Hari’s book Stolen Focus and buy an
impenetrable kSafe that will keep your tech locked for whatever time you
specify.
15. Consider Psilocybin-Assisted Therapy
If you feel called, I also encourage you to explore intentional, guided
psilocybin therapy. Strong scientific evidence suggests that this psychedelic
therapy can be one of the most meaningful experiences of life for some
people, as they have been for me.
If the word psychedelics makes you cringe, I used to be in your position.
I spent my childhood and young adult life being extremely judgmental
about the use of any type of drug. But I became interested in plant medicine
and psychedelics after learning more about their extensive traditional use,
analyzing the groundbreaking research from University of California–San
Francisco and Johns Hopkins, and reading Waking Up by Sam Harris and
How to Change Your Mind by Michael Pollan. Our brains are profoundly
suffering in modern society right now, and I believe that anything that can
safely increase neuroplasticity and ground us in more gratitude, awe,
connection, and a sense of cosmic safety should be taken very seriously.
Recently, The Economist ranked twenty drugs on their danger to individuals
and society. At the top of the list were legal drugs: alcohol, opioids,
amphetamines (Adderall), and tobacco. At the bottom of the list—the three

safest drugs ranked—were MDMA, LSD, and magic mushrooms
(psilocybin). Up to 25 percent of American adults are now on
antidepressants, like SSRIs, or antianxiety meds, like benzodiazepines, that
numb us and don’t address the root-cause physiology (but produce recurring
revenue for the medical system). Psilocybin and other psychedelics have
been stigmatized. Today neuroscientists are almost universally calling
research on psychedelics the most promising of their careers. Many of these
natural compounds, like the psilocybin found in “magic mushrooms,” come
directly from the earth to induce profound, consciousness-expanding
experiences.
A 2016 Johns Hopkins study showed that “67% of the volunteers rated
the experience with psilocybin to be either the single most meaningful
experience of his or her life or among the top five most meaningful
experiences of his or her life . . . similar, for example, to the birth of a first
child or death of a parent.” I can’t think of a more societally important
research finding.
Recently, a UCSF study showed that a group with severe PTSD who
“received MDMA during therapy experienced a significantly greater
reduction in the severity of their symptoms compared with those who
received therapy.” Gül Dölen, a neuroscientist at Johns Hopkins, said,
“There is nothing like this in clinical trial results for a neuropsychiatric
disease.” Scott Ostrom, a participant in the UCSF study who faced crippling
PTSD from his time in Iraq, said the experience “stimulated my own
consciousness’s ability for self-healing . . . You understand why it’s OK to
experience unconditional love for yourself.”
Just a week before I would learn of my mom’s terminal diagnosis, I sat
on the ground in the desert as the sun was going down. I had been inspired
to try psilocybin mushrooms in what I can only describe as an internal voice
that whispered: it’s time to prepare. At the time, I didn’t know consciously
what I was preparing for, but as I basked in the moon’s bright rays, I
experienced the embodiment of being one with the moon, every star, every
atom in the grains of sand I was sitting on, and my mother in an inextricable
and unbreakable chain of universal connectedness for which the human

concept of “death” was no match. In that moment I was certain there was no
separation between any of it. I felt myself as part of an infinite and
unbroken series of cosmic nesting dolls of millions of mothers and babies
before me from the beginning of life. I felt how I had been assembled out of
the universe’s building blocks through my mother as the creative portal who
printed my ever-changing form from stardust deep inside her belly, and how
that form became the lightning rod to channel my spirit or spark my
consciousness, kicking off the duality of spirit/consciousness and body that
defines our human experience and can cause psychological pain if
unexamined.
In my experience, psilocybin can be a doorway to a different reality that
is free from the limiting beliefs of my ego, feelings, and personal history.
Because I was able to experience that limitlessness and peace—albeit
transiently—I now know what is possible and can work to access that state
through daily habits. I know that the mind is more powerful than we think
and can conjure huge, positive, creative visions if we simply allow it to, and
that this potential of thought shifts what’s possible in our day-to-day lives.

TRUST THE PROCESS
Just after my mom died, I traveled to New York City. Late one night, I
walked to the first-floor apartment on West Eleventh Street where she spent
ten formative years of her young adult life. It’s the apartment where I know
she read Buddhist texts, built her business, played piano late into the night,
and got ready to go out and dance at Studio 54. Sitting on the stoop, tears
gently streaming down my cheeks, I visualized her walking through the
door during her single years: six feet tall and fabulous—with me already
living inside of her as an egg that had been present in her body since she
was a fetus in my grandmother’s body seventy-two years prior. I looked out
on the street, the exact spot where she kissed my father on their first date in
1981, the man who would become the other part of the puzzle to unlock the
life-giving potential within her and bring my form and consciousness to
fruition.

From the corner of my eye, I noticed an old, tattered book lying on the
ground. It was called The Odd Woman (a vintage term for an older single
woman, like myself at the time), and it was written by Gail Godwin (my
mother’s name was also Gayle). I was compelled to walk over and pick it
up. I opened the book. The page read,
One day the whole universe will accept: that there isn’t any struggle
essentially, except what our self-created ego tells us is a struggle.
All the disharmonies, conflicts, conversations, love affairs and
failures and death are superficial events. None of them are
significant, really.
The only significant thing is how we enjoy the moment, our
attitude toward the moment. One should simply give himself up to
the moment, enjoy it, even if it is horrendous.
Are you saying that if a person is getting murdered at a certain
moment, he should enjoy that moment? Why not? Why not enjoy it?
It’s his last moment, the last personal, superficial event in his finite
life. Sure, why not enjoy it? What else better is there to do?
Perhaps my mom was speaking to me. Even in the most extreme case—
imminent death—we should have awe and appreciation for life and see the
illusion of our ego and the reality of total connectedness. This is exactly
what she did; as she faced her terminal cancer diagnosis—thirteen days of
life, the final sands rapidly falling through the hourglass—she exuded joy,
gratitude, and curiosity.
We have no control over so much. In the face of inevitable mortality,
chronic stress triggers in our environment, and traumatic childhood
experience with little cultural awareness of resilience or coping, an
unshakable sense of safety can be elusive. Of course, we should take
reasonable precautions for our own safety and our family’s safety—but
living in chronic stress or fear is neither optimal nor rational.
The road to maximal human well-being is not paved with more
pharmaceuticals and procedures for an increasing list of isolated conditions.

Improving our health requires understanding that we are inextricably
interconnected with everything else in the universe, including soil, plants,
animals, people, air, water, and sunlight. To thrive, we must get back to
having awe for our interdependent relationship with everything in the
natural world. We also must recognize that every part of our own bodies is
interconnected, not a fragmented set of isolated parts as the forty-two
specialties of medicine might have us believe. The more advanced our
understanding of life sciences gets, the more convinced I am that achieving
our highest potential as humans involves recommitting to many natural
basics that modern living has separated us from. This doesn’t require us to
reject modernity or re-create a bygone era; instead, we can use cutting-edge
tools, technology, and diagnostics to empower us to understand more
deeply our relationship to the world around us, and to help us align our
daily choices and investments toward the metabolic needs coded deep
within our cells. At this moment we have the understanding and the tools to
live the longest, happiest, healthiest lives in human history. The foundation
of this is helping our cells make Good Energy.
To view the scientific references cited in this chapter, please visit us online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

PA R T 3

THE GOOD ENERGY PLAN

Four Weeks to Good Energy

If simple habits (like eating whole foods, getting enough sleep, practicing
regular movement, and managing stress) are so transformational, why do so
few people consistently perform them? If these simple actions made people
so happy and healthy, why aren’t we all doing them?
I think this question hangs in our collective subconscious and fuels the
insidious beliefs in the medical system that “patients are lazy,” “lifestyle
interventions fail,” and “people want the easy way out.” Or that more
complex and “innovative” solutions must be the answer. These criticisms of
patients conveniently ignore the fact that trillions of dollars of incentives
are pushing us to eat ultra-processed food, be sedentary, sleep less, and live
in chronic fear.
The truth: practicing simple Good Energy habits is an act of rebellion.
This section outlines twenty-five of the most important ones, with a fourweek plan to help integrate them into your life. By engaging with these
simple habits, you can thrive and minimize your risk for so many of the
conditions related to suboptimal cellular energy production spanning
depression, obesity, high cholesterol, hypertension, infertility, and so many
more.
The goal of this plan isn’t to commit to all habits all at once; it is to
instill a mindset shift and embark on a path of curiosity that is sustainable.
In the pursuit of Good Energy, it can feel like you need to redesign your
entire life around protecting yourself from all the toxic elements of modern
culture while spending an inordinate amount of time engaged in healthy
habits. Ultimately, we want to minimize the choices that overwhelm the
body and bog down Good Energy processes (e.g., refined sugar, refined

grains, seed oils, environmental toxins) and maximize the choices that build
resilience and match the body’s needs to support optimal function (e.g.,
quality sleep, omega-3s, regular movement).
When resilience and supportive choices consistently outweigh the
stressors on the body, you’re going to feel good and thrive. Each day I aim
to cobble together as many Good Energy habits as I can to tune my engine,
build biological capacity and resilience, and tip the scales toward cellular
function and health. Simultaneously, I try to protect myself from excess
allostatic load, a term that refers to the cumulative burden on the body of
chronic stressors and life events. Each day, based on mood, circumstances,
and motivation, the combination of Good Energy habits may look a little
different, and that is OK—we are not robots, we are humans. The
foundation for success is knowing which habits are going to be helpful to
support metabolic health and trying to construct your days with as many as
possible, as consistently as possible. Some habits will become second
nature and feel effortless, while others may be a struggle every day to
implement.
In week one of the four-week plan, we’ll take a set of surveys to get a
baseline assessment of where you are excelling with Good Energy habits
and where you have the most room for improvement. We’ll define your
“why,” start a food journal system, establish a measurement framework, and
set up an accountability system. In week two, we’ll focus on food, including
adopting the first three Good Energy habits, which you will commit to for
the following three weeks: clearing out the “Unholy Trinity” of Bad Energy
foods (refined grains, refined sugars, and industrial seed oils). Additionally,
you will be introduced to all the other food habits, so you can prepare for
weeks three and four. In weeks three and four, you’ll pick three Good
Energy habits of your choosing, which you’ll commit to in addition to the
three baseline habits from week two.
Again, the goal of this month isn’t to be perfect or to commit to every
habit at once. It is to gain familiarity with the Good Energy habits and gain
confidence in bringing more of them into your life. And ideally, during this

month you’ll move yourself up the “hierarchy of competence” curve when
it comes to Good Energy actions (see the box below).

Hierarchy of Competence
The hierarchy of competence is a learning model popularized in the 1960s that
describes the process of becoming effortlessly competent in a skill or habit. It is a
helpful framework for understanding where you want to get to on your metabolic
health journey. It is split into the following four levels:
1. Level One: Unconscious incompetence (the worst)
2. Level Two: Conscious incompetence
3. Level Three: Conscious competence
4. Level Four: Unconscious competence (the best)
Unconscious incompetence means that you are not living the behavior and don’t
even understand why it’s important.
Conscious incompetence means you know what you need to do to be healthy
but still are not regularly engaging in the behavior.
Conscious competence means that you are enacting the habit regularly and
consistently but must make a conscious effort to make it happen and you still
experience some friction and struggle.
Unconscious competence means that you are enacting the habit regularly and
barely need to think about it. It’s second nature and just part of your life!
We all want to eventually get to level four for every Good Energy habit, where
doing each habit is just the way that we live, without it being a conscious effort.
Unfortunately, most of us have been living at a level one or two for most habits
because our culture (school, work, home life), food incentives, and health care
incentives are designed to keep us incompetent at being healthy and to normalize
destructive behaviors, environments, and habits. In level one, we’re making
consistent unhealthy habits but think they are fine and normal because we just
don’t know: we’re unconscious of our incompetence. An example might be sleeping
with a TV on in the background, not knowing that blue light may be severely
impacting our melatonin secretion, or eating foods with artificial colorings because
you aren’t aware that many of these are likely neurotoxic and promote oxidative
stress. As has been discussed throughout this book, several industries work hard to
make you incompetent in your health behaviors, as well as unconscious about it, by
normalizing unhealthy habits and choices, making them cheaper, and calling
people elitist for attempting to be healthy, among many other tactics that keep us
sick.
After reading this book, you will at least be at level two for all Good Energy
habits: consciously incompetent. You know what you need to do to make Good
Energy in your body and for radiant health, but you may not quite enact it every day

for every habit. By the end of week four of Good Energy living, you want to start
getting toward level three (conscious competence) for the three habits that you
choose, as well as the three core Good Energy habits (eliminating refined grains,
sugar, and seed oils). Over time and with consistent awareness and practice, you
will move to level four, where healthy living is simply the way you live your life.

I recommend going through the full list of twenty-five Good Energy
habits (see these pages) and rating your competence level for each. Some of
us might be level four for a few of them and level two for others. I am a
level two for mindful eating and heat therapy. (I know it would be good for
my cells if I did them, but I don’t regularly.) I waver between level two and
level three for sleep consistency and sleep quantity. (I am usually solid on
these habits, but they are a big challenge and I must think about them and
plan every day.) And I have just recently moved from level three to level
four with 10,000 steps a day and resistance training. (I achieve them
without much difficulty and have systems in my day to build them in, like
walking meetings, a treadmill desk, and resistance training classes on the
schedule that I’ve prepaid for). My strong level four habits are getting
enough fiber; not eating refined grains, sugars, and seed oils; and getting
into nature regularly. These things are now unconscious habits in my life; I
would struggle to not do them. Try choosing your three Good Energy habits
in weeks three and four from those habits for which you are currently level
two (consciously incompetent) and see if you can work up to level three
(consciously competent) during the two weeks.

WEEK ONE—ESTABLISH BASELINE METRICS AND CREATE
ACCOUNTABILITY
The first step in the Good Energy journey is determining your why. If you
cannot articulate specific aspirations for the person you aspire to be in your
one precious life, you will find that making consistent healthful choices is
much harder. But if you know you are building toward an identity that is
very clear, motivation will come much easier.

Being thinner isn’t an identity or a value, and I can guarantee you that
this goal isn’t enough to get you to a truly healthier place. Living longer
isn’t even an identity or a value. These principles motivated me in the past,
and from my experience, they are not as sustainable as values that touch on
deeper themes of purpose.
Values reflect your personal, unique judgment on what is important in
life and why you want to be alive. Your choices and behaviors are how you
show the world—and more importantly, yourself—what those values are.
Behaviors and choices dictate whether your body will be functional and
well powered. Misalignment between choices and values is the foundation
of a more difficult life.
In my case, I choose to make Good Energy choices because I am
building toward the identity of a person who:
Values the precious gift of life, my body, and my consciousness
Wants to have the energy and biologic capacity to be a positive force
for my family, close friends, and the world
Lives and thinks for myself and does not want my body to be
controlled by industry forces that make money by keeping me and the
global population sick and dependent
Makes choices that respect the biodiversity and integrity of the soil, the
earth, air, and animals
What are your reasons? What identity does having your cells make
Good Energy bring to your life? What values do you want to live by?
Take fifteen minutes now to make a list of why you want your cells to
function better and be powered well.
Next, take stock of what levers you need to pull to give your cells the
best chance of making cellular energy properly. What are the factors in your
life that are particularly hurting—or helping—your cells? For you versus
for me, it may look very different. I might need to dial in sleep and more
frequent movement throughout the day, while you may need to get rid of

the environmental toxins in your house and move away from ultraprocessed foods. The set of quizzes below will help you identify where you
are on the Good Energy spectrum and zero in on which areas of your life
may have the most room for optimization with Good Energy habits.
Metrics: Are You in the 6.8 Percent?

Note: These numbers should all be available for free at your annual
physical:
1. ___ Fasting glucose is less than 100 mg/dL
2. ___ Triglycerides are less than 150 mg/dL
3. ___ HDL is above 40 mg/dL (men) or 50 mg/dL (women)
4. ___ Waist circumference is less than or equal to 102 cm (40 inches) for
men and less than or equal to 88 cm (35 inches) for women
5. ___ Blood pressure is less than 120/80 mmHg
Total: ____/5
If you do not score 100 percent on this section, you are part of the 93.2
percent of Americans who have work to do to optimize energy production
in the cells.
OPTIONAL: I also recommend requesting the following tests be
performed and comparing your results to the guidelines in Chapter 4:
Fasting insulin and calculation of HOMA-IR
High-sensitivity CRP (hsCRP)
Hemoglobin A1c
Uric acid
Liver enzymes: aspartate transaminase (AST), alanine transaminase
(ALT), and gamma-glutamyl transferase (GGT)
Vitamin D

If your doctor won’t order tests for you, or you’d prefer to pursue this
testing in a simpler way, I recommend signing up for Function Health’s
comprehensive lab panel for approximately $500.
If your doctor says you don’t need any of these tests, you can use the
following note to request them:
I am requesting the following tests be ordered for me so I can
better understand my overall metabolic health. I am committed to
knowing where I stand with key metabolic biomarkers and tracking
them over time so I can work to keep them in a healthy range. I know
that many markers can indicate subtle dysfunction long before they
reach the clinical diagnostic thresholds, and I want to know earlier
rather than later if these changes are occurring. I appreciate your
support in helping me understand my health better, and I welcome
the opportunity to work with you to optimize my results. Thank you.
The Good Energy Baseline Quiz

The following quiz can help you zero in on where you may benefit from
focusing your energy to move toward Good Energy. The goal is to spark
awareness about where there are opportunities to best support your
mitochondrial and cellular health.
FOOD

1. ___ I currently use a food journal or food tracker consistently to
monitor what foods and beverages I’m consuming.
2. ___ If given a list of foods, I can accurately identify the difference
between an unprocessed/minimally processed food and an ultraprocessed food.
3. ___ I read the food label very carefully on every packaged product I
purchase.
4. ___ I am confident that I eat fewer than 10 grams of added refined
sugar per day. (This does not include fruit sugars or other naturally

occurring sugars in their whole food unprocessed form.)
5. ___ I am certain that I have consumed no high-fructose corn syrup in
the last month.
6. ___ I eat at restaurants, eat fast food, or get takeout for fewer than three
meals per week.
7. ___ I am certain that I eat at least 30 grams of fiber per day.
8. ___ I am certain that I eat at least thirty different plant foods per week
(between fruits, vegetables, spices, herbs, nuts, seeds, and legumes).
9. ___ I prepare the majority of my meals at home.
10. ___ I eat at least one unsweetened probiotic food every day (such as
unsweetened yogurt, kimchi, sauerkraut, natto, tempeh, or miso).
11. ___ I eat at least one serving of cruciferous vegetables every day (such
as broccoli, brussels sprouts, cauliflower, bok choy, kale, arugula,
cabbage, radishes, rutabaga, or kohlrabi).
12. ___ I eat at least 3 cups of dark leafy greens every day (like spinach,
mixed greens, or kale).
13. ___ If I eat outside of the house, I ask about what oils are used and
avoid foods with refined seed oils.
14. ___ I do not eat foods made with white flour (like flour tortillas, white
bread, hamburger or hot dog buns, pastries, doughnuts, cookies, and
most crackers).
15. ___ I do not drink sodas of any kind (sweetened or diet).
16. ___ I do not have a big “sweet tooth” and don’t tend to crave sugar
excessively.
17. ___ When they’re offered to me, it is easy for me to say no to foods
with ultra-processed grains like bread, crackers, cookies, cakes,
pastries, and doughnuts. I do not crave these foods.
18. ___ When offered to me, it is easy for me to decline eating desserts
with added sugars, like cakes, cookies, and ice cream.
19. ___ It is easy for me to avoid and decline refined liquid sugars like
soda, sweet tea, lemonade, fruit juices, Frappuccinos, sweetened coffee
beverages, slushies, and chocolate milk. I rarely, if ever, drink these.
20. ___ I drink coffee or tea without any natural or artificial sweeteners.

21. ___ I do not eat artificial sweeteners like aspartame, Equal, or
sucralose.
22. ___ I can go more than four hours without eating during the day and
feel fine, without excess hunger or cravings.
23. ___ I avoid conventional/nonorganic foods and buy mostly organic
food or food directly from farmers’ markets.
FOR OMNIVORES:

1. ___ I avoid farm-raised fish and eat mostly wild-caught fish.
2. ___ I avoid conventional meats and mostly eat organic pasture-raised
grass-fed meats.
3. ___ I avoid conventional eggs and mostly eat organic pasture-raised
eggs.
4. ___ I buy organic milk and cheese originating from pasture-raised
grass-fed cows.
Total: ____/23
or ____/27 for omnivores
If you scored less than 18/23 (or 21/27 for omnivores), you still have
significant room for improvement in your diet to enable Good Energy. This
is an area you should focus on as you choose which areas to prioritize.
CIRCADIAN RHYTHM
SLEEP

1. ___ I consistently use a sleep-tracking device.
2. ___ I sleep between seven and eight hours every night.
3. ___ I have a consistent bedtime and usually am asleep within a onehour window every night.
4. ___ I have a consistent wake time and wake within a one-hour window
every morning.
5. ___ I can fall asleep easily nearly every night.
6. ___ I can stay asleep throughout the night and fall back to sleep easily.
7. ___ I do not have insomnia.

8. ___ I feel rested and energetic during the day and rarely feel sluggish or
like I need a nap midday.
9. ___ I do not snore.
10. ___ I have not been diagnosed with sleep apnea.
11. ___ I have not taken any prescription sleep medication in the last year.
12. ___ I have not taken antihistamine-based sleep medication in the last
year (e.g., Unisom, Excedrin PM, Tylenol PM, Benadryl).
13. ___ My phone and other devices never interrupt my sleep with sounds,
lights, or vibration.
Total: ____/13
If you scored less than 10/13, you still have significant room for
improvement in your sleep behaviors to enable Good Energy. This is an
area you should focus on as you choose which areas to prioritize.
MEAL TIMING AND HABITS

1. ___ I can fast for fourteen hours without difficulty.
2. ___ I eat at consistent meal times each day (e.g., having dinner between
5:00 and 7:00 p.m. most days).
3. ___ I am intentional about when I eat and do not tend to mindlessly
snack and graze throughout the day.
4. ___ I pause before eating to be mindful of my food.
5. ___ I express gratitude for my food before I eat.
6. ___ I eat slowly and methodically, trying to chew every bite fully
before swallowing.
7. ___ I make a point to sit down while I’m eating.
8. ___ I do not use my phone while eating.
9. ___ I do not watch TV or use my computer while eating.
10. ___ I eat most of my meals with other people, like friends, family, or
colleagues.
11. ___ I am cognizant of not eating just before bedtime, and I try to stop
eating three hours before I go to sleep.
Total: ____/11

If you scored less than 8/11, you may still have significant room for
improvement in your meal-timing behaviors to enable Good Energy.
LIGHT

1. ___ I spend at least fifteen minutes outside within one hour of waking
every day.
2. ___ I go outside during daylight hours at least three times for more than
five minutes each.
3. ___ I watch the sunset outdoors at least three days per week.
4. ___ I spend at least three cumulative hours outside per day (add up
walks, gardening, eating outdoors, playing outdoors with children,
etc.).
5. ___ I consistently use red lights in my home at night or blue-lightblocking glasses after the sun goes down.
6. ___ I consistently use dimmers on my lights at home and turn them
down in the evening.
7. ___ I do not view any screens in the evening without using blue-lightblocking glasses.
8. ___ My phone, tablet, and computer turn to “night mode” or “dark
mode” after dark.
9. ___ My bedroom is completely dark, and I use blackout shades.
10. ___ My bedroom is absent of TVs, computers, LED clocks, or other lit
screens.
Total: ____/10
If you scored less than 8/10, it means that you still have significant room
for improvement in your light-related behaviors to enable Good Energy.
STRESSING THE BODY
MOVEMENT

1. ___ I use a wearable step tracker every day.
2. ___ I am certain I get at least 7,000 steps each day based on wearable
data.

3. ___ I consistently use a wearable tracker to track my resting heart rate.
4. ___ Based on my wearable data, I know that my resting heart rate has
been less than 60 bpm on average over the last month.
5. ___ I know that I get 150 minutes of moderate aerobic activity per
week (the equivalent of brisk or more strenuous walking).
6. ___ I lift weights at least twice per week for at least thirty minutes.
7. ___ I do not sit for more than one hour at a time without standing up
and intentionally moving my body for at least two minutes.
8. ___ I find ways to play sports or physical games at least once per week
(e.g., pickleball, table tennis, volleyball, soccer, Spikeball, basketball,
Frisbee, or dodgeball).
Total: ____/8
If you scored less than 6/8, it means that you still have significant room
for improvement in your movement-related behaviors to enable Good
Energy.
TEMPERATURE

1. ___ I expose myself to hot temperatures intentionally at least once per
week (e.g., sauna or hot yoga).
2. ___ I expose myself to cold temperatures intentionally at least three
times per week for more than one minute (e.g., cold plunge,
cryotherapy, or cold shower).
3. ___ I seek out ways to get very cold or very hot for its health benefits.
Total: ____/3
If you scored less than 2/3, it means that there is still room for
improvement in your movement-related behaviors to enable Good Energy.
MIND-BODY
STRESS, RELATIONSHIPS, AND EMOTIONAL HEALTH

1. ___ I use a wearable tracker that indicates my heart rate variability.

2. ___ Based on my wearable data, I know some of the factors that
negatively impact my HRV, like alcohol or work stress.
3. ___ I practice mindfulness habits, like intentional deep breathing,
journaling, meditation, or prayer, every day.
4. ___ I have worked with a practitioner (like a therapist or coach) or
program to address suboptimal behavioral and thought patterns and
have successfully improved these.
5. ___ I have worked with a practitioner (like a therapist or coach) or
program to address past traumas in my life from childhood and
adulthood that may be overtly or subtly impacting my life and have
significantly improved my relationship to these experiences.
6. ___ I feel confident in my ability to use my body to calm my mind
(e.g., walking, breathwork, or tapping, a method of stimulating
acupressure points with the fingertips to manage emotions).
7. ___ I feel confident in my ability to use my mind to calm my body
(e.g., mantras, body scans, or visualizations).
8. ___ I have at least one trusted person in my life with whom I can talk
openly and honestly about most topics.
9. ___ I am comfortable honestly and openly expressing my feelings to
the important people in my life.
10. ___ I have a set of clear strategies I can use when I get stressed or
activated to calm myself down.
11. ___ I have a sense of purpose bigger than myself.
12. ___ I “ground” regularly by sitting or standing barefoot directly on the
ground.
13. ___ I consistently feel awe for my life and the world around me.
14. ___ I am aware of my self-talk and intentionally communicate lovingly
to myself and catch myself when I am not.
15. ___ I intentionally focus on gratitude each day.
16. ___ I feel hopeful and excited about the future.
17. ___ I feel that I am authentically expressing myself most of the time
and do not need to suppress my personality or true self.

18. ___ I have outlets that let me bring my creative visions to life (e.g., art,
music, writing, crafts, cooking, decorating, or planning activities or
trips) and engage with them regularly.
19. ___ I feel that anything is possible and believe that I can cultivate the
life that I want.
20. ___ I feel limitless.
21. ___ I feel a sense of connection to everything in the universe.
Total: ____/21
If you scored less than 16/21, it means that you still have room for
improvement in your movement related to stress, relationships, and
emotional health to enable Good Energy.
TOXINS
INGESTED TOXINS

1. ___ I filter my tap water with a reverse osmosis filter or a high-efficacy
charcoal filter (e.g., Berkey) and rarely ever drink unfiltered water.
2. ___ I have checked my water quality against the Environmental
Working Group (EWG) database and understand whether specific
contaminants are above recommended levels.
3. ___ I drink at least half an ounce of water per pound of body weight
per day.
4. ___ When I leave the house, I bring filtered water in a non-plastic (e.g.,
glass or metal) bottle.
5. ___ I avoid drinking water out of single-use plastic bottles.
6. ___ I avoid foods that have natural flavors or artificial flavors.
7. ___ I do not eat foods with any artificial dyes in them.
8. ___ I rarely store my food in plastic containers or buy food in plastic
containers, and instead opt for metal or glass storage.
9. ___ I do not drink more than one alcoholic beverage per day. (Note: A
standard serving of alcohol in the United States is defined as 14 grams
of alcohol, which is less than you might think. This is 5 ounces of wine,
12 ounces of beer, or a single 1.5-ounce shot of distilled spirits.)

10. ___ I do not drink more than seven alcoholic beverages per week.
11. ___ I do not smoke cigarettes or other tobacco products.
12. ___ I do not use chewing tobacco or similar forms of chewable
nicotine.
13. ___ I do not smoke cigars.
14. ___ I do not vape.
15. ___ I avoid over-the-counter medications, like acetaminophen,
ibuprofen, diphenhydramine, and/or acid-suppressing medications; I
take them cumulatively fewer than five times per year.
16. ___ I have not taken oral antibiotics in the past two years.
17. ___ I do not take oral hormonal contraceptives.
18. ___ I do not eat high-mercury fish (tuna, lobster, bass, swordfish,
halibut, or marlin) more than once per week.
Total: ____/18
If you scored less than 14/18, you still have significant room for
improvement related to limiting toxin exposure to enable Good Energy.
ENVIRONMENTAL TOXINS

1. ___ I filter my shower water with a whole-house water filter or attached
shower head filter.
2. ___ I filter the air in my house with a HEPA filter.
3. ___ I do not use scented candles in my home.
4. ___ I do not use air fresheners, scent diffusers, plug-in scents, or
scented room sprays in my car, bathrooms, or other parts of my home.
5. ___ I read the labels of any home care or personal care products I buy
to ensure clean, nontoxic, non–artificially scented ingredients.
6. ___ My shampoo and conditioner are unscented (i.e., do not include
ingredients “parfum,” “natural fragrance,” or “fragrance”) or only
scented with essential oils.
7. ___ My laundry detergent is unscented and has no colorings or dyes.
8. ___ My dish soap is unscented and has no colorings.
9. ___ I do not use scented laundry sheets or fabric softener.

10. ___ My cleaning supplies (like all-purpose cleaner sprays or
concentrates) are unscented and have no colorings or dyes.
11. ___ I do not use perfume or cologne.
12. ___ My deodorant is unscented (or only scented with essential oils).
13. ___ My deodorant is aluminum-free.
14. ___ My lotion is unscented (or only scented with essential oils) and has
no colorings or dyes.
15. ___ My soap or body wash is unscented (or only scented with essential
oils).
16. ___ My toothpaste is fluoride-free and has no colorings or dyes.
17. ___ I check the toxicity ratings of my home care and personal care
products on websites like the EWG.
18. ___ The majority of my clothing, underwear, sheets, and other linens
are made from natural, organic materials like cotton or bamboo rather
than polyester or fabrics treated with synthetic dyes and chemicals.
Total: ____/18
If you scored less than 15/18, you still have room for improvement
related to reducing environmental toxin exposure to enable Good Energy.

—
Now that we’ve taken stock of the several categories in our lives that can
help us achieve Good Energy, we are going to prepare to take action.
Create a Food Journal and Start Logging on Day One

As we learned in Chapter 4, food journaling has been shown to significantly
enhance weight-loss efforts and adherence to healthy eating. Whether you
choose to do this with a smartphone application, in a digital note or
document, or in a paper journal, the key point is to have a record of what
went into your body so that you are certain of what your body is made of
and whether it has what it needs to make Good Energy.

You will want to write down every single bite you take, even if it’s a
nibble of bread, a single french fry, or a tiny square of chocolate. As you
work toward your best health, you want to be clear about your relationship
with food and where you have room for improvement.
Log the times of each intake, at least a rough estimate of the amount,
and the brands of any packaged foods eaten.
I recommend using one of the three following methods:
Use a dedicated paper journal to manually write your food logs and
take it with you everywhere.
Keep a running digital note on your smartphone or in a Google Doc.
Use an app like MacroFactor, MyFitnessPal, or Theia.
Using food logging apps like MacroFactor is simple because they utilize
a barcode scanner that will pull in ingredients, serving size, and nutritional
information. Most products (even a lot of fresh produce) have barcodes, and
you can simply scan and log. If you are cooking more complex meals from
whole foods, you may find that keeping a digital note or Google Doc, and
simply voice dictating what was in your meal, is easier.
ACTION:

Create a food journal and start logging all food and beverage intake on
day one and continue throughout the month.
Each Saturday, review your food journal for thirty minutes and assess
what’s going into your body. Identify if you have areas where you are
struggling with Good Energy eating, and assess what the barriers are to
making it happen.
Order Wearable Devices

Activity, Heart Rate, and Sleep Tracking
I cannot recommend highly enough getting an inexpensive wearable
activity tracker that measures sleep, steps, heart rate, and HRV. When you

put on a wearable tracker, you will see how different your perception is of
what you do each day and what actually happens. In Chapter 4, you read
data about how people, on average, estimate they are doing six times more
physical activity per week than they actually are. And recall from Chapter 8
that simply walking 10,000 steps per day is associated with 50 percent
lower dementia risk, 44 percent lower risk of getting type 2 diabetes, and
much lower risk of cancer and depression.
Wearables allow us to know for certain that we are hitting our marks on
key pillars like sleep and activity. Without that certainty, you can think
you’re living a Good Energy lifestyle when you’re not.
ACTION:

Order a Fitbit Inspire 2 (available from Amazon, Fitbit, Best Buy,
Target, and Walmart), Apple Watch, Oura Ring, or Garmin Tracker.
I have tried many wearable trackers, and the Fitbit Inspire 2 is my
favorite because it is simple, affordable, holds a long charge (usually over a
week), and has a screen that shows you in real time how many steps you’ve
taken and what your heart rate is. It costs $55 to $60 at most retailers. The
Fitbit app shows long-term and real-time trends for steps, heart rate, amount
of moderate and vigorous physical activity, sleep data, active hours, and
HRV, among many other metrics. Apple Watch has many similar features
but is much more expensive and needs to be charged every day. I have not
used a Garmin Tracker or Oura Ring, but they have similar features to the
Fitbit. The Whoop strap is an incredible product for tracking workouts,
recovery, sleep, and HRV but does not include step counting.

Optional: Glucose Monitoring
As discussed in previous chapters, tracking blood sugar can be extremely
helpful as you work toward Good Energy. You have two options: a standard
glucometer, for which you would prick your finger each morning as well as
forty-five minutes and then two hours after eating, and manually log your
findings in your food journal. A simpler method that is less painful and will

give you much more data is to use a continuous glucose monitor (CGM). A
CGM gives you much more granularity into the cause-and-effect
relationship between your actions and your blood sugar response. While
glucometers are available at any pharmacy, as well as at retailers like
Amazon, CGMs require a prescription in the United States (but not in most
other countries). Unless you have type 1 or type 2 diabetes, you will likely
have to pay out of pocket for a CGM, and your doctor may push back about
writing you a prescription. The cost will likely be between $75 to $150 per
month for CGM sensors. A more streamlined approach is to get a CGM
through Levels, which offers the physician consultation, CGM prescriptions
sent to your home, and software that interprets glucose data.
ACTION:

Purchase a glucometer (I recommend Keto-Mojo GK+, available on
Amazon, which measures glucose and ketones) or obtain a prescription
for a CGM (through your physician or Levels).
Set Up an Accountability System

Accountability and community support can significantly amplify health
efforts—a fact that is supported by abundant scientific research. The effect
is dramatic: a meta-analysis of all studies looking at adherence to weightloss interventions showed that two of the three main factors associated with
success were supervised attendance and social support. Simply having
others involved means you’re more likely to stick with habits.
One way to build accountability into your life is partnering with a friend
or colleague who is also on a health journey or who is willing to be a
witness and supporter of your journey and commit to checking in with you
regularly about your progress.
In the one month after setting up a relationship with an accountability
partner:
I went from an average of 49,601 steps per week to 80,966.

I went from an average of 6 hours 42 minutes of sleep per night to 7
hours 35 minutes.
My resting heart rate went from 63 to 52 bpm.
A second helpful way to ensure accountability is to prepay for wellness
experiences so that there is a real cost to not doing it. If I am traveling to a
city for work, I’ll often schedule several workout classes at local studios in
that city. Since I must pay for these classes in advance, it almost guarantees
that I am going to go. I also prepay for a package of therapy or coaching
sessions every few months so that all I must do is schedule them. And when
I travel, I like to stay in an Airbnb rather than a hotel, so I have a
refrigerator. I always pick up groceries or have them delivered on day one
(which is invariably cheaper than eating all of my meals at restaurants).
A third key to accountability is planning as many activities as possible
around Good Energy habits, like social, work, and family events and meals.
When I’m heading to a city where I know I’ll be catching up with several
people, I plan morning coffee walks with friends or organize a hike. During
a family holiday, offer to cook a few of the meals and prepare a Good
Energy–aligned feast for everyone. When staying with friends, have a box
of healthy food (I like Daily Harvest) or groceries delivered as a generous
contribution, but also to ensure that you have the food you need to be
healthy. When I have visitors, I plan almost every event to check off “Good
Energy” boxes, like taking a neighborhood walk or local hike, walking
through a park or botanical garden, taking friends to try cold plunging in the
ocean or a local body of water, doing breathwork together, going to a
concert where we’ll be standing, streaming an online workout class on the
TV and doing it together, mountain biking, paddleboarding, snow-shoeing,
or going to a meditative sound bath together. If you’re invited to a party,
commit to bringing a few healthy food and beverage items to ensure you’ll
have unprocessed, Good Energy food to eat.
ACTION:

Choose an accountability partner whom you trust and who is willing to
support you with daily text messages, emails, or check-ins. Ask them to

commit to this role for at least four weeks.
Schedule a thirty-minute accountability meeting once a week to go over
food journals and habit tracking.
Prepay for wellness activities.
Organize social and work activities around Good Energy habits.

WEEK TWO—FOCUS ON FOOD

While all metabolic habits are important, getting food right is the base of
the pyramid. In week two, you’ll adopt the first three Good Energy habits
and audit the labels of your food to remove the Unholy Trinity of
ingredients: added sugar, refined grains, and seed oils. Everyone on the
Good Energy four-week program should eliminate these three ingredients in
weeks two, three, and four. Additionally, you’ll learn about habits four
through seven, which are all focused on what to bring into the diet, and
which you can choose to implement in weeks three and four as part of your
additional Good Energy habits.

Good Energy Habits
Nutrition
1. Eliminate refined added sugars

Eliminate all foods, drinks, and condiments with refined or liquid sugars.
Added sugars may include the following names: white sugar, brown sugar,
powdered sugar, cane sugar, evaporated cane juice, raw sugar, turbinado sugar,
demerara sugar, coconut sugar, maple syrup, honey, molasses, agave nectar, corn
syrup, high-fructose corn syrup, glucose, dextrose, fructose, maltose, sucrose,
galactose, maltodextrin, lactose, caramel, barley malt, rice syrup, date sugar, beet
sugar, invert sugar, and golden syrup.
Read all labels for any “added sugars,” and do not buy any products with them.
Remove anything with added sugar from your home and throw them away.
Track this through your food journal.
2. Eliminate refined grains

Eliminate all foods with ultra-processed refined flour or grain.
These include all standard breads (white, wheat, and whole wheat), rice (white
and brown), pasta, bagels, tortillas, crackers, cereals, pretzels, doughnuts,
cookies, cakes, pastries, pizza crusts, waffles, pancakes, croissants, English
muffins, hamburger buns, hot dog buns, and muffins.

Ingredients on packaged food might include: wheat flour, all-purpose flour, selfrising flour, bread flour, cake flour, pastry flour, whole wheat flour, semolina flour,
farina, durum wheat flour, spelt flour, barley flour, rye flour, rice flour, oat flour, or
buckwheat flour.
Read all labels closely.
Track this through your food journal.
3. Eliminate industrial seed oils
Eliminate all foods, drinks, and condiments with refined industrially manufactured
seed oils.
These include: soybean oil, corn oil, cottonseed oil, sunflower oil, safflower oil,
peanut oil, grapeseed oil, and any oil that says “hydrogenated.”
Refined seed oils are found in a wide variety of foods, including many store-bought
salad dressings, mayonnaise, hummus, dips, potato chips, peanut butter, corn
chips, crackers, granola bars, cookies, pastries, muffins, doughnuts, fried chicken,
chicken nuggets, chicken tenders, fish sticks, frozen pizza, french fries, packaged
popcorn, tortilla chips, cheese puffs, snack mixes, vegetable chips, canned soups,
instant noodles, cakes, brownies, pancakes, waffles, butter alternatives, packaged
muffins, cookies, croissants, biscuits, and roasted nuts.
Track this through your food journal.
ACTION:

Adopt the first three Good Energy habits by getting rid of every single
food in your house that includes added sugar, refined grains, or
industrial seed oils, and eliminate all these foods for the next three
weeks.
Start learning about the additional food habits four through seven and
how to incorporate Good Energy eating into your life, below (however,
you won’t need to incorporate these habits until weeks three and four).
Purchase any foods, cookbooks, or tools you need for weeks three and
four.
4. Eat over 50 grams of fiber per day
Track fiber intake daily and aim to get 50 grams per day or more from food
sources. If getting 50 grams of fiber initially causes bloating or stomach upset, you
may want to start slow, with 30 grams per day from foods like avocados,
raspberries, and chia seeds, and work up to beans and legumes (which some
people find “gassy”) and higher quantities of fiber.

Using a barcode-scanning app like MacroFactor can make this extremely simple,
as it will automatically pull in the fiber content.
Best sources to maximize fiber are beans, legumes, nuts and seeds, and certain
fruits.
Specific foods with high fiber include:
Navy beans (~10 grams per ½ cup)
Black beans (~7.5 grams per ½ cup)
Chia seeds (8 grams per 2 tablespoons)
Basil seeds (15 grams per 2 tablespoons; I use Zen Basil brand)
Flaxseeds (8 grams per 1 ounce)
Lentils (~15 grams per 1 cooked cup)
Raspberries and blackberries (~8 grams per 1 cup)
Brussels sprouts (6 grams per 1 cooked cup)
Broccoli (5 grams per 1 cooked cup)
Avocados (~13 grams per avocado)
Track fiber intake in your food journal.
5. Eat three or more servings of probiotic foods per day
Ensure you are getting three or more servings of probiotic-rich foods that do not
have added sugar every day.
Sources include yogurt, kefir, sauerkraut, kimchi, miso, tempeh, natto, kvass, and
apple cider vinegar.
Make sure that any yogurt and kefir is unsweetened and says “live active cultures”
on the label.
While kombucha is a probiotic-rich food, read the label very carefully. Most
commercial kombucha brands are now using excessive amounts of sugar or fruit
juice to sweeten, making conventional kombucha more like a soda than a health
drink. The brand with the lowest sugar on the market I have found is Lion Heart,
with just 2 grams of sugar per serving. Kvass (e.g., from Biotic Ferments), a
fermented drink that uses vegetables (like carrots or beets) as the carbohydrate
source for fermentation, is a fantastic alternative to kombucha.
Track this through your food journal.
6. Increase omega-3 intake to a minimum of 2 grams per day
Ensure you are getting a minimum of 2 grams (2,000 mg) of omega-3 fats each
day.

The best animal-based sources of omega-3s are:
Wild-caught salmon (1.5–2.0 grams per 3-ounce serving)
Sardines (1.3 grams per 2-ounce serving)
Atlantic mackerel (1.1 grams per 3-ounce serving)

Rainbow trout (0.8 gram per 3-ounce serving)
Anchovies (1.1 grams per 2-ounce serving)
Organic pasture-raised eggs (0.33 gram per 1 egg)
The best plant-based sources are:
Chia seeds (5.9 grams per 2.5 tablespoons)
Basil seeds (2.8 grams per 2 tablespoons)
Flaxseeds (2.3 grams per tablespoon)
Hemp seeds (1.2 grams per tablespoon)
Walnuts (2.6 grams per 1-ounce serving)
Algal oil (up to 1.3 grams per serving). Algal oil is generally taken in
supplement form and is one of the only plant-based sources of DHA and EPA.
Tip: I always keep cans of wild-caught fish from Wild Planet in my pantry and add
the fish on top of salads or on flaxseed crackers for a quick and nutritious snack.
I like to keep seeds and nuts handy and sprinkle them on top of all my meals for
an easy and delicious way to boost my omega-3 intake.
If choosing to use omega-3 supplements, buy from a high-quality source like
WeNatal, Nordic Naturals, Thorne, or Pure Encapsulations.
Keep track of this quantity in your food journal.
7. Increase antioxidants, micronutrients, and polyphenols through plant diversity
Incorporate thirty different types of organic plant foods into your diet each week,
coming from organic or regenerative fruits, vegetables, nuts, seeds, beans,
legumes, herbs, and spices.
Of these thirty different types per week, eat at least two servings of cruciferous
vegetables per day. These include broccoli, cauliflower, brussels sprouts, kale, bok
choy, arugula, watercress, collard greens, mustard greens, turnip greens,
radishes, horseradish, rutabaga, kohlrabi, and cabbage.
Chop cruciferous vegetables and let sit for thirty to forty-five minutes to
activate a key Good Energy component, sulforaphane, and make it more heat
stable.
Keep track of this quantity in your food journal.
8. Eat at least 30 grams of protein per meal

Aim to eat 30 grams of protein at each meal, for a total of at least 90 grams of
protein per day.
Good sources include:
Meats: beef, chicken, turkey, pork, and game meats like elk and bison
Fish and seafood
Dairy products: milk, cheese, and Greek yogurt
Eggs

Legumes: beans, lentils, and peas
Soy products: edamame, tofu, and tempeh
Nuts and seeds: hemp seeds, chia seeds, pumpkin seeds, almonds, sunflower
seeds, flaxseeds, cashews, pistachios
If using protein powders, choose organic and/or grass-fed or regenerative (if
animal-based) with minimal ingredients, no added sugars, no colorings, no
“natural flavors” or artificial flavors, no gums, and no ingredient names you
aren’t familiar with. I like Truvani, Equip Prime Protein (Unflavored), Garden of
Life Grass Fed Collagen, and Be Well.
Keep track of this quantity in your food journal.
Note: If you have kidney problems, talk to your physician before changing your
protein quantity.

—
How can you follow these dietary principles as simply, cheaply, and easily
as possible, based on your current lifestyle, time constraints, and cooking
abilities?
Below we’ll explore a variety of packaged and grab-and-go food options
that adhere to Good Energy principles, as well as strategies for preparing
simple or more complex home-cooked meals.
Packaged Food

Cooking your meals at home from whole-food ingredients sets you up for
the best success at Good Energy eating because you can control the quality
of the raw ingredients, ensure that the food is organic, minimize additives
and industrial seed oils, and maximize health-supporting additions (like a
dollop of fermented foods or chia seeds atop your meals!). Since it is nearly
impossible to cook every meal from scratch, I’ve included a list of ideas for
packaged or grab-and-go snacks for busy days.
Some of my favorite packaged or grab-and-go foods that meet Good
Energy standards and can be found at many major grocery stores or online:
Daily Harvest frozen soups, Harvest Bakes, and Harvest Bowls (I top
these with a few chia seeds, a tin of sardines, black beans, and

sauerkraut for a perfect Good Energy lunch!)
Organic whole fruits that are easy to transport, like apples, oranges, and
pears
Organic precut vegetables, like carrot sticks
Natierra Organic Freeze-Dried fruit packs
Unroasted organic nuts (make sure to check the label to ensure they do
not have any added oils)
Organic coconut flakes, like Let’s Do Organic brand
HOPE hummus (this is the only hummus brand I have found that is
organic and does not contain refined seed oils)
Wholly Guacamole organic classic minis
Gaea Organic Olive snack pack
Brami Italian Snacking Lupini Beans (lupini beans are special because
they are extremely high in fiber and have zero net carbohydrates, while
having lots of protein)
Flackers Flaxseed crackers
Ella’s Flats seed crackers
Brad’s Veggie Chips and Kale Chips
gimMe Organic Roasted Seaweed Snacks with sea salt and avocado oil
Artisana Organics Raw Almond Butter snack packs
Stonyfield Organic 100% Grassfed Organic Yogurt Cups
Cocojune unsweetened coconut milk yogurt cups
Straus Organic Whole Milk Plain Greek Yogurt
Epic bars (choose the versions that have no added sugar, like Chicken
Sriracha and Salt and Pepper Venison)
Paleovalley or Chomps 100% Grass Fed Beef Sticks
Hard Boiled Eggs from Vital Farms
Organic Valley string cheese
Wild Planet Wild Sardines in Extra Virgin Olive Oil
Wild Planet packets: Wild Pink Salmon, Albacore Tuna, Skipjack Tuna
Kettle & Fire Bone Broth
Organic nuPasta Konjac Root noodles
Malk Almond Milk

Three Trees Organic Almond Milk
Alexandre Family Farms A2 100% Grass-Fed Organic Milk
Choi’s Organic Nori, 50 sheets (great as a tortilla alternative)
NuttZo Organic nut butter
Sweet Nothings Organic Spoonable Smoothie Cups
Arizona Pepper’s Hot Sauce
Yellowbird Hot Sauce
Muir Glen Organic Salsa
Wildbrine Raw Organic Sauerkraut
Serenity Kids pouches
Preparing Simple Good Energy Meals at Home

Cooking healthy meals needn’t be complicated. A Good Energy kitchen has
an abundance of fresh produce, a variety of proteins, and several different
probiotic, omega-3, and fiber sources always handy. Preparing a meal then
simply becomes mixing and matching these components into an infinite
variety of options. Learning a few simple techniques, like roasting
vegetables and a protein source at 425°F on a baking sheet, or sautéing
protein and vegetables in a stovetop pan, and learning a few spice
combinations and toppings that you like means that you can go forward
with a huge variety of recipe-free easy meals.
Here are some of the main foods that check off the various Good Energy
components while also being low glycemic. (Many of these fit into multiple
categories and can be counted toward different Good Energy habits. For
example, ground venison has a huge amount of micronutrients, but I
categorize it as a healthy protein for the purposes of designing my meals.
Similarly, sauerkraut is filled with phytonutrients, but I categorize it below
as a fermented food.)

Building Good Energy Meals: Components
MICRONUTRIENTS/ANTIOXIDANTS
Roasting or sautéing vegetables (all can be cooked at 425°F till browned):
Asparagus, bottom 2 inches of stems removed, remaining chopped into 1-inch pieces

Bell peppers, cut into 1-inch squares or slices
Broccoli florets
Brussels sprouts, quartered with rough ends cut off
Cabbage (red, green, or napa), thinly sliced
Carrots, whole or chopped into ½- to 1-inch cubes
Cauliflower florets
Celery root, chopped into ½- to 1-inch cubes
Cherry tomatoes, whole
Eggplant, chopped into 1-inch cubes
Fennel, thinly sliced
Green beans, whole
Kohlrabi, chopped into 1-inch cubes
Leeks, sliced into ¼-inch rings
Mushrooms, sliced
Okra, whole or sliced into ½-inch rounds
Onions, quartered or sliced into ¼-inch half-moon slices
Parsnips, chopped into ½- to 1-inch cubes
Radishes, quartered
Romanesco, cut coarsely into 1-inch cubes/florets
Shallots, quartered or sliced into ¼-inch half-moon slices
Zucchini, cut into quartered spears or ½-inch cubes
Salad vegetables:
Canned artichoke hearts, chopped
Avocados, cubed
Bean sprouts
Bell peppers (red, green, yellow, or orange), chopped into ½-inch slices or small ¼inch squares
Broccoli florets
Cabbage (red, green, or napa), sliced very thinly
Carrots, chopped
Cauliflower florets
Celery, chopped
Cucumbers, chopped
Fennel, thinly sliced

Green beans, whole or cut into 1-inch pieces
Jicama, cut into ½-inch cubes or spears
Mushrooms, chopped into small squares
Onions (red, yellow, or white), thinly sliced or chopped into ¼-inch squares
Radishes, quartered
Snap peas, whole or cut into 1-inch pieces
Tomatoes, chopped into small cubes or halved if cherry
Greens:
Arugula
Collard greens
Kale
Lettuce (romaine, butter, iceberg, etc.)
Mixed greens
Spinach
Swiss chard
Fruits:
Apples
Berries (blueberries, raspberries, strawberries, blackberries)
Cherries
Kiwis
Lemons
Limes
Oranges
Papaya
Peaches
Pears
Pomegranate seeds
Nuts and seeds:
Almonds
Basil seeds
Brazil nuts
Chia seeds
Hazelnuts
Hemp seeds

Pecans
Pistachios
Pumpkin seeds
Walnuts
All spices and herbs

FIBER
Chia seeds
Basil seeds
Flaxseeds
Lentils
Split peas
Beans
Konjac root products
Raspberries
Blackberries
Tahini
Brazil nuts
Almonds
Walnuts
Pecans
Hazelnuts
Pistachios
Avocados

PROTEIN
Chicken breasts
Turkey cutlets
Pork (loin, tenderloin, etc.)
Beef (flank steak, sirloin, etc.)
Tofu
Tempeh
Ground pork
Ground lamb
Ground turkey

Ground beef
Ground venison
Ground bison
Shrimp
Scallops

OMEGA-3 FATS
Salmon
Sardines
Mackerel
Unsweetened Greek yogurt
Pastured eggs
Beans
Lentils
Salmon
Anchovies
Sardines
Mackerel
Chia seeds
Basil seeds
Flaxseeds
Hemp seeds
Pasture-raised eggs

FERMENTED FOODS
Sauerkraut
Kimchi
Unsweetened yogurt
Kefir
Tempeh
Miso
Natto
Apple cider vinegar

Looking at these lists, you can see how many easy meals you can throw
together with foods from all five elements.
1. Breakfast Yogurt Parfait: Unsweetened whole milk Greek yogurt with chia
seeds, raspberries, and blackberries
Micronutrients/Phytonutrients: Raspberries and blackberries
Fiber: Chia seeds
Protein: Greek yogurt; can also add 1 scoop of grass-fed collagen
Omega-3 Fats: Chia seeds
Fermented Food: Greek yogurt
2. Egg Scramble: Three pasture-raised eggs, 3 ounces ground grass-fed beef,
sauerkraut, sautéed spinach, avocado, and hot sauce
Micronutrients/Phytonutrients: Spinach, hot sauce
Fiber: Avocado
Protein: Eggs and beef
Omega-3 Fats: Eggs
Fermented Food: Sauerkraut
3. Baked Salmon and Vegetables: Baked salmon with a side of baked brussels
sprouts seasoned with paprika, salt, pepper, and garlic powder, and beet
sauerkraut
Micronutrients/Phytonutrients: Brussels sprouts, garlic powder
Fiber: Brussels sprouts
Protein: Salmon
Omega-3 Fats: Salmon
Fermented Food: Sauerkraut
4. Southwestern Tofu Scramble: Tofu with black beans, red bell peppers,
onions, cumin, and garlic powder, topped with sauerkraut, avocado, hot
sauce, and hemp seeds
Micronutrients/Phytonutrients: Red bell peppers, onions, garlic powder
Fiber: Black beans, avocado
Protein: Tofu, black beans
Omega-3 Fats: Hemp seeds

Fermented Food: Sauerkraut

5. Chicken Stir-Fry: Chicken breast, broccoli, carrots, and red bell peppers,
sautéed on the stove top with miso and tamari, topped with beet
sauerkraut and drizzled with tahini and ground flaxseeds
Micronutrients/Phytonutrients: Red bell peppers
Fiber: Tahini, flaxseeds
Protein: Chicken breast
Omega-3 Fats: Flaxseeds
Fermented Food: Miso, sauerkraut
Cooking More Complex Good Energy Meals

Prepare any meals from the recipes at the back of this book, or from the
following cookbooks (most recipes are Good Energy–friendly, but make
sure to double-check the absence of refined grains):
Food Food Food by The Ranch Malibu
Whole30 Cookbook by Melissa Hartwig Urban
Whole Food Cooking Every Day by Amy Chaplin
It’s All Good by Gwyneth Paltrow
I Am Grateful by Terces Engelhart
Inspiralize Everything by Ali Mafucci

WEEKS THREE AND FOUR—ENACT THREE PERSONALIZED
GOOD ENERGY HABITS
While maintaining the elimination of refined grains, refined added sugars,
and industrial seed oils (Good Energy Habits one through three), it’s time to
add in three additional habits in weeks three and four.
Pick three habits (from habits four through twenty-five) that you don’t
already perform regularly that you will make a commitment to perform over
these next two weeks. As you go into weeks three and four, the following
habit formation best practices from authors James Clear and BJ Fogg can be
helpful.

Habit Tips from the Experts

Tiny Habits
Tiny Habits is a behavior change method and book developed by Stanford
University professor BJ Fogg. The key concept of Tiny Habits is to make
small, incremental changes to your daily routine that are easy to do and
require minimal effort. The idea is that by starting with tiny habits, you can
create lasting change in your life without feeling overwhelmed or
discouraged.
To apply the Tiny Habits method, you start by identifying a behavior that
you want to change or develop. Then, you break that behavior down into
tiny, specific actions that can be completed in just a few seconds. For
example, if you want to start flossing your teeth regularly, your tiny habit
might be to floss just one tooth after brushing your teeth in the morning.
After successfully completing your tiny habit, you celebrate your
achievement with a positive emotion, like saying “I’m awesome!” or doing
a small fist pump. Over time, these tiny habits build momentum and can
lead to bigger changes in your behavior and your life.
As you think about developing big positive habits in your life, like
improving sleep consistency, reflect on how to break them down into tiny
pieces that you can achieve consistently and build confidence and
momentum. For instance, you might currently go to bed at vastly different
times each night, so it would seem too hard to immediately try to set a
bedtime and stick to it. Instead, think about small ways to break this up to
develop confidence and competence. You might:
Start by creating a very lenient cutoff for bedtime that you think you
can achieve most nights. Once you hit this goal every day for a week or
two, move it up by thirty minutes for another two weeks.
Start wearing a sleep tracker every night to objectively understand your
sleep baseline.
Have your phone send you a reminder to get ready for bed at a certain
time each night.

Get a sleep accountability coach through an online service like
Crescent Health.
Start wearing blue-light-blocking glasses after dark each night and
view sunlight first thing in the morning so that you’re more likely to be
tired at night, and have functional circadian rhythms.
Stop drinking caffeine after noon.

Habit Stacking
James Clear’s bestselling book Atomic Habits provides practical strategies
for building good habits and breaking bad ones. One of the key practical
takeaways from Atomic Habits is the concept of habit stacking, which
involves linking a new habit to an existing habit. For example, if you want
to start doing push-ups every day, you might link this habit to your existing
habit of brushing your teeth in the morning. After brushing your teeth, you
do three push-ups. Another example of habit stacking is that every time you
open the front door, you think of one thing you’re grateful for. This makes it
easier to remember to do the new habit and makes it more likely that you
will follow through consistently.
The Habit Loop Requires Reward!
According to James Clear, triggers are important because they provide a cue
for your brain to start the habit loop. The habit loop consists of three parts:
the trigger, the behavior (the habit itself), and the reward. When you
consistently follow this loop, your brain learns to associate the trigger with
the behavior and the reward, making the habit easier to maintain over time.
One key to building new habits is to create clear and consistent triggers.
For example, the sound of your alarm clock in the morning might trigger
you to get out of bed and start your morning routine.
It’s also important to note that triggers can be both internal (such as a
feeling of hunger) and external (such as a notification on your phone), and
they can be positive (such as a reminder to drink water) or negative (such as
a stressful situation that triggers an unhealthy coping mechanism). By

understanding and controlling your triggers, you can take control of your
habits and create positive changes in your life.
Don’t underestimate the power of small rewards. When I text my sleep
data to my accountability buddy each week, and she responds with
enthusiasm when I’ve adhered to the sleep habits that matter to me, I feel
really, really good. This reinforces the behavior immensely!
Additional Good Energy Habits (Commit to at Least Three)

Movement
9. Engage in moderate-intensity movement for at least 150 minutes per week
Calculate your maximum heart rate by subtracting your age from 220, and then
determine what 64 percent of that number is, which is the floor for moderateintensity movement. For me, that would be 220 – 35 = 185 x 0.64 = 118 bpm. For
me, this means I need to get my heart rate above 118 bpm for 150 minutes a week
at a minimum.

Trying out different activities with your wearable tracker can help you learn what
“moderate” activity feels like. For me, a brisk flat walk does not get me to 118 bpm,
but a brisk walk up a hill or a flat jog does.
Verify your time at a specific heart rate range with your wearable, and log your
time each day in your Good Energy tracker.
10. Resistance train three times per week

Commit to resistance training twice per week or more for at least thirty minutes
each session.
Incorporate exercises that fatigue the arms, legs, and core every week. This can
be done with body-weight exercises or with weights. There are numerous options
for starting a resistance training program with online classes, in-person classes,
personal training, and resistance-focused gyms. I’ve recommended several in the
supplementary materials at caseymeans.com/goodenergy.
Make sure that the sessions are planned and scheduled before week three begins.
This may mean signing up for classes at a local gym, finding a free YouTube
series you like that uses just body-weight training, signing up for an online
resistance training program, or other avenues.
Log your resistance training in your Good Energy tracker.
11. Take 10,000 steps per day
For the month, commit to getting 10,000 steps a day, verified by a wearable
tracker.

Tip: Splitting walks up into short spurts throughout the day makes this very simple.
If you walk around the block twice in the morning while drinking your coffee, you’ll

likely accrue around 1,000 steps. Walking the perimeter of your house or
apartment while brushing your teeth for two or three minutes can get you 300 to
500 steps. Walking while taking a thirty-minute phone call will accrue anywhere
from 2,000 to 4,000 steps. Taking a thirty-minute light jog can get you 4,000 or
more steps. Walking around the grocery store can get you 1,000 steps.
Log your total steps per day in the Good Energy tracker.
12. Move regularly throughout the day
Commit to getting up and moving around for at least ninety seconds every hour for
eight waking hours per day. This is surprisingly hard if you have a desk job, where
it’s easy to let hours go by without standing up. One of the best parts of wearables
like the Apple Watch and Fitbit is that they specifically tell you how many hours you
got up and moved. Based on this information, you can see if any parts of your day
are particularly sedentary. For me, my wearables have shown me that my most
sedentary hours are from 2:00 to 5:00 p.m., so now I can troubleshoot those
hours.
You can set a timer on your phone to remind you to get up every hour, or set your
wearable to alert you that you need to stand up.
Log active hours per day in the Good Energy tracker.

Sleep
13. Get seven to eight hours of sleep per night, confirmed by a sleep tracker

You will aim to get between seven and eight hours of total sleep every single night,
as tracked by a wearable tracker. Wearables will show you how much of the night
you were awake, tossing and turning, which is subtracted from total sleep time and
is important to account for. Going to bed at 11:00 p.m and getting up at 7:00 a.m.
does not translate to eight hours of sleep.
This is a habit that may take extreme levels of boundary setting, like going to bed
earlier than other people in your household or sleeping in longer. It may require
you to keep pets out of your bedroom or sleep in a different bedroom from your
partner if they tend to wake you up.
Track your sleep amount based on wearable data and log it in the Good Energy
tracker.
14. Get consistent sleep, with regular bedtimes and wake times
Adhere to a set one-hour bedtime and wake time window to minimize social jet lag.
This could be a bedtime between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. and a wake time between
7:30 and 8:30 a.m., verified by your sleep tracker.

Track this amount from your wearable data and log it in the Good Energy tracker.

Stress, Relationships, and Emotional Health
15. Meditate daily

For the month, practice meditation with a guided app or meditation group every
day, for a minimum of ten minutes per day.
In doing this practice, you build the powerful capacity to understand that you are
an observer of your thoughts, and that they are not your identity. This awareness is
a liberating first step in getting out of the “autopilot” of thought patterns that many
of us are in and suffer from. Additionally, meditations focused on the breath can be
extremely relaxing.
Suggestions for apps and meditation opportunities are in the supplementary
materials at caseymeans.com/goodenergy.
Log the daily practice in your Good Energy tracker.
16. Examine reactivity and maladaptive patterns (self-exploration and therapy)
For the month, read at least two books from our suggested reading list and also
form a relationship with a licensed mental health provider and have at least one
session. Suggestions are in the supplementary materials.

Log the progress in your Good Energy tracker.

Meal Timing and Habits
17. Adhere to a defined eating window

Aim to eat within a ten-hour window each day and fast for at least fourteen hours.
Choose what window you want to adhere to, like 10:00 a.m. to 8:00 p.m. or 8:00
a.m. to 6:00 p.m.
Tip: If it is a struggle for you to not eat late at night, try to have a sizable snack
right before the end of your eating window, even if it’s soon after dinner. (For
instance, if you had dinner at 6:00 p.m. and the end of your eating window is 8:00
p.m., have a few flaxseed crackers, bites of cheese, or almond butter on celery
sticks at 7:50 p.m.)
Log whether you were able to adhere to this window in your Good Energy tracker.
18. Practice mindful eating
Eat all main meals (breakfast, lunch, and dinner) sitting down, without engaging
with any screens (phone, computer, TV, tablet, etc.).

Once your food is in front of you, take ten deep breaths before eating while
reflecting on gratitude for the meal.
While chewing each bite, put your silverware down and chew the bite at least
fifteen times.
Log whether you were able to adhere to mindful eating habits in your Good Energy
tracker.

Light
19. Maximize sunlight exposure in the daytime

Spend at least fifteen minutes outdoors without sunglasses on during the first hour
after waking every day.
If the sun is not up when you wake, then you should aim to be outside for fifteen
minutes during or just after sunrise, and/or turn on bright lights or a light box upon
waking.
Get outside in the daylight for at least fifteen minutes four additional times per day,
for a total of at least one cumulative hour outside per day. This could look like
working out outside, eating breakfast and/or lunch outdoors, taking a walk,
gardening, or taking phone calls outside. It is so easy to let a day go by without
spending a full hour outside in at least four fifteen-minute chunks.
Find ways to move your indoor activities to the outdoors, or front-load your outdoor
activities to the first hour of the day.
Log whether you were able to adhere to morning sunlight in your Good Energy
tracker.
20. Minimize nighttime blue light

Wear blue-light-blocking glasses between sundown and bedtime. (See
recommendations for glasses at caseymeans .com/goodenergy)
After the sun goes down, turn off any unnecessary lights and dim necessary lights
to a low level. Add dimmers to your home lights if you can.
Turn all screens (computer, phone, tablet) to “dark mode” or “night shift” after the
sun goes down.
Log whether you were able to adhere to minimizing nighttime blue light in your
Good Energy tracker.

Temperature
21. Get heat exposure for at least one cumulative hour per week
Aim to get one cumulative hour of very hot heat exposure per week.

This can be through a dry sauna, infrared sauna, or a heated exercise class like
hot yoga.
In weeks one and two, find a facility or gym that has access to a sauna or heat
therapy and arrange for your sessions for weeks three and four.
The heat should be hot enough that you feel uncomfortable and are sweating
significantly.
Log hot minutes per day in the Good Energy tracker.
22. Get cold exposure for at least twelve cumulative minutes per week

Aim to get twelve cumulative minutes of very cold exposure per week.

This can be through cryotherapy, cold showers, or cold immersion in a cold plunge
tub or cold body of water (like a lake, river, or pool in winter).
If you choose to do cryotherapy or cold immersion, you’ll want to find a facility to
do so and arrange this before weeks three and four. If you go into a body of water
for a cold plunge, don’t go alone. Make sure you are safe! When I moved to
Oregon, I found a group on Meetup that cold plunged together several days per
week, and I joined in.
How cold should it be? It should feel like an extreme challenge that you want to
escape. Aim for an eventual goal temperature of 35°F to 45°F for three minutes
per session.
Log cold minutes per day in the Good Energy tracker.

Ingested Toxins
23. Get sufficient clean water per day
Purchase a reverse osmosis water filter (for either countertop or under the sink) or
a high-grade carbon filter, like Berkey, and drink at least ½ ounce of clean water
per pound of body weight per day.

Do not drink tap water or water from a plastic bottle.
Tip: I recommend purchasing a glass or metal water bottle that you love and know
how many ounces of water it holds. I like to fill three 32-ounce glass mason jars for
96 ounces total, which is what I need to drink each day at a minimum for my
weight. I fill them each night with reverse osmosis water and have them out on my
counter when I wake up, so that I know the exact minimum I need to drink that day.
Log the clean water intake (in ounces) in your Good Energy tracker.

If you smoke (cigarettes, cigars, marijuana, etc.) or vape any products,
stop these completely. They will hurt your mitochondria and vastly
diminish your ability to make Good Energy.

Environmental Toxins
24. Clean personal care and home care products

Overhaul the products used in your home and on your body to greatly minimize
your daily toxic exposures.
The following products should be swapped out for unscented,* nontoxic versions
that have no colorings or dyes:
Personal care products: shampoo, conditioner, body wash, body soap, shaving
cream, deodorant, body lotion, hand lotion, makeup, lip balm, nail polish, hand
soap, hand sanitizers, perfume, and cologne.

Home products: laundry detergent, fabric softener, laundry sheets, stainremover sprays, counter spray, disinfectants, floor cleaners, bleach, scented
candles, plug-in air fresheners, car air fresheners, and room sprays.
Products can be very sneaky with fragrance. Even products labeled “nontoxic,”
“green,” or “natural” may still include fragrance, which should be avoided.
Verify your products on the EWG website, looking for “EWG verified” products or
products scoring a 1 or a 2. *Products that are scented exclusively with essential
oils are OK. These are extremely rare and need to be sought out from specialty
retailers and have the specific essential oils listed in the ingredients. Remove
anything with the words “fragrance,” “natural fragrance,” or “parfum” in the
ingredient list.
Tip: This does not need to be expensive!
For home care, a simple and cheap way to adhere to this rule is to make a
multipurpose cleaning spray from one part white vinegar to five parts filtered
water, plus any essential oils you like, all mixed in a glass spray bottle. This
solution can clean counters, showers, toilets, and many types of durable
floors, and baking soda can be sprinkled on surfaces for extra cleaning
capability.
For multipurpose soap (hand soap, dish soap, body soap, and general
cleaning soap), I recommend diluting Dr. Bronner’s Baby Unscented PureCastile Liquid Soap into glass pump bottles and putting them in the kitchen
and all bathrooms.
For face and body lotion and makeup remover, you can use organic jojoba oil
or organic coconut oil.
See full product recommendations in the supplementary materials online at
caseymeans.com/goodenergy. Prepare your home and products before week
three begins so that weeks three and four involve as many clean and nontoxic
products as possible.
Log your swaps in your Good Energy tracker.
25. Get nature exposure for four hours per week
Spend four cumulative hours per week in a natural or green space. In a city, this
could be a park, botanical garden, or riverfront trail. Outside of cities, this could be
a local trail, or a full excursion into the mountains or wilderness. Ideally, you should
get as deep into nature as possible, away from cars and roads, where you are
immersed in natural plant life.
In weeks one and two, make sure to schedule your four hours of time in nature on
your calendar (and in your tracker) in preparation for weeks three and four.
Determine which locations you are going to go to for your nature time, and make it
specific.
Log your minutes in nature per day in your Good Energy tracker.

—
Before starting your two weeks of living out additional Good Energy habits,
reflect on how you’re going to make the habits fit into your life and how
you might move from level two to level three or from level three to level
four on the hierarchy of competence. What must be true in your life to go
from conscious incompetence to conscious competence, or from conscious
competence to unconscious competence? I urge you to reflect on creative
ways to make them happen and the realities that would prevent them. Don’t
limit yourself with reasons why it won’t work for you or your life; think big
and let yourself imagine how that habit could be possible. For instance, if
your goal is to minimize refined grains in your diet, you might need to do
the following to get to level three, conscious competence:
Start following grain-free food blogs and social media accounts to learn
new recipes and keep them front of mind.
Get a grain-free cookbook with recipes that look yummy to you.
Sign up for a grain-free meal kit delivery service or a grain-free frozen
food delivery service like Daily Harvest.
Throw away all refined grains in your house.
Sign up for grocery delivery so you aren’t tempted to buy grains at the
grocery store.
Look at menus before you go to a restaurant to figure out a meal that
doesn’t have refined grains.
Ask waiters not to bring bread before the meal.
Learn how to bake with grain-free flours.
Read all labels on products from the grocery store.
Learn grain-free, minimally processed swaps for your favorite grainbased products and purchase them, like lentil pasta and cauliflower
pizza crust.
Figure out a few bread and dessert alternatives that you like a lot that
don’t have refined grains.

When making plans with friends, family, or coworkers to share a meal,
have a list of healthy restaurants and cafés handy that you can suggest.
Bring a grain-free healthy dessert or side dish to a dinner party or
family holiday.

REFLECTIONS

After each week of the four-week plan, set aside a half hour to look at your
Good Energy tracker and food journal and take stock of how you did. If you
didn’t meet your goals, write a few sentences about what barriers might
have gotten in the way. Try to connect with your accountability partner to
talk these through and troubleshoot to improve your success in the next
week. What would you need to change for you to be more successful?
At the end of week four, reflect on whether you improved your level of
competence across the food habits and the additional three habits you
chose. Were you able to move from conscious incompetence to conscious
competence? What were the strategies you used to make the habits happen?
Do you need to try to break the habit into even smaller habits to build
confidence and make progress? Doing this cycle of action, tracking,
reflection, and recommitment is a powerful exercise that you will do
throughout your life until every habit becomes second nature: unconscious
competence.
Most important, check in on how it felt to create some of these habits.
Do you notice anything different in the way you feel? Do you feel proud of
yourself for starting this journey? Was it helpful to have accountability?
ACTION:

Choose three additional Good Energy habits from habits four through
twenty-five to fully commit to for weeks three and four.
Reflect and journal on the ways that you are going to build those habits
into your life for weeks three and four.
Fill these out in your Good Energy tracker in preparation for weeks
three and four, scheduling every activity into the tracker.
At the end of each week, reflect on the Good Energy tracker and food
journal to take stock of how things went.

GET OUT OF THE MATRIX
During this month, I am hoping you proved that you can add new habits to
your life and that they make you feel better. I also hope you improved your
mindset, realizing there is meaning in consciously giving your cells the
biological needs that modern industrial life has stolen.
As the months go on, work to stack additional habits in this plan. There
is no destination—but I am convinced the commitment to daily actions that
respect our cells is the secret to a happy life.
The Good Energy tracker and other resources can be found online in the supplementary
materials at caseymeans.com/goodenergy.

PA R T 4

GOOD ENERGY RECIPES

Breakfast

Summer Bounty Frittata with Simple Mixed Greens

Nut-Free, Gluten-Free
Time: 40 minutes
SERVINGS: 4

This frittata is an easy make-ahead meal for breakfasts throughout the
week. Blending spinach with the eggs adds a bright green color to the
frittata and also sneaks in a great source of Good Energy micronutrients like
magnesium and vitamins A, E, C, K, folate, B₁, B ₆, and B12. Each egg
provides 6 grams of whole food protein as well as about 330 milligrams of
omega-3 fatty acids. A pasture-raised egg has about double the omega-3s
that a conventionally raised egg has. Serve the frittata alongside my simple
mixed green salad for an extra dose of thylakoids (which help with feeling
full!) and micronutrients.
While many recipes work well with frozen cauliflower rice, this frittata
is best with fresh. I make fresh cauliflower rice by putting cauliflower
florets in a large food processor with an “S” blade and pulsing a few times
until the cauliflower becomes a coarse rice-like consistency. Don’t
overpulse or the cauliflower will get grainy and watery when cooked.
6 large eggs
2 cups baby spinach, tightly packed
¼ teaspoon sea salt, plus more as needed
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
1 medium leek, white and light green parts, thinly sliced and thoroughly rinsed
1 small zucchini, halved lengthwise and cut into ½-inch cubes (about 1½ cups)
1 cup fresh cauliflower rice (see headnote)
Freshly ground black pepper
2 tablespoons chopped fresh dill, plus more for garnish
1 cup grape tomatoes
2 ounces feta cheese, crumbled (optional)

Simple Mixed Greens
4 to 6 handfuls of greens, like arugula, spinach, or mesclun
Juice of ½ lemon, or more to taste

3 tablespoons high-quality extra-virgin olive oil
Flaky salt and freshly ground black pepper

1. Preheat the oven to 350°F. Place the eggs, spinach, and salt in a
blender. Cover and blend for 30 seconds, or until the mixture is
thoroughly incorporated and bright green.
2. In a 10-inch cast-iron skillet, heat the olive oil over medium heat. Add
the leeks and cook for 3 to 4 minutes, or until just beginning to soften.
Add the zucchini and cauliflower rice and season with salt and pepper
to taste. Cook for 4 to 5 minutes, or until the zucchini is tender-crisp
and golden brown. Sprinkle with the chopped dill.
3. Pour the eggs into the skillet with the vegetables. Tilt the skillet to
evenly distribute the eggs around the zucchini mixture. Top with the
tomatoes and feta crumbles, if using, and place the skillet in the oven.
Bake for 13 to 15 minutes, or until the eggs are set and solid to the
touch in the center.
4. While the frittata cools, prepare the salad: In a large mixing bowl, toss
the salad greens with the lemon juice and olive oil. Season with salt and
pepper to taste.
5. Serve a slice of warm frittata with the salad. Garnish with additional
dill.
STORAGE: Store in an airtight container in the refrigerator for 3 to 4 days.

Strawberry Chia Smoothie

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 5 minutes
SERVINGS: 1

This smoothie is a nutrient powerhouse thanks partly to Brazil nuts, which
add around 270 micrograms of selenium, a hefty dose of this essential trace
mineral. Selenium acts as an antioxidant and assists in healthy glucose
metabolism. And the best part? You don’t need any milk to achieve that
creamy texture; the water and nuts will emulsify in a high-speed blender to
make nut milk and save time and cost!
½ cup frozen strawberries
¼ cup frozen raspberries
½ cup frozen cauliflower florets
4 Brazil nuts
1 tablespoon chia seeds
1 tablespoon maca powder
2 teaspoons beet powder
¼ teaspoon vanilla extract
¼ teaspoon ground cardamom
Juice of ½ lemon

Place all of the ingredients in a blender with 1 cup water and blend on high
speed for 30 seconds, or until smooth. Serve immediately.

Maca Smoothie, 2 Ways

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free, Dairy-Free
Time: 5 minutes
SERVINGS: 1

The blood sugar–spiking potential of frozen banana in this smoothie is
balanced with fat and fiber. Ingredients like avocado and hemp seeds bring
the fiber total up to 11 grams. Maca is a cruciferous root vegetable with
potent antioxidant properties, helping mitigate oxidative stress in the body.
I’ve included two of my favorite variations for this powerhouse smoothie.
TROPICAL
½ frozen banana
¼ cup frozen avocado (about ¼ fresh avocado)
¼ cup frozen pineapple chunks
½ cup baby kale, lightly packed
1 tablespoon hemp seeds
1 tablespoon tahini
1 tablespoon maca powder
¼ teaspoon vanilla extract

BERRY
½ frozen banana
½ cup frozen blueberries
¼ cup frozen avocado (about ¼ fresh avocado)
½ cup baby kale, lightly packed
1 tablespoon hemp seeds
1 tablespoon tahini
1 tablespoon maca powder
Juice of ½ lime

Place all of the ingredients (for either the Tropical or Berry variation) in a
blender with 1 cup water. Blend on high speed for 30 seconds, or until
smooth. Serve immediately.

Good Energy Milk

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 5 minutes, plus 8 to 10 hours for soaking
SERVINGS: 4 (8-OUNCE) CUPS

Walnuts and hemp seeds are rich in omega-3 fatty acids, which are
connected to reduced levels of pro-inflammatory biomarkers, plaque
buildup in arteries, and blood pressure. Each glass of this nut and seed milk
provides 3.5 grams of omega-3s. Making your own nut milk at home is also
a great way to avoid hidden sugars and other additives that are often found
in store-bought options. Plus, it’s a fun and simple project that can save you
money in the long run.
½ cup walnuts
1 teaspoon sea salt
½ cup hemp seeds
1 teaspoon vanilla extract

1. Place the walnuts in a medium bowl. Cover the nuts with a few inches
of water and add the salt. Cover and set aside to soak for 8 to 10 hours.
2. Drain the nuts and rinse thoroughly.
3. In a blender, place the walnuts, hemp seeds, and vanilla with 4 cups
filtered water. Use a little less water for a creamier consistency or a
little more for a thinner milk. Blend on high speed for 2 to 3 minutes,
or until thoroughly combined, white, and frothy.
4. Line a pitcher with a nut milk bag or place a colander lined with
cheesecloth over a bowl. Pour the milk into the nut milk bag or
colander to strain the nut and seed pulp. Squeeze or press with clean
hands to extract as much milk as possible.
5. Shake before using, as the milk will naturally separate.
STORAGE: Store in a clean container in the refrigerator for 3 to 4 days.

Spinach-Chickpea Wraps with Creamy Scrambled Eggs and Spicy
Mushrooms

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 45 minutes
SERVINGS: 3 (2 WRAPS PER SERVING)

The sautéed mushrooms in this recipe are a fantastic source of beta-glucans,
a compound that acts as a prebiotic fiber. Beneficial bacteria in the gut
break down the beta-glucans to produce short-chain fatty acids, which can
reduce insulin resistance. Pro tip: You can make the wraps in bulk and
freeze them for a more leisurely morning.
Spinach-Chickpea Wraps
½ cup chickpea flour
¼ cup cassava flour
1 cup baby spinach, tightly packed
3 or 4 fresh basil leaves
¼ teaspoon sea salt
Extra-virgin olive oil, as needed

Spicy Mushrooms
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
3 cups cremini mushrooms, sliced
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
Pinch of crushed red pepper flakes

Creamy Scrambled Eggs
1 tablespoon grass-fed butter
6 large eggs, beaten
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
6 basil leaves, for garnish
Hot sauce (optional)

1. Make the wraps: In a blender, place the chickpea flour, cassava flour,
spinach, basil, salt, and 1 cup water. Blend on high speed for 30

seconds, or until smooth and vibrant green.
2. Heat a medium cast-iron skillet over medium heat. Pour ¼ cup of the
batter into the heated skillet. Rotate the skillet in a circular motion to
spread the batter, as if making a crepe. Cook for 1 to 2 minutes on each
side, or until the wrap is pliable. If the batter sticks, use a few drops of
olive oil to grease the pan. Repeat until 6 wraps are complete. Set aside.
3. Sauté the mushrooms: Heat the olive oil in the same skillet over
medium heat. Add the mushrooms and season with salt, black pepper,
and red pepper flakes to taste. Cook for 5 to 6 minutes, or until the
mushrooms are tender and golden brown. Set aside.
4. Make the creamy scrambled eggs: Add the butter to the same skillet
over medium-low heat. Once melted, add the beaten eggs and season
with salt and pepper. Gently scramble the eggs for 2 to 3 minutes, or
until just set.
5. To assemble, place two wraps on a plate, line each with two basil
leaves, and add some scrambled eggs and spicy mushrooms. If desired,
top with hot sauce.
STORAGE: The wraps can be prepared in bulk and stored in the freezer for
up to 3 months. To reheat, simply warm the wraps in a dry pan over medium
heat for 30 seconds on each side, or until warm and pliable.

Chia or Basil Seed Pudding 3 Ways

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 10 minutes, plus soaking overnight
SERVINGS: 1

Chia and basil seeds are potent sources of metabolic-friendly fiber. When
soaked in liquid, basil and chia seeds swell and gelatinize, creating a
pudding texture. This is due to mucilage, a soluble fiber that allows the
seeds to absorb ten to twenty times their weight in water. Here are three
delicious pudding base and topping flavor combinations.
TROPICAL COCONUT
Base
3 tablespoons chia or basil seeds, or a combination
⅔ cup Good Energy Milk (this page) or preferred milk
½ teaspoon blue spirulina
¼ teaspoon lime zest
¼ cup fresh pineapple, finely diced
1 tablespoon shredded coconut
Pinch of sea salt
Toppers
¼ cup chopped fresh pineapple
1 teaspoon hemp seeds
Freshly squeezed lime juice

RASPBERRY AND ALMOND
Base
3 tablespoons chia or basil seeds, or a combination
⅔ cup Good Energy Milk (this page) or preferred milk
¼ cup raspberries, finely diced
⅛ teaspoon vanilla extract
¼ teaspoon beet powder
Pinch of sea salt
Toppers

¼ cup blackberries

1 tablespoon chopped almonds
Squeeze of fresh lemon juice

DARK CHOCOLATE AND ORANGE
Base

3 tablespoons chia or basil seeds, or a combination
⅔ cup Good Energy Milk (this page) or preferred milk
¼ cup orange segments, finely chopped
1½ teaspoons cocoa powder
⅛ teaspoon vanilla extract
¼ teaspoon ground cinnamon
½ teaspoon maca
Pinch of sea salt
Toppers
¼ cup orange segments
1 tablespoon chopped hazelnuts, lightly toasted
1 teaspoon pumpkin seeds

In a medium bowl, mix the base ingredients with a whisk until well
incorporated, then cover. (Alternatively, add the ingredients to a large
mason jar and shake until combined, then leave on the lid.) After 2 to 3
minutes, rewhisk (or reshake). Refrigerate overnight to soak. Garnish with
the toppers just before serving.

Spiced Almond Flour Pancakes with Stewed Apples

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 2

Cinnamon, an essential ingredient in this recipe, may regulate blood
glucose levels and exhibit antioxidant and anti-inflammatory properties.
The stewed apples are a great substitute for sugary syrup—they provide a
little sweetness along with vitamin C, potassium, and vitamin K.
Stewed Apples
1 apple, peeled and diced
1 teaspoon unrefined coconut oil
¼ teaspoon ground cinnamon
⅛ teaspoon sea salt
1 teaspoon freshly squeezed lemon juice

Pancakes
1 cup blanched fine-ground almond flour
1 teaspoon baking powder
⅛ teaspoon sea salt
½ teaspoon ground cinnamon
⅛ teaspoon ground nutmeg
⅛ teaspoon ground ginger
⅛ teaspoon ground allspice
½ cup canned full-fat coconut milk
2 large eggs
½ teaspoon vanilla extract
Unrefined coconut oil, for the pan, to prevent the pancakes from sticking

1. Make the stewed apples: In a small saucepan, add the diced apple,
coconut oil, cinnamon, salt, lemon juice, and ½ cup water and bring to
a simmer over medium heat. Cook for 10 minutes, or until the apples
become tender and fragrant and the water reduces to a syrupy
consistency.

2. Meanwhile, make the pancakes: In a medium bowl, combine the
almond flour, baking powder, salt, cinnamon, nutmeg, ginger, and
allspice. In a separate bowl, whisk together the coconut milk, eggs,
vanilla, and ¼ cup water. Stir the coconut milk mixture into the dry
ingredients.
3. Heat a cast-iron skillet or griddle over medium-low heat. Reduce the
heat to low and add a little coconut oil to prevent the batter from
sticking. Pour ¼ cup of the batter into the skillet and cook for about 2
minutes on each side, or until golden brown and fluffy. Adjust the heat
as necessary while the pancakes cook.
4. Serve the pancakes warm with the stewed apples.

Sardine-Scallion Fritters with Tzatziki

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 25 minutes
SERVINGS: 3 (6 MEDIUM FRITTERS)

Sardines, a great source of omega-3 fatty acids, are also a low-mercury fish,
making them a safe seafood choice. Scallions are a member of the allium
family, which contains compounds that may have cancer-preventive
properties.
5 ounces frozen spinach, thawed (about 1 cup)
1 (4-ounce) tin sardines, drained and mashed
4 scallions, green and white portions thinly sliced
4 large eggs, beaten
2 tablespoons coconut flour
½ teaspoon sea salt
Freshly ground black pepper
Extra-virgin olive oil, for frying
1 tablespoon chopped fresh dill, plus more for garnish

Tzatziki
1 cup plain whole-milk yogurt
2 tablespoons chopped fresh dill
1 tablespoon freshly squeezed lemon juice
1 garlic clove, minced
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

1. Squeeze the excess water out of the spinach. In a medium mixing bowl,
combine the spinach, sardines, scallions, and eggs. Add the coconut
flour, salt, and pepper to taste and stir until well combined.
2. Heat a skillet over medium heat and add a small swirl of olive oil.
Working in batches, scoop the batter into the skillet, forming medium
fritters. Cook the fritters for 3 to 4 minutes per side, or until golden
brown and cooked through.

3. Make the tzatziki: In a small bowl, whisk together the yogurt, dill,
lemon juice, and garlic. Season generously with salt and pepper.
4. Garnish the fritters with additional dill and serve with the tzatziki.

Lunch

Fennel and Apple Salad with Lemon-Dijon Dressing and Smoked
Salmon

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free
Time: 20 minutes
SERVINGS: 4

Salmon supplies our bodies with omega-3s, vitamin D, vitamin B12,
potassium, and selenium while being relatively low in mercury. It’s also
worth noting that choosing unsweetened smoked salmon is important to
avoid added sugars.
1 small red onion, thinly sliced
2 medium bulbs fennel, quartered, cored, and thinly sliced
1 Granny Smith apple, thinly sliced
4 ribs celery, thinly sliced
½ cup green olives, pitted and sliced
¼ cup chopped fresh dill
½ cup Lemon-Dijon Dressing (this page) or to taste
½ cup fennel fronds, if available
6 ounces smoked salmon, sliced
2 tablespoons finely chopped toasted pecans

1. In a large mixing bowl, toss the onion, fennel, apple, celery, olives, and
dill with the Lemon-Dijon Dressing. Allow to sit for 5 to 10 minutes to
marinate.
2. To serve, divide the salad equally among four plates. Garnish with
fennel fronds, smoked salmon, and toasted pecans.

Rainbow Salad with Lemon-Dijon Dressing and Soft-Boiled Eggs

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 15 minutes, plus 1 hour for marinating
SERVINGS: 4

Cruciferous vegetables like kale, red cabbage, and sauerkraut are rich in
isothiocyanates—molecules that fight oxidative stress by increasing the
gene expression of the antioxidant-promoting gene, Nrf2. The marinated
chickpeas are a great source of whole food protein and can be made ahead
of time, making meal prep a breeze. Soft-boiled eggs, pumpkin seeds, and
optional crumbled feta cheese bring the protein total of this salad up to 24
grams.
Za’atar-Marinated Chickpeas
1 (15-ounce) can chickpeas, drained, rinsed, and patted dry
2 teaspoons extra-virgin olive oil
1 shallot, thinly sliced
1 garlic clove, finely minced
2 tablespoons red wine vinegar
1 teaspoon za’atar spice blend
¼ teaspoon sea salt

Soft-Boiled Eggs
4 large eggs

Salad
4 cups arugula, tightly packed
1 orange bell pepper, ribs and seeds removed and sliced
1 medium yellow squash, diced
4 cups sliced red cabbage
½ cup beet sauerkraut
Lemon-Dijon Dressing (this page)
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
¼ cup pumpkin seeds
¼ cup crumbled feta cheese (optional)

1. Make the marinated chickpeas: In a medium mixing bowl, add the
chickpeas, olive oil, shallot, garlic, vinegar, za’atar, and salt and stir
until combined. Cover and marinate for at least 1 hour. The chickpeas
may be made up to 5 days in advance.
2. Make the soft-boiled eggs: Bring a medium saucepan of water to a
gentle boil over medium-high heat. Carefully lower the eggs into the
water and cook for 7 minutes. Once done, place the eggs in a bowl of
ice water until they are cool enough to handle. Peel the eggs and set
aside.
3. Make the salad: In a large mixing bowl, toss the arugula, bell pepper,
yellow squash, red cabbage, and sauerkraut with a desired amount of
Lemon-Dijon Dressing. Season the salad components with salt and
black pepper to taste.
4. To serve, divide the salad evenly among four bowls. Sprinkle with the
pumpkin seeds, marinated chickpeas, and feta, if using. Top with
halved soft-boiled eggs.
STORAGE: Store the undressed salad and its components in the
refrigerator for up to 5 days.

Curried Roasted Vegetables with Coconut Flour Flatbread

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 35 minutes
SERVINGS: 2 TO 3

The spices in curry powder have some of the highest antioxidant levels of
any food, including turmeric, a potent anti-inflammatory spice. Turmeric
acts as both an antioxidant and an anti-inflammatory substance, directly
inhibiting the expression of inflammatory gene NF-ϰB. Coconut flour and
psyllium husks in the flatbread add 17 grams of fiber per serving and can be
found at most health food stores, although psyllium is sometimes in the
supplements area. Cassava flour is a grain-free gluten-free alternative flour
made from the cassava plant root, sometimes called yuca.
Coconut Flour Flatbread
½ cup coconut flour
¼ cup cassava flour
2 tablespoons whole psyllium husks
½ teaspoon baking powder
¼ teaspoon sea salt
¼ cup canned full-fat coconut milk

Curried Roasted Vegetables
1 medium head cauliflower, cut into small florets
1 large tomato, cut into wedges
1 small yellow onion, sliced
3 medium carrots, coarsely chopped
1 tablespoon curry powder
2 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil, plus more for frying
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
½ cup frozen peas
Cilantro
Plain whole-milk yogurt
1 lime, cut into wedges

1. Make the flatbread dough: Preheat the oven to 400°F. In a medium
bowl, whisk together the coconut flour, cassava flour, psyllium husks,
baking powder, and salt. Add the coconut milk and 1½ cups warm
water and mix until well combined. Set aside for at least 10 minutes.
2. Make the curried roasted vegetables: On a large rimmed baking
sheet, toss the cauliflower, tomatoes, onion, and carrots with the curry
powder, olive oil, salt, and pepper until well coated. Roast for 20 to 25
minutes, tossing occasionally, until the vegetables are golden brown
and tender. During the last 5 minutes of roasting, add the frozen peas
and toss with the vegetable mixture. Roast until the peas are bright
green.
3. Divide the flatbread dough into 6 equal pieces. Roll each piece into a
ball. Place a ball between two sheets of parchment paper. Using a
rolling pin, roll out the dough to about ½ inch thickness. Repeat for the
remaining dough balls.
4. Heat a cast-iron skillet over medium heat. Add a little olive oil and
place one rolled-out flatbread in the heated skillet. Cook for 3 to 4
minutes on each side, or until golden and starting to puff. Transfer to a
plate, and repeat with the remaining flatbread.
5. Serve the curried roasted vegetables with the warm flatbread, cilantro,
yogurt, and lime wedges.

Cauliflower Rice Hand Rolls

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 2

The cauliflower sushi rice, made with omega-3-rich flaxseeds and tangy rice
wine vinegar, adds a nutritious and blood sugar–balancing twist to typical
white sushi rice. Roasted nori sheets are rich in iodine, an essential trace
mineral that supports thyroid and metabolic health.
Spicy Salmon
1 (6-ounce) can wild salmon, drained and flaked with a fork
1 tablespoon Herbed Aioli (see this page) or avocado oil mayonnaise
1 pinch crushed red pepper flakes (optional)
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

Cauliflower Sushi Rice
½ recipe Simple Cauliflower Rice (this page), warm
1 teaspoon rice wine vinegar
1 tablespoon sesame seeds
2 teaspoons ground flaxseeds

Miso-Tahini Sauce
1 date, pitted
3 tablespoons tahini
1 teaspoon tamari
1 teaspoon red miso
2 teaspoons rice wine vinegar
1 garlic clove, minced
1 teaspoon freshly grated ginger
3 to 4 roasted nori sheets, cut into quarters
1 ripe but firm Hass avocado, halved, pitted, peeled, and sliced
1 small cucumber, diced

1. Make the spicy salmon: In a medium bowl, mix the salmon, aioli, and
red pepper flakes, if using, until well combined. Season with salt and
black pepper to taste. Set aside.
2. Make the cauliflower sushi rice: In a separate bowl, mix together the
warm cauliflower rice, vinegar, sesame seeds, and flaxseeds. Set aside.
3. Make the miso-tahini sauce: Soak the date in hot water for 10 to 15
minutes to soften, and then drain. In a miniature food processor, blend
together the tahini, tamari, miso, date, vinegar, garlic, and ginger. Thin
with 1 to 2 tablespoons of water, or until the dip is thick but pourable.
4. To assemble the hand rolls, top a sheet of nori with some cauliflower
rice, spicy salmon, sliced avocado, and cucumber. Wrap and serve with
miso-tahini sauce.

Classic Chicken and Celery Salad Wraps

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 50 minutes
SERVINGS: 2 TO 4

Homemade Herbed Aioli or avocado oil mayonnaise (Primal Kitchen brand
is available at most major grocers) provides richness without the use of
inflammatory seed oil–based mayonnaise. Using collard leaves instead of
traditional wheat wraps or bread is a Good Energy swap. With components
that can be prepared ahead of time and stored in the refrigerator, these
wraps are great for a quick lunch.
1½ pounds skinless, boneless chicken breasts
Sea salt
4 to 8 large collard leaves
¼ cup Herbed Aioli or avocado oil mayonnaise
Juice of ½ lemon
¼ cup finely diced red onion
2 ribs celery, diced
2 tablespoons dried sour cherries (optional)
1 cup thinly sliced red cabbage
1 cucumber, cut into spears

1. In a medium bowl, season the chicken breasts with salt and refrigerate
for 20 to 30 minutes.
2. Meanwhile, bring a wide pot of water to a boil over high heat. Using a
sharp knife, trim the thickest part of each collard leaf stem to create an
even thickness. Season the water generously with salt. Add the collard
to the water to blanch the leaves for about 1 minute, or until pliable and
bright green. Submerge the cooked leaves in ice water to halt the
cooking process. Place on a clean towel to dry.
3. Remove the chicken from the refrigerator. Add 3 cups water to a
medium saucepan with a lid and bring to a simmer over medium-high
heat. Add the chicken and cover. Reduce the heat to low and simmer

until the chicken is cooked through, 15 to 20 minutes, depending on the
thickness.
4. In a large bowl, whisk together the aioli, lemon juice, onion, celery, and
sour cherries, if using.
5. Remove the chicken breasts from the water and pat dry. Finely dice the
chicken and add to the mayonnaise mixture. Stir until well combined.
6. To assemble the wraps, top a blanched collard leaf with some chicken
salad, sliced red cabbage, and cucumber spears. Wrap and enjoy.

Dinner

Pork and Cauliflower Fried Rice

Nut-Free, Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free
Time: 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 2

Swapping cauliflower rice for white rice taps into the beneficial compounds
in cruciferous vegetables, including a range of micronutrients like vitamin
C, vitamin K, folate, vitamin B₆, and potassium.
1 tablespoon plus 1 teaspoon tamari
1 tablespoon rice wine vinegar, plus more for serving
1 tablespoon almond butter
3 garlic cloves, minced
½ pound ground pork
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
2 cups diced cremini mushrooms
3 cups fresh cauliflower rice (about 10 ounces)
1 carrot, diced
½ medium red onion, diced
2 cup chopped kale
2 large eggs, beaten and lightly seasoned with salt and pepper
2 scallions, green and white portions thinly sliced

1. In a small bowl, whisk together the tamari, vinegar, almond butter, and
garlic. Set aside.
2. Heat a large skillet over medium-high heat. Add the ground pork and
cook, breaking up large lumps with a wooden spoon, for 5 to 7 minutes,
or until golden brown. Season with salt and pepper to taste.
3. Add the mushrooms and cook for 4 to 5 minutes, or until tender and
golden brown. Add the cauliflower rice, carrot, onion, kale, and the
tamari-vinegar mixture. Cook for 2 to 3 minutes, or until tender-crisp.
4. Make a small well in the center of the skillet ingredients and add the
beaten eggs. Gently scramble the eggs for 2 to 3 minutes, or until just
set, and then combine with the cauliflower rice mixture. Remove from
the heat.

5. Garnish with sliced scallions and a few shakes of vinegar to taste.

Seared Wild Salmon with Chive Salsa and Creamy Cauliflower and
Celery Root Puree

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 20 minutes
SERVINGS: 2

Wild salmon is a great source of powerful long-chain omega-3 fatty acids
eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA) and docosahexaenoic acid (DHA). If you
choose wild salmon over farmed, you will take advantage of the diverse diet
and nutrition benefits that wild salmon delivers.
2 (6- to 8-ounce) wild salmon fillets, skin on
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
1 tablespoon avocado oil

Chive Salsa
3 tablespoons sliced fresh chives
¼ cup finely diced tomatoes
1 tablespoon freshly squeezed lime juice
½ teaspoon extra-virgin olive oil
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
⅓ recipe Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree

1. Pat the salmon fillets dry and season with salt and pepper. In a 10-inch
cast-iron or medium oven-proof skillet, heat the avocado oil over
medium-high heat, until just shimmering but not smoking. Add the
fillets skin-side down and sear for 3 to 4 minutes undisturbed, or until
the skin is well browned. Flip the salmon and cook for 2 to 3 minutes
more, or until just cooked through. Remove from the heat.
2. Meanwhile, prepare the salsa. In a small mixing bowl, add the chives,
tomatoes, lime juice, olive oil, and salt and pepper to taste.
3. To serve, spoon equal amounts of the cauliflower puree on the center of
each plate. Place salmon on top, skin-side up. Divide equal amounts of
the salsa between the plates.

Mushroom and Creamy Cauliflower Bake

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free
Time: 1 hour 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 4 TO 6

Instead of using mashed potatoes as a topping in this ode to shepherd’s pie,
I use my Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree, just as enjoyable but
with more fiber and micronutrient density. Making low-carb swaps like this
is an easy way to minimize glycemic variability.
2 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil
8 ounces mixed wild mushrooms, sliced
1 large onion, sliced
1 black garlic clove, mashed
1 tablespoon red miso
Freshly ground black pepper
3 cups chicken bone broth or stock, or vegetable stock
1 cup brown lentils
¼ teaspoon dried thyme
Sea salt
½ cup chopped walnuts
2 cups baby spinach
Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree (this page)

1. Preheat the oven to 400°F. In a wide, oven-safe sauté pan with a lid,
heat the olive oil over medium-high heat. Add the mushrooms and cook
for 4 to 5 minutes, or until tender and browned. Reduce the heat to
medium. Add the onion and cook, stirring frequently, for 8 to 10
minutes, or until golden brown and fragrant.
2. Add the black garlic, miso, pepper to taste, and ½ cup broth. Using a
wooden spoon, release any browned bits from the bottom of the pan
and mix well. Bring the mushroom mixture to a simmer and continue to
cook for 3 to 4 minutes, or until half of the liquid has evaporated and
the mushrooms are covered in a glossy, brown glaze.

3. Add the lentils, thyme, and remaining 2½ cups broth. Season the broth
with salt and more pepper if needed. Bring the lentils to a simmer and
cover. Cook for 25 to 30 minutes, or until the lentils are tender and
most of the liquid is absorbed. Remove from the heat, add the walnuts,
and mix in the baby spinach until just wilted.
4. Smooth the Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree over the top of
the lentil filling. Place the uncovered pan in the oven and bake for 25 to
30 minutes, or until golden brown. Serve hot.

Spiced Turkey and Mushroom Lettuce Wraps

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 3

Typical wheat flour wraps are made with ultra-refined white flour, which
can contribute to big swings in glucose levels. Using lettuce leaves in place
of wheat wraps is an easy Good Energy swap to reduce processed food
intake. The ground turkey in this recipe provides about 40 grams of protein
per serving, making this a satiating dinner.
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
¼ teaspoon ground cumin
¼ teaspoon ground cinnamon
¼ teaspoon ground allspice
¼ teaspoon crushed red pepper flakes
1 medium red onion, diced
3 garlic cloves, minced
1 teaspoon freshly grated ginger
3 cups cremini mushrooms, coarsely chopped into ¼-inch pieces
¾ teaspoon sea salt, plus more to taste
Freshly ground black pepper
1 medium tomato, finely chopped
1 pound ground turkey
1 tablespoon plain whole-milk yogurt
½ cup chopped fresh cilantro, plus more for garnish
¼ cup chopped fresh mint
1 tablespoon red wine vinegar
1 head butter lettuce (about 5 ounces)
¼ cup crumbled feta cheese, for garnish

1. In a 10-inch cast-iron skillet, heat the olive oil over medium heat. Add
the cumin, cinnamon, allspice, and red pepper flakes and cook for about
15 seconds, or until fragrant but not burnt. Add ¾ cup of the onion
(reserve the rest for garnish), garlic, and ginger to the skillet. Cook,

stirring occasionally, for 2 to 3 minutes, or until the onion begins to
pick up color and soften.
2. Add the mushrooms and season with ¼ teaspoon salt and black pepper
to taste. Cook for 5 to 6 minutes, or until the mushrooms begin to
brown and become tender. Add the diced tomato and mix well.
3. Raise the heat to medium-high and add the turkey. Season with the
remaining ½ teaspoon salt or to taste. Cook for 6 to 8 minutes, or until
fully cooked, breaking up large lumps with a wooden spoon. Remove
from the heat.
4. Add the yogurt, cilantro, mint, and vinegar and mix until the yogurt has
fully dissolved into the pan juices. Serve with the butter lettuce leaves
for wrapping and the cilantro, reserved red onion, and feta for garnish.

Tofu Masala with Toasted Cashews and Cucumber-Mint Raita

Gluten-Free
Time: 1 hour
SERVINGS: 2 TO 3

Reducing oxidative stress is a key factor for Good Energy, and including
spices like cumin and turmeric provides significant antioxidant power to
this recipe.
Cucumber-Mint Raita
½ cup plain whole-milk yogurt
½ cup grated cucumber and juices
¼ teaspoon sea salt
⅛ teaspoon ground cumin
2 tablespoons chopped fresh mint
2 teaspoons freshly squeezed lemon juice

Turmeric Tofu
1 tablespoon unrefined coconut oil
1 (14-ounce) package extra-firm tofu, drained, cubed, and patted dry
Freshly ground black pepper, to taste
¼ teaspoon ground turmeric
¼ teaspoon salt, or to taste

Masala Sauce
1 tablespoon grass-fed butter
½ teaspoon ground cumin
½ teaspoon ground coriander
1 teaspoon sea salt
Freshly ground black pepper
1 large yellow onion, sliced
1 teaspoon freshly grated ginger
3 garlic cloves, minced
1 serrano chili, sliced
1 (14.5-ounce) can diced tomatoes
½ cup canned full-fat coconut milk
½ teaspoon garam masala

¼ cup raw cashews
Simple Cauliflower Rice
Cilantro, for garnish

1. Make the cucumber-mint raita: In a small mixing bowl, whisk
together the yogurt, grated cucumber, salt, cumin, mint, and lemon
juice. Taste and adjust the seasoning if necessary. Cover and refrigerate
until ready to serve.
2. Prepare the turmeric tofu: In a wide sauté pan over medium-high
heat, heat the coconut oil. Add the tofu and lightly fry for 4 to 5
minutes, or until golden on all sides. Season with pepper, turmeric, and
salt. Remove the tofu to a plate and set aside.
3. Make the sauce: In the same wide sauté pan, melt the butter over
medium heat. Add the cumin, coriander, salt, and pepper to taste and
cook for 15 to 30 seconds, or until fragrant but not burnt. Add the
onion, ginger, garlic, and serrano chili and cook for 8 to 10 minutes, or
until the onion mixture is tender and golden brown. Remove from the
heat and allow to cool.
4. Add the onion mixture to a high-speed blender with the diced tomatoes,
coconut milk, and garam masala. Blend until smooth.
5. Return the sauce to the sauté pan. Cook the sauce for 4 to 5 minutes
over medium heat, or until bubbling and fragrant. Taste and adjust the
seasonings if necessary. Add the tofu and simmer for 3 to 4 minutes, or
until the tofu is coated and flavorful and the sauce is slightly thickened.
6. In a small skillet over medium-low heat, toast the cashews, tossing
frequently for even color, for 3 to 4 minutes, or until golden.
7. Serve with Simple Cauliflower Rice, raita, toasted cashews, and
cilantro for garnish.

Hearts of Palm “Crab Cakes” with Rainbow Slaw

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 1 hour
SERVINGS: 4 (2 CAKES PER SERVING)

These “crab cakes’’ made with hearts of palm are an affordable alternative
to traditional crab cakes. The combination of hearts of palm, chickpea flour,
and aromatics provides 15 grams of protein and 10 grams of fiber per
serving, with no refined carbohydrates.
Rainbow Slaw
1 large carrot
1 medium beet
1 Granny Smith apple
½ medium red onion, thinly sliced
Juice of ½ lemon
Sea salt

Yogurt-Caper Dipping Sauce
1 cup plain whole-milk Greek yogurt
2 tablespoons sauerkraut
1 tablespoon capers, coarsely chopped
1 tablespoon Dijon mustard
Juice of ½ lemon
Sea salt, as needed

Hearts of Palm “Crab Cakes”
2 (14-ounce) cans hearts of palm, drained, rinsed, and finely chopped
1 cup chickpea flour
2 large eggs, beaten
1 rib celery, finely diced
½ red bell pepper, ribs and seeds removed and diced
½ medium red onion, finely diced
¼ cup fresh flat-leaf parsley, finely chopped
2 tablespoons ground flaxseeds
1 teaspoon Old Bay Seasoning

½ teaspoon garlic powder
¼ teaspoon coarse sea salt
Unrefined coconut oil, for frying

1. Make the slaw: Cut the carrot, beet, and apple into matchsticks with a
spiralizer, by grating on the large holes of a box grater, or with a sharp
knife. In a medium bowl, mix the shredded vegetables and onion with
the lemon juice and season with salt to taste. Refrigerate until ready to
use.
2. Make the dipping sauce: In a medium bowl, mix the yogurt,
sauerkraut, capers, mustard, and lemon juice. If needed, season with
salt. Refrigerate until ready to use.
3. Make the “crab cakes”: In a large bowl, combine the hearts of palm,
chickpea flour, eggs, celery, bell pepper, onion, parsley, flaxseeds, Old
Bay Seasoning, garlic powder, and salt.
4. In a large skillet, heat a small amount of coconut oil over medium heat.
Working in batches, drop the batter into the skillet forming medium
patties (8 total), and cook for 3 to 4 minutes on each side, or until
golden brown and crispy.
5. Serve hot with the rainbow slaw and dipping sauce.

Cheesy Cauliflower Rice Bowl

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free
Time: 40 minutes
SERVINGS: 4

The “cheesy” sauce gets its flavor from gut-friendly fermented miso and
nutritional yeast. Nutritional yeast is a yeast fungus (similar to what you
would use for bread or beer making) that has been “deactivated” by heat. It
is often used to add depth of flavor and umami to plant-based dishes, and it
is a good source of several B vitamins and protein. Use the sauce in this
recipe, mixed with your favorite hot sauce as a spicy dip, or as a cheese
sauce for a lentil or vegetable pasta.
1 (15-ounce) can black beans, drained and rinsed
2 medium tomatoes, diced
½ cup diced red onion
½ cup chopped fresh cilantro, plus more for garnish
Juice of 1 lime
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

“Cheesy” Sauce
2 cups chopped cauliflower, florets and stems, fresh or frozen
1 medium carrot, chopped
½ small yellow onion, chopped
½ cup canned full-fat coconut milk
¼ cup nutritional yeast
1 teaspoon Dijon mustard
1 teaspoon apple cider vinegar
¾ teaspoon sea salt
½ teaspoon red miso
Simple Cauliflower Rice)
1 ripe but firm Hass avocado, halved, pitted, peeled, and sliced
¼ cup chopped or sliced almonds

1. In a large bowl, mix the black beans, tomatoes, red onion, cilantro, and
lime juice. Generously season with salt and pepper. Set aside.

2. Make the “cheesy” sauce: Fill a wide pot with 2 inches of water. Set a
steamer basket in the pot, then bring the water to a simmer over
medium-high heat. Add the cauliflower, carrot, and onion to the basket
and cover. Steam for 10 to 12 minutes, or until very tender when
pierced with a fork.
3. Drain the vegetables and add to the bowl of a food processor or a
blender. Add the coconut milk, nutritional yeast, mustard, vinegar, salt,
and miso and blend until smooth.
4. To serve, toss the cauliflower rice with the black bean mixture and
divide equally among four bowls. Top with sliced avocado, almonds,
and a drizzle of “cheesy” sauce.

Pesto Zucchini Noodles with Walnut Gremolata

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 35 minutes
SERVINGS: 4

Zucchini noodles stand in for traditional semolina-based pasta in this recipe,
increasing the nutrient and fiber content of the dish while eliminating the
processed carbohydrates.
Zucchini Noodles
6 medium zucchini (about 3 pounds)
Sea salt

Walnut Gremolata
¼ cup finely chopped walnuts
¼ cup finely chopped sun-dried tomatoes
1 tablespoon chopped fresh basil
Zest of 1 lemon
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

Basil-Arugula Pesto
½ cup fresh basil, tightly packed
½ cup arugula
¼ cup chopped walnuts
¼ cup grated Parmesan cheese or nutritional yeast, plus more for serving
1 garlic clove
¼ cup extra-virgin olive oil
Juice of 1 lemon
½ teaspoon sea salt
¼ teaspoon freshly ground black pepper
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
1½ cups grape tomatoes, halved
2 cups arugula

1. Make the zucchini noodles: Using a spiralizer, cut the zucchini into
noodles. If you don’t have a spiralizer, you can use a vegetable peeler

to make thin ribbons instead. Place the zucchini noodles in a large
colander and season with salt. Set the zucchini aside for at least 10
minutes to release excess moisture.
2. Make the gremolata: In a small bowl, combine the walnuts, sun-dried
tomatoes, basil, and lemon zest. Season lightly with salt and pepper. Set
aside.
3. Make the pesto: In the bowl of a food processor, combine the basil,
arugula, walnuts, Parmesan, garlic, olive oil, lemon juice, salt, and
pepper. Pulse until the mixture is smooth. Set aside.
4. In a large skillet, heat the olive oil over medium-high heat. Add the
tomatoes and cook for 4 to 5 minutes, or until just blistering. Add the
zucchini noodles and arugula and cook, stirring occasionally, for 2 to 3
minutes, or until tender-crisp. Season with salt and pepper to taste.
Remove from the heat and toss the zucchini mixture with the pesto
until evenly coated.
5. To serve, divide the zucchini noodles among four plates. Top each plate
with a sprinkle of the gremolata and grated Parmesan.

Snacks/Sauces/Sides/Desserts

Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 30 minutes
SERVINGS: 4 TO 6

This puree is an easy swap for mashed potatoes, while packing many Good
Energy benefits. Sulforaphane compounds in cauliflower have been shown
to upregulate the Nrf2 pathway, a cellular defense system that helps protect
against oxidative stress and inflammation, making it a Good Energy
powerhouse recipe.
6 cups chopped cauliflower, florets and stems
2 cups chopped celery root
2 medium carrots, chopped
2 garlic cloves
¼ cup nutritional yeast
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
2 tablespoons hemp seeds
2 teaspoons freshly squeezed lemon juice
½ teaspoon sea salt
Freshly ground black pepper

1. Fill a wide pot with 2 inches of water. Set a steamer basket in the pot,
then bring the water to a simmer over medium-high heat. Add the
cauliflower, celery root, carrots, and garlic to the basket and cover.
Steam for 10 to 12 minutes, or until very tender.
2. Once cooled, drain the vegetables and add them to the bowl of a food
processor or a high-speed blender. Add the nutritional yeast, olive oil,
hemp seeds, lemon juice, salt, and pepper to taste. Blend until smooth
and creamy.
STORAGE: Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree can be prepared in
advance and stored in an airtight container in the refrigerator for up to 3
days.

Smoky Carrot-Harissa Dip

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 20 minutes
MAKES: 4 CUPS DIP

This dip uses toasted caraway and cumin seeds, which are among the foods
with the highest antioxidant levels. Pair this dip with protein- and omega-3rich Herbed Flax Crackers (this page) for a well-balanced snack plate.
2 pounds carrots, chopped
½ teaspoon caraway seeds
1 teaspoon cumin seeds
¼ cup harissa paste
1 teaspoon smoked paprika
2 garlic cloves
½ cup cashews
2 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil, plus more for drizzling
2 teaspoons red wine vinegar
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

1. Fill a wide pot with 2 inches of water. Set a steamer basket in the pot,
then bring the water to a simmer over medium-high heat. Add the
carrots to the basket and cover. Steam for about 10 minutes, or until
tender.
2. While the carrots steam, add the caraway and cumin seeds to a small
dry pan over medium heat. Toast, moving the spices frequently, for 2 to
3 minutes, or until fragrant. Using a mortar and pestle, a spice grinder,
or a clean coffee grinder, coarsely grind the caraway and cumin seeds.
3. In the bowl of a food processor or a high-speed blender, add the carrots,
cumin and caraway seeds, harissa paste, paprika, garlic, cashews, olive
oil, vinegar, salt, and pepper and blend until thoroughly combined.
Drizzle with olive oil and serve with Herbed Flax Crackers (this page)
and seasonal crudités.

Beet-Lupini Dip

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 25 minutes, plus up to 90 minutes for roasting
MAKES: 4 CUPS DIP

Lupini beans are typically available pickled and are linked to improved
blood sugar control because they have significant fiber and protein and zero
net carbohydrates (calculated by subtracting fiber from total carbohydrates).
Fermented sauerkraut supports a healthy gut microbiome and pairs well
with the prebiotic fiber found in lupini beans. Beets are a Good Energy
powerhouse, containing high levels of nitrate that can be converted to blood
vessel–dilating nitric oxide. Enjoy them in this dip with Herbed Flax
Crackers (this page) and seasonal vegetables.
2 large beets (about 1¼ pounds) or 16 ounces cooked
1 (15-ounce) can chickpeas, drained and rinsed
1 cup cooked lupini beans (like Brami brand), or additional chickpeas if lupini beans are
unavailable
½ cup tahini
4 garlic cloves
2 tablespoons extra-virgin olive oil, plus more for drizzling
½ cup beet sauerkraut, plus juices, or traditional sauerkraut
½ teaspoon ground cumin
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

1. If using cooked beets, skip to step 2. Preheat the oven to 400°F. Cover
the beets in foil and place on a small rimmed baking sheet. Roast for 60
to 90 minutes, or until the beets are tender and give little resistance
when pierced with a knife. Remove from the oven and allow to cool.
2. Once cooled, peel and coarsely chop the beets and add to the bowl of a
food processor. Add the chickpeas, lupini beans, tahini, garlic, olive oil,
sauerkraut, and cumin and blend until smooth. Season with salt and
pepper to taste. To serve, drizzle with olive oil and sprinkle with

additional ground pepper. Serve the dip with Herbed Flax Crackers
(this page) and seasonal crudités.
STORAGE: Store in an airtight container in the refrigerator for up to 7
days.

Cheesy Broccoli-Chive Biscuits

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 45 minutes
MAKES: 8 BISCUITS

A Good Energy biscuit with no refined carbohydrates! Similar to
cauliflower, broccoli is a potent source of isothiocyanates, powerful
compounds that activate key genes involved in Good Energy and combat
oxidative stress.
2½ cups broccoli rice, fresh or frozen*
3 tablespoons sliced chives
3 large eggs
⅔ cup shredded cheddar cheese or nutritional yeast
1½ cups almond flour
1 teaspoon baking powder
¼ teaspoon garlic powder
½ teaspoon sea salt
Freshly ground black pepper

1. Preheat the oven to 350°F. Line a rimmed baking sheet with parchment
paper.
2. In a large bowl, combine the broccoli rice, chives, eggs, and cheese.
3. In a separate bowl, mix the almond flour, baking powder, garlic
powder, salt, and pepper. Fold the dry ingredients into the wet
ingredients until thoroughly combined.
4. Using an ice cream scoop or large spoon, drop the biscuits in 8 even
portions. Bake for 30 to 35 minutes, or until the biscuit tops are golden.
*NOTE: If using frozen broccoli rice, bake for an additional 5 to 10
minutes.
STORAGE: Store in an airtight container in the refrigerator for up to 5
days.

Lemon-Dijon Dressing

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 5 minutes
MAKES: 1 CUP (EIGHT 2-TABLESPOON SERVINGS)

I like to shake up a jar of this dressing and use it throughout the week on
my Fennel and Apple Salad, Rainbow Salad, and others. Making your own
salad dressing is a great way to avoid hidden sugars and other additives in
store-bought versions.
2 tablespoons freshly squeezed lemon juice
2 tablespoons apple cider vinegar
2 tablespoons freshly squeezed orange juice
1 tablespoon Dijon mustard
1 tablespoon tamari
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper
½ cup extra-virgin olive oil

1. In a medium bowl, add the lemon juice, vinegar, orange juice, mustard,
tamari, and salt and pepper to taste.
2. While continuously whisking, drizzle in the olive oil and mix until the
dressing is emulsified. Alternatively, add all of the ingredients to a jar
with a tight-fitting lid and shake for 30 seconds, or until well combined.
STORAGE: Store in an airtight container in the refrigerator for up to 7
days.

Simple Cauliflower Rice

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 15 minutes
SERVINGS: 2 TO 4

Cauliflower rice is a fantastic low-carb, high-fiber base for a meal and has
over triple the fiber of white rice.
1 large head cauliflower, leaves removed
2 teaspoons extra-virgin olive oil
Sea salt

1. Coarsely chop the cauliflower florets and stems and place in the bowl
of a food processor. Pulse until the cauliflower pieces are
approximately the size of grains of rice.
2. In a medium saucepan with a lid, heat the olive oil over medium heat.
Add the cauliflower rice and salt to taste and mix well.
3. Cover, reduce the heat to low, and steam for 4 to 6 minutes, or until
tender-crisp. Serve immediately.

Black Bean Brownies

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 45 minutes, plus chilling overnight
SERVINGS: 12

Beneficial polyphenols in cocoa powder may support healthy insulin levels,
and fiber-rich black beans help to balance the sugar in the dates.
Sugar-free chocolate chips sweetened with monk fruit are an optional
addition that makes these brownies extra indulgent.
8 dates, pitted and coarsely chopped
¾ cup cocoa powder
1 (15-ounce) can black beans, drained and rinsed
½ cup canned full-fat coconut milk
2 tablespoons ground flaxseeds
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
1 teaspoon baking powder
1 tablespoon beet powder
¼ teaspoon sea salt
Unrefined coconut oil
½ cup sugar-free chocolate chips sweetened with monk fruit (optional)
Flaky Maldon salt

1. Preheat the oven to 350°F. If the dates are dry, soak them in hot water
for 10 to 15 minutes to soften.
2. In the bowl of a large food processor, add the dates and cocoa powder
and pulse until the dates are broken down. Add the black beans,
coconut milk, flaxseeds, vanilla, baking powder, beet powder, and salt.
Pulse the ingredients until a batter forms, taking time to scrape down
the sides of the bowl with a spatula.
3. Grease an 8 × 8-inch baking dish with coconut oil. If using the
chocolate chips, combine the batter and chips in a large mixing bowl.
Spread the batter evenly in the baking dish using a spatula.
4. Bake for 35 minutes. The brownies will be quite soft and spongy when
they first come out of the oven, but their consistency will transform to

dense and fudgy overnight. Sprinkle with the flaky salt. Chill overnight
in the refrigerator and serve the next day.
STORAGE: Store in an airtight container in the refrigerator for up to 5
days.

Mixed Berry Crumble with Toasted Pecans

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 55 minutes
SERVINGS: 8

This crumble topping is a combination of tiger nut flour, a high-fiber flour,
and high-antioxidant pecans, making it a great alternative to a traditional
crumble made with white flour.
6 cups frozen mixed berries, such as raspberries, blueberries, and strawberries
¾ cup tiger nut flour
½ cup chopped pecans
4 tablespoons (½ stick) cold grass-fed unsalted butter, cubed, or coconut oil
3 tablespoons maple syrup
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
¼ teaspoon sea salt
¼ teaspoon ground cinnamon

1. Preheat the oven to 350°F. Add the frozen berries to a 10-inch cast-iron
skillet or baking dish.
2. In a large mixing bowl, combine the tiger nut flour, pecans, butter,
syrup, vanilla, salt, and cinnamon. Using a fork, break up the pieces of
butter or oil until the consistency is sandy.
3. Spoon the topping mixture evenly over the berries and bake for 40 to
45 minutes, or until the top is golden brown and the berries are
bubbling.
4. Allow the crumble to cool slightly before serving.

Herbed Flax Crackers

Dairy-Free, Gluten-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 1 hour 30 minutes
MAKES: ABOUT 80 CRACKERS

Unlike traditional crackers, these Herbed Flax Crackers will leave you
feeling energized by stabilizing your blood sugar and giving you Good
Energy benefits of fiber, omega-3s, protein, and micronutrients! Flaxseeds
are packed with omega-3 fatty acids, which are anti-inflammatory and
promote cell membrane elasticity. I use oregano in this recipe, but feel free
to swap in your favorite dried herbs, such as rosemary, thyme, or sage.
2 cups whole flaxseeds, finely ground in a spice grinder or food processor
½ cup sesame seeds
¼ cup nutritional yeast
¼ cup whole psyllium husks
½ teaspoon garlic powder
1 teaspoon sea salt
1 teaspoon dried oregano

1. Preheat the oven to 325°F. In a large bowl, combine the ground
flaxseeds, sesame seeds, nutritional yeast, psyllium husks, garlic
powder, salt, and oregano. Add 1 cup water and stir until the mixture is
fully combined.
2. Prepare two sheets of parchment paper to fit either one large baking
sheet or two medium baking sheets. Place half of the dough on one of
the sheets of parchment and cover with an additional sheet. Using a
rolling pin, roll the batter to an even thickness, about ⅛ inch thick.
Repeat with the remaining half of the dough. Cut the crackers with a
knife to your desired size. If a more organic shape is preferred, the
crackers can be broken apart after cooking.
3. Bake for 1 hour 15 minutes, or until crisp and slightly darkened. The
crackers will continue to firm as they cool.

Lemon-Almond Cake with Jammy Strawberries

Gluten-Free, Soy-Free
Time: 45 minutes
SERVINGS: 12

Almond flour, a nutritious alternative to ultra-refined white flour found in
most cakes, is high in protein, healthy fats, and vital nutrients like vitamin E
and magnesium. The high-antioxidant strawberry topping leans on
strawberries’ natural sweetness instead of sugar.
4 tablespoons (½ stick) grass-fed unsalted butter, melted, plus more for preparing the cake
pan
2 cups blanched superfine almond flour
½ cup monk fruit sweetener, like Lakanto
1 teaspoon baking powder
½ teaspoon baking soda
¼ teaspoon salt
4 large eggs
1 teaspoon vanilla extract
Zest and juice of 2 lemons

Jammy Strawberries
3 cups strawberries, stemmed and quartered
Pinch of salt
½ teaspoon vanilla extract
½ teaspoon rose powder (optional)

1. Preheat the oven to 350°F. Line the bottom of a 9-inch springform pan
or cake pan with parchment paper. Grease the sides of the pan with
butter.
2. In a large bowl, whisk the almond flour, sweetener, baking powder,
baking soda, and salt. In a medium bowl, whisk the eggs, then add the
melted butter, vanilla, lemon zest, and lemon juice. Add the wet
mixture to the dry mixture and whisk until the cake batter is well
combined.

3. Pour the cake batter into the prepared pan. Bake on the center rack for
25 to 30 minutes, or until a toothpick or knife inserted in the center
comes out clean.
4. Meanwhile, make the jammy strawberries: In a medium saucepan,
add the strawberries, salt, vanilla, and ¼ cup water, and bring to a
simmer over medium-high heat. Cook for 15 to 18 minutes, or until the
strawberries are soft and the liquid has reduced to a syrupy consistency.
Remove from the heat and add the rose powder, if using.
5. Allow the cake to cool for about 25 minutes. Remove the cake from the
springform pan or flip it onto a serving plate. Serve slices with a
spoonful or two of jammy strawberries.
TIP: Use the cake batter for muffins! Simply bake in a lined muffin tin for
18 to 22 minutes, or until a toothpick inserted into the center of each muffin
comes out clean.

Baked Jicama Fries with Homemade Ketchup and Herbed Aioli

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 45 minutes
SERVINGS: 2 TO 4

Jicama is a root vegetable that’s high in inulin fiber, which is beneficial for
the gut microbiome diversity. With my homemade ketchup and herbed aioli,
you can enjoy all the flavor of your favorite condiments without any of the
hidden processed sugars or unhealthy seed oils found in store-bought
versions.
1 medium jicama (about 1½ pounds), peeled and cut into ¼-inch-thick fries
1 tablespoon extra-virgin olive oil
½ teaspoon sea salt
¼ teaspoon freshly ground black pepper

Herbed Aioli
1 large egg yolk
1 garlic clove, minced and mashed into a paste
1 teaspoon freshly squeezed lemon juice
1 teaspoon Dijon mustard
1 tablespoon finely chopped fresh flat-leaf parsley
¼ teaspoon sea salt
⅓ cup unrefined avocado oil

Ketchup
1 date, pitted
¼ cup tomato paste
1 tablespoon red wine vinegar
¼ teaspoon garlic powder
¼ teaspoon sea salt

1. Preheat the oven to 425°F. Fill a wide pot with 2 inches of water. Set a
steamer basket in the pot, then bring the water to a simmer over

medium-high heat. Add the jicama and steam for 8 to 10 minutes, or
until tender-crisp. Drain.
2. On a large rimmed baking sheet, toss the jicama with the olive oil, salt,
and pepper. Spread the jicama into a single layer. Bake for about 30
minutes, flipping halfway through, until the fries are golden brown and
crisp around the edges.
3. Make the herbed aioli: In a medium bowl, whisk together the egg
yolk, garlic paste, lemon juice, mustard, parsley, and salt. Whisking
continuously, slowly drizzle in the avocado oil until the mayonnaise
thickens and the oil is well incorporated.
4. Make the ketchup: Soak the date in hot water for 10 to 15 minutes to
soften, and then drain. In a small food processor, blend together the
tomato paste, ¼ cup water, vinegar, date, garlic powder, and salt.
5. Serve the fries hot out of the oven with the herbed aioli and ketchup.

Salt and Vinegar Golden Beet Chips

Gluten-Free, Dairy-Free, Soy-Free, Nut-Free
Time: 1 hour
SERVINGS: 6

These chips are a perfect substitute for potato chips. Beets are loaded with
folate, manganese, potassium, and fiber. Plus, baking them in extra-virgin
olive oil instead of frying them in vegetable oil reduces the chance of
inflammation and oxidative stress in the body.
3 or 4 medium-sized golden beets (about 1½ pounds), scrubbed or peeled
Extra-virgin olive oil
1 teaspoon apple cider vinegar
¼ teaspoon garlic powder
¼ teaspoon onion powder
Sea salt and freshly ground black pepper

1. Preheat the oven to 300°F. Slice the beets as thinly as possible, about
1/16 inch thick, using a mandoline or a sharp knife.
2. Lightly grease two rimmed baking sheets with olive oil, just enough to
prevent the beets from sticking while they bake. In a large bowl, toss
the beet slices with the vinegar, garlic powder, onion powder, and salt
and pepper to taste. Arrange the beet slices in a single layer on the
baking sheets.
3. Bake for 40 to 55 minutes, or until the beet chips are crispy and golden
brown. Remove from the oven and cool completely before serving.

Acknowledgments
We first want to thank Gayle Means, our beloved mother. We decided to
write this book in the days after she died, full of passion to carry forward
her example of Good Energy and emboldened to help others become
empowered to understand their health and how to avoid premature,
preventable deaths.
Thank you to our dad, Grady Means, for being our inspiration of how to
live the principles outlined in this book: exercising, writing, sailing,
bodysurfing, hiking, laughing, growing, gardening, learning, and practicing
gratitude at seventy-seven. You are our hero—thank you. This book would
not exist without Leslie, Calley’s wife and Casey’s best friend. Thank you
for being our tireless supporter, counselor, and therapist throughout this
process—and for being our model of Good Energy with the love and
constant growth trajectory you exhibit every day. Leslie also gave birth
during the writing process to Roark, who inspires us with his joy and awe
for the world that we should all aspire to. Thank you to Casey’s incredible
partner, Brian, who has been her rock over the past year and brings nonstop
Good Energy into her life.
Thank you to our agent, Richard Pine, for believing in us and for
foundational advice in molding this book, and to Eliza Rothstein for
support. Thank you to Lucia Watson for being a model for us of what a
talented and collaborative editor is.
We wrote this book while launching startups tied to the mission of
metabolic health—and couldn’t have done this without the support of our
cofounders and teams. For Casey at Levels: Sam Corcos, Josh Clemente,
and the tireless team who amplify the message of metabolic health daily
(Mike H., Jackie, Tony, Tom, Mike D., Support, Growth, Product,

Engineering, R&D, Athena, and everyone else who has been part of the
journey—the world is metabolically healthier because of you). For Calley at
TrueMed: Justin Mares and team.
Thank you to our friends who read the book and provided invaluable
feedback and support, including Carrie Denning, Fiona O’Donnell
McCarthy, Steph Bell, Emily Azer, Ann Voorhees, and Nick Alexander.
Thank you to Sonja Manning for your friendship and support on so many
aspects of the book. Thank you to Kimber Crowe and Sally Nicholson for
giving early book feedback and a lifetime of love and support. Thank you to
Dhru Purohit for your continual support and inspiration to us in navigating
business, health, writing, and life.
This book would not have been possible without forward-thinking
medical leaders who inspired us to devote our lives to this cause—
particularly Drs. Mark Hyman, Robert Lustig, David Perlmutter, Sara
Gottfried, Dom D’Agostino, Terry Wahls, Ben Bikman, Molly Maloof, and
David Sinclair.
We so admire the work of the countless health, nutrition, biohacking,
and regenerative farming pioneers who have forged their own path, deeply
inspired us, and created meaningful content with us, including Drs. Rick
Johnson, Will Cole, Tyna Moore, Austin Perlmutter, Gabrielle Lyon, Steve
Gundry, Chris Palmer, Howard Luks, Kevin Jubbal, Philip Ovadia, Ken
Berry, David Cistola, and Bret Scher, as well as Jeff Krasno, Shawn
Stevenson, Kayla Barnes, Chase Chewning, Louisa Nicola, Kelly LeVeque,
Mona Sharma, Jason and Colleen Wachob, Jillian Michaels, Dave Asprey,
Carrie Jones, Kara Fitzgerald, Kimberly Snyder (and Jon Bier), Ben
Greenfield, Ronit Menashe, Vida Delrahim, Kristen Holmes, Nora LaTorre,
Courtney Swan, Sarah Villafranco, Michael Brandt, Mariza Snyder, Molly
Chester, Will Harris, Lewis Howes, Max Lugavere, Tom Bilyeu, Liz
Moody, and so many other heroes in the media, podcasting, food, wellness,
health, and entrepreneurial spaces working to create a better world. You’ve
all helped us spread the message of foundational health over the last several
years and we are inordinately grateful to you.

Thank you to Amely Greeven for early help on the book, Ashley
Lonsdale for collaborating with us on delicious recipes, Jen Chesak for
copyediting, and Monica Nelson, Nina Bautista, Vika Miller, Sabrina Horn,
Robbie Crabtree, and Ezzie Spencer for various forms of life-changing
personal coaching and support during the writing and publishing process.
And most importantly, thank you to the readers who are on a mission
(like we are) to be empowered in their health. We can’t think of a more
important journey than to reach our limitless potential and maximal Good
Energy in life.

Index
The page numbers in this index refer to the printed version of the book.
Each link will take you to the beginning of the corresponding print page.
You may need to scroll forward from that location to find the corresponding
reference on your e-reader.
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X
Y Z

A
A1c test. See hemoglobin A1c (HbA1c)
accountability and support, 281–82
acne, 33
activity trackers, 107–8
acute vs. chronic medical issues, 61–64
addiction
alcohol, 172
opioid crisis, 64, 115
ultra-processed foods, 16, 115–16, 129–31
additives and food dyes, 176–77
adenosine triphosphate (ATP), 10–13, 39, 128, 214, 218
adverse childhood experiences (ACEs), 246–47
Affordable Care Act (ACA), 64–65
alanine transaminase (ALT), 93–95
alcohol consumption, 81, 105, 171–72
alpha-linolenic acid (ALA), 133–34, 158
Alzheimer’s disease, 49–50

amino acids, 168
animals
hibernation preparations, 128
lack of chronic disease in, xi, 211
regeneratively raised, 145
antibiotics, 46–47
antioxidants, 17, 120–21, 124–25, 155–62
aromatherapy, 253
arthritis, 52–53
aspartate transaminase (AST), 93–95
Atomic Habits (Clear), 295–96
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), 45
autism, 45
autoimmune conditions
cell danger response (CDR), 39
increasing rate of, 40
and metabolic disorders, 39–40
awe and gratitude, focusing on, 254

B
Bad Energy
at the cellular level, xiii, 244
effects of, xiii, 178
ingredients to eliminate from your diet, 170–75
Bikman, Benjamin, 42
bio-observability, 77–78, 111–13
bisphenol A (BPA), 229–30
blood pressure. See high blood pressure
blood sugar levels
average glucose, 105
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
dawn effect, 102–3
elevated, 20–21
fasting glucose measurement, 83–84
glycation, 21
impact of exercise on glucose, 104, 215, 222–23
and influenza, 53–54

oral glucose tolerance test (OGTT), 75–76
post-meal glucose (postprandial glucose), 103
reactive hypoglycemia, 103–4, 128–29
and sleep, 104–5, 196–97
strategies for stabilizing, 177–83
and stress, 35, 104, 245–46
using vinegar and cinnamon to lower, 181–82
blood tests. See also lab results
additional recommended tests, 88–95, 269
advanced biomarker testing, 96
analyzing a standard blood test, 79–80, 268
aspartate transaminase (AST), alanine transaminase (ALT), and
gamma-glutamyl transferase (GGT) tests, 93–95
fasting glucose, 83–84
fasting insulin test and HOMA-IR calculation, 88–90
hemoglobin A1c (HbA1c), 92, 225
high-density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol, 82–83
high-sensitivity CRP (hsCRP), 91
Total Cholesterol and low-density lipoprotein cholesterol (LDL-C)
levels, 96–99

triglycerides, 80–82
uric acid, 92–93
vitamin D, 95
The Blue Zones (Buettner), 213
the brain
neuronal function, 35
neurotransmitter production, 34–35
suprachiasmatic nucleus (SCN), 189–90, 200
breastfeeding, 31
breathwork, 249
British Journal of Nutrition, 180
brown fat, 224–26
Buettner, Dan, 213
butyrate, 132–33
B vitamins, 156, 158

C
cancer, 66–67
carbohydrates
pairing with other foods, 179
refined, 97–98, 173
cardiovascular health
atherosclerosis, 82
cardiovascular trackers, 108
Framingham Heart Study, 50
heart disease, 50–51
heart rate variability (HRV), 109–10, 249
high blood pressure, 50–51, 84–85, 223
resting heart rate, 110–11
and triglyceride-to-HDL ratio, 87
case studies
Emily (continuous glucose monitor), 75–76
Lucy (health issues caused by Bad Energy), 27–29
Sarah (intractable migraine), 4–8

Sophia (nasal and sinus problems), xv–xvi, 7
Cell (journal), 129–30, 192
Cell Metabolism (journal), 225–26
cellular biology
AMPK, 214–15
cell danger response (CDR), 39
cell membranes, 119–20
cell signaling, 12, 20
cell transportation, 12–13
cell waste cleanup and autophagy, 13
DNA replication, 11–12
electron transport chain (ETC), 156
free radicals, 15–16, 22, 192
homeostasis, 13
mitochondria, 10–22, 34–35, 39, 107, 128, 135–36, 192, 214–
15, 218, 224, 245
protein synthesis, 11
requirements for optimal cell functioning, 11–13
underpowered cells, 10
Chapman, Diana, 255

children’s health issues
conditions caused by metabolic dysfunction, 46–48
mental health disorders, 45–46
nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD), 44–45
obesity, 44
and sleep deprivation, 197–98, 199–200
chloroplasts, 126, 135
cholesterol. See high-density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol; low-density
lipoprotein (LDL) cholesterol
chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), 51
chronic vs. acute medical issues, 61–64
chronobiology, 187, 204
cigarette smoke and vaping chemicals, 18
cinnamon, 182
circadian disruption and artificial light, 19, 186–88, 199–200, 200–201,
205–8, 299
Circulation (journal), 87
Clear, James, 295–96
Clemente, Josh, 99
cognitive diseases

Alzheimer’s disease, 49–50
dementia, 49–50
cold exposure, 224–27, 299
comorbidities, 54–55
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
CoQ10, 16, 156–57, 159
Corcos, Sam, 77
cortisol, 17, 197
COVID-19, 53–54, 109, 219–20
creatine, 160
The Creative Act (Rubin), 254
curcumin, 120

D
death
author’s feelings about, 240–43, 258–60
fear of, 240
dehydration, 141–42
dementia, 49–50
depression
author’s experiences with, 34–36
and irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), 34
pathophysiology of, 34–35
diabetes
causes of type 2 diabetes, 21
gestational diabetes, 42, 75–76
hemoglobin A1c (HbA1c), 92, 225
six stages of diabesity, 84
Diabetes Care (journal), 75–76, 181
diet. See also food; nutrition; recipes
chronic overnutrition, 15–16, 101, 132

conflicting opinions about popular diets, 131–32
elimination diets, 4–5
fasting, 202–3
fermented foods, 166–68
food journaling, 105–6, 206, 278–79
Good Energy baseline quiz, 272–73
Good Energy dietary plan, 155–70, 283–93
impact on mitochondria, 14–17, 19–22
ketogenic, 133
late-night meals or alcohol, 105
as a leading cause of illness, 67–70, 118–19
liquid calories, 171–72, 180
micronutrients, 16, 124–25, 133–34, 155–60
mindful eating, 134–37, 182–83, 298
purchasing organic food, 154–55
and sleep, 193–94
strategies for stabilizing blood sugar, 177–83
time-restricted feeding (TRF), 180, 202–3
variable reward concept, 130
dioxins, 231

docosahexaenoic acid (DHA), 133–34
Dölen, Gül, 257
drugs
impact on mitochondria, 17–18
psilocybin-assisted therapy, 256–58
dysbiosis (microbiome imbalance), 17

E
The Economist (newspaper), 257
ectopic fat, 86
eicosapentaenoic acid (EPA), 133–34
electron transport chain (ETC), 156
elimination diets, 4–5
Emily (continuous glucose monitor) case study, 75–76
The End of Craving (Schatzker), 130
environmental issues
artificial light and circadian disruption, 19, 186–88, 199–200, 200–
201, 205–8, 299
benefits of some environmental discomfort, 210–11, 223–27
committing to additional Good Energy habits, 300–301
focusing on awe and gratitude, 254
Good Energy baseline quiz, 276–78
impact on mitochondria, 14–19, 21–22
regeneratively grown food, 144–46
spending time in nature, 251–52, 301

thermoneutrality, 19, 224
toxins and pollutants, 18–19, 227–34, 300–301
erectile dysfunction (ED), 42, 50–51
exercise. See also movement
encouraging more, 218–20
high intensity interval training (HIIT), 221
impact on glucose, 104, 215, 222–23
impact on mitochondria, 17, 107, 214–15
impact on the basic biomarkers of metabolism, 222–23
to minimize joint pain, 52
recommendations, 220–22, 234–35
resistance training, 221–22, 296
using an activity tracker, 107–8
walking, 182, 219, 296
zone 2 aerobic training, 221

F
farming practices, 143–46
fat cells
body fat types, 85–86
brown fat, 224–26
in children born with macrosomia, 30
Fat Chance (Lustig), 164
fatigue, chronic, 43–44
fats
breakdown of, 19
within cells, 20
omega-3, 117, 119–20, 133–34, 162–64, 173, 285
omega-6, 117, 119–20, 162–63, 173
fermented foods, 166–68
fertility. See infertility; sexual health
fiber, 164–66, 181, 284–85
financial issues
billing codes, 66

cost of medical issues from unhealthy eating, 153–54
food industry spending, 68–69
pharmaceutical industry incentives, 64, 70
related to the Affordable Care Act (ACA), 64–65
relative values units (RVUs), 65–66
Flexner Report, 63–64
Fogg, BJ, 294
food. See also diet; nutrition; recipes
additives and food dyes, 176–77
as the basis for cell functionality, 122–23
beans and lentils, 165–66
conventionally grown food, 143–44
cookbook recommendations, 293
cravings, 126–27
food choices and the messages they send, 125–26
food industry spending, 68–69
Good Energy baseline quiz, 269–71, 272–73
Good Energy meal components, 289–91
meal times, 179–80, 201–3, 206, 298
mindful eating, 134–37, 182–83

molecular makeups of various foods, 117–18
monocropping, 143
organically grown food, 144, 154–55, 286
packaged food recommendations, 287–88
preparing simple Good Energy meals at home, 288–93
processed culinary ingredients, 147–48
regeneratively grown food, 144–46
synthetic and processed, 68–69, 142, 148
ultra-processed, 16, 115–16, 123–24, 129–31, 142, 146–47, 148–
54, 160, 176–77
unprocessed and minimally processed, 147
yogurt, 153
Forever Strong (Lyon), 169
Framingham Heart Study, 50
free radicals, 15–16, 22, 192
Frontiers in Psychology (journal), 255
fructose, 127–28, 170–71

G
gamma-glutamyl transferase (GGT), 93–95
gender-based issues
erectile dysfunction (ED), 42, 50–51
male factor infertility, 41–42
menstrual cycles and insulin resistance, 124
polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), xiii, 40–41
glucose
average glucose, 105
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
dawn effect, 102–3
fasting glucose measurement, 83–84
impact of exercise on, 104, 215, 222–23
impact of stress on, 35, 104, 245–46
insulin resistance, 20–21, 30, 33, 38, 83–84, 86–87, 88–90
oral glucose tolerance test (OGTT), 75–76
post-meal glucose (postprandial glucose), 103
reactive hypoglycemia, 103–4, 128–29

and sleep, 104–5, 196–97
strategies for stabilizing blood sugar, 177–83
using vinegar and cinnamon to lower glucose levels, 181–82
glycation, 21
Godwin, Gail, 259
Good Energy
baseline quiz, 269–78
committing to additional good habits, 293, 296–303
dietary plan, 155–70, 283–93
four-week plan, 264–303
goal of, 263–65
impact on physiological function, xi–xii, xix, 24–25
meal components, 289–91
measuring, 22–23
preparing simple Good Energy meals at home, 288–93
recipes, 307–63
Gottfried, Sara, 42
grains
alternatives to, 175–76
benefits and risks of, 142

refined, 173–75, 283
ultra-processed, 174–75
gratitude and awe, focusing on, 254
gut health
dysbiosis (microbiome imbalance), 17
gut-brain axis, 34, 165
gut lining, 136
and insulin resistance, 33
irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), 32–33, 34
“leaky gut,” 164
postbiotics, 167
probiotics, 166–67, 285
and sleep deprivation, 193

H
habits
committing to additional good habits, 293, 296–303
the habit loop, 295–96
habit stacking, 295
hierarchy of competence, 265–66, 301–3
tiny habits, 294–95
Hall, Kevin, 129–30
Halsted, William Stewart, 63–64
Hari, Johann, 238–39, 256
healing
feeling safe, 247
first steps, 247–48
proven strategies, 248–58
health trends, x, 24–25
hearing loss, 38
heart health. See cardiovascular health
heat exposure, 226–27, 299

heavy metals, 233
hemoglobin A1c (HbA1c), 92, 225
hierarchy of competence, 265–66, 301–3
high blood pressure, 50–51, 84–85, 223
high-density lipoprotein (HDL) cholesterol, 82–83, 223
high-sensitivity CRP (hsCRP), 91
HOMA-IR calculation, 88–90
homeostasis, 13
hormones
cortisol, 17, 197
impact of artificial light on, 200
satiety, 130
vasopressin, 141–42
Huberman, Andrew, 214, 227
hydration, 141–42
Hyman, Mark, 84, 87, 98, 145
hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal (HPA) axis, 35

I
immune cells
cytokines, 244
and omega-3 and omega-6 fats, 162–63
transportation of, 12–13
infertility. See also sexual health
assisted reproductive technology (ART), 41
CoQ10’s role in fertility, 156–57
male factor, 41–42
polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), xiii, 40–41
in vitro fertilization (IVF), 41
inflammation
arthritis and musculoskeletal pain, 52
as the cause of many diseases and conditions, 8–10
in children born with macrosomia, 30
chronic, 6–9, 22, 162–63, 192–93, 244
curcumin, 120–21
and depression, 35

exercise’s impact on, 215
high-sensitivity CRP (hsCRP), 91
medications and surgery to reduce, 7
and sinusitis, 36–37
influenza, 53–54
insulin
blood sugar regulation, 12, 19
fasting insulin test and HOMA-IR calculation, 88–90
insulin resistance, 20–21, 30, 33, 38, 83–84, 86–87, 88–90
insulin signaling process, 20–21
light exposure and insulin sensitivity, 190–91
interconnectivity of diseases, 29
International Journal of Obesity, 200
irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), 32–33, 34
isothiocyanates, 120, 323, 352

J
Johnson, Richard, 141–42
journaling, food, 105–6, 206, 278–79
Journal of Clinical Sleep Medicine, 199–200
Journal of the American Medical Association (JAMA), 37, 108, 194

L
lab results. See also blood tests
additional recommended tests, 88–95, 269
analyzing a standard blood test, 79–80
bio-observability, 77–78, 111–13
compared to symptoms, 78–79
recommended ranges for key blood tests, 111–12, 268
typical comments from doctors, 77, 269
The Lancet (journal), 49, 83, 89
L-carnitine, 159
life expectancy, 62, 71
lifestyles
chronic stress, 17
impact on mitochondria, 14–22, 224
as a leading cause of illness, 67–70
recommendations, 234–36
sedentary, 17
sleep deprivation, 18

light
artificial light and circadian disruption, 19, 186–88, 199–200, 200–
201, 205–8, 299
committing to additional Good Energy habits, 298–99
Good Energy baseline quiz, 273
light exposure and insulin sensitivity, 190–91
sunlight, 188–91, 207–8, 298
as a way of synchronizing the body’s cells, 189–90
the liver
aspartate transaminase (AST), alanine transaminase (ALT), and
gamma-glutamyl transferase (GGT) tests, 93–95
liver failure and transplants, 45
nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD), 44–45, 94
loneliness, 255–56
low-density lipoprotein (LDL) cholesterol, 82, 96–99
Lucy (health issues caused by Bad Energy) case study, 27–29
Luks, Howard, 52
Lustig, Robert, 84, 87, 96–99, 164, 170, 228
Lyon, Gabrielle, 169, 222

M
macrosomia, 30
“magic mushrooms,” 256–58
magnesium, 157
manganese, 159
Means, Casey
birth and childhood health, 30–32
blood test results, 81
feelings about death and spirituality, 240–43, 257–60
Good Energy habits, 266–67, 281–82
health changes as a new doctor, 32–36
mindful eating reflections, 135–37
mother’s health battles, ix–x, 55–56, 57–59, 61–62, 242–43, 259
psilocybin experiences, 257–58
residency experiences, 3–4, 185–86
retirement from traditional medicine, xvi–xvii, 8–9
standing desks campaign, 209–10
medical advice

acute vs. chronic issues, 61–64
author’s mother’s experiences defying, 57–59
due to financial pressures, 59–61
medications and their impact on mitochondria, 17–18
meditation, 249–51, 297
melatonin, 200–01
menstrual cycles and insulin resistance, 124
mental health issues
attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD), 45
autism, 45
in children, 45–46
committing to additional Good Energy habits, 297
depression, 34–36
fear, 237–39
Good Energy baseline quiz, 275–76
gut-brain axis, 34, 165
neurotransmitter production, 34–35
statistics, 238
suicidal ideation, 35–36, 45
sunlight and mood, 191

therapy, counseling, and coaching, 248–49
Metabolical (Lustig), 96–99
metabolic health
and COVID-19, 53–54
effective, xii
and environmental conditions, xii–xiii
metabolic dysfunction, xiii–xiv, xviii, 21–22, 46–48
metabolic inflexibility, 203
metabolic syndrome, 23
metals, heavy, 233
microbiome, gut
dysbiosis, 17
food’s impact on, 121–22
sleep’s impact on, 193
micronutrients, 16, 124–25, 133–34, 155–60
migraine, 37–38
mindfulness meditation, 249–51, 297
Minor, Lloyd B., 3–4
mitochondria
adenosine triphosphate (ATP), 10–13, 39, 128, 214, 218

exercise’s impact on, 17, 107, 214–15
impact of modern diets and lifestyles on, 14–22, 224
maternal lineage of, 135–36
mitochondrial dysfunction, 14–15, 21–22, 34–35, 192, 245
mitophagy, 13, 214–15
role in energy production, 10
mood. See mental health issues
movement. See also exercise
committing to additional Good Energy habits, 296–97
and outcomes for COVID-19, 219–20
Good Energy baseline quiz, 274
movement-based mindfulness practices, 251
as a natural part of life, 213
non-exercise activity thermogenesis (NEAT), 217–18
recommendations, 220–22, 234–35
research, 216–17
muscle, building, 222
muscle contractions
AMPK activation, 214–15
anti-inflammatory role of, 215

clearing glucose from the blood, 215

N
nature, spending time in, 251–52, 301
Nature Wants Us to Be Fat (Johnson), 141–42
niacin (vitamin B₃), 156, 158
nitric oxide, 85, 226
nonalcoholic fatty liver disease (NAFLD), 44–45, 94
Nutrients (journal), 51
nutrition. See also diet; food; recipes
butyrate, 132–33
chronic overnutrition, 15–16, 101, 132
coenzyme Q10 (CoQ10), 16, 156–57, 159
conflicting or biased research, 139–40
curcumin, 120–21
fiber, 164–66, 181, 284–85
general guidelines, 140–42
grains, 142, 173–76, 283
isothiocyanates, 120
lower nutrition content of today’s foods, 123

micronutrients, 16, 124–25, 133–34, 155–60
nutrient deficiencies, 16
nutritional interventions, 118
polyphenols, 160
protein, 168–70, 286

O
obesity
and artificial light, 200
in children, 44
and dehydration, 141–42
obesogens, 212, 228
and obstructive sleep apnea (OSA), 194
statistics, 212
oils, refined industrial vegetable and seed, 172–73, 283–84
older adults
Alzheimer’s disease, 49–50
arthritis, 52–53
chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), 51
dementia, 49–50
heart disease, 50–51
stroke, 48–49
The Old Woman (Godwin), 259
omega-3 fats, 117, 119–20, 133–34, 162–64, 173, 285

omega-6 fats, 117, 119–20, 162–63, 173
opioid crisis, 64, 115
organophosphate pesticides, 232–33
osteoarthritis, 52–53
Ostrom, Scott, 257
oxidative stress, 22, 42, 93–94, 120, 192, 244–45

P
pain, chronic, 36, 64
parabens, 230
parasympathetic nervous system (PSNS), 249
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), 232
pesticides, 232–33
pharmaceutical industry
financial incentives, 64, 70
lobbying activities, 65
phthalates, 230
Pizzo, Philip, 64
plastics, 233
pollutants. See toxins and pollutants
polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs), 231–32
polycystic ovary syndrome (PCOS), xiii, 40–41
polyphenols, 160
pregnancy
gestational diabetes, 42, 75–76

macrosomia, 30
oral glucose tolerance test (OGTT), 75–76
placental dysfunction (PD), 42–43
protein, 168–70, 286
psilocybin-assisted therapy, 256–58
Purohit, Dhru, 234

R
real-time tools for addressing dysfunction
activity data, 107–8
cardiovascular trackers, 108
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
food journaling, 105–6, 206, 278–79
heart rate variability (HRV), 109–10, 249
metrics to track, 112–13
resting heart rate, 110–11
sleep data, 106–07
recipes, 307–63
breakfast
Chia or Basil Seed Pudding 3 Ways, 314–15
Good Energy Milk, 311
Maca Smoothie, 2 Ways, 310
Sardine-Scallion Fritters with Tzatziki, 318–19
Spiced Almond Flour Pancakes with Stewed Apples, 316–17
Spinach-Chickpea Wraps with Creamy Scrambled Eggs and Spicy
Mushrooms, 312–13
Strawberry Chia Smoothie, 309

Summer Bounty Frittata with Simple Mixed Greens, 307–08
dinner
Cheesy Cauliflower Rice Bowl, 342–43
Hearts of Palm “Crab Cakes” with Rainbow Slaw, 340–41
Mushroom and Creamy Cauliflower Bake, 334–35
Pesto Zucchini Noodles with Walnut Gremolata, 344–45
Pork and Cauliflower Fried Rice, 331–32
Seared Wild Salmon with Chive Salsa and Creamy Cauliflower and
Celery Root Puree, 333
Spiced Turkey and Mushroom Lettuce Wraps, 336–37
Tofu Masala with Toasted Cashews and Cucumber-Mint Raita, 338–
39
lunch
Cauliflower Rice Hand Rolls, 327–28
Classic Chicken and Celery Salad Wraps, 329–30
Curried Roasted Vegetables with Coconut Flour Flatbread, 325–26
Fennel and Apple Salad with Lemon-Dijon Dressing and Smoked
Salmon, 321–22
Rainbow Salad with Lemon-Dijon Dressing and Soft-Boiled Eggs,
323–24
snacks/sauces/sides/desserts
Baked Jicama Fries with Homemade Ketchup and Herbed Aioli,
361–62
Beet-Lupini Dip, 350–51
Black Bean Brownies, 355–56

Cheesy Broccoli-Chive Biscuits, 352
Creamy Cauliflower and Celery Root Puree, 347–48
Herbed Flax Crackers, 358
Lemon-Almond Cake with Jammy Strawberries, 359–60
Lemon-Dijon Dressing, 353
Mixed Berry Crumble with Toasted Pecans, 357
Salt and Vinegar Golden Beet Chips, 363
Simple Cauliflower Rice, 354
Smoky Carrot-Harissa Dip, 349
relative values units (RVUs), 65–66
resources
book recommendations, 252–53, 298
cookbook recommendations, 293
respiratory diseases
and blood glucose control, 51
chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), 51
Rockefeller, John D., 63
Rubin, Rick, 254
Rumi, 243

S
Sarah (intractable migraine) case study, 4–8
Schatzker, Mark, 130
selenium, 155, 157
self-love, 255
senior citizens. See older adults
serotonin, 191
sexual health. See also infertility
erectile dysfunction (ED), 42, 50–51
short-chain fatty acids (SCFAs), 164, 167
sinusitis, 36–37
sitting, 209–11, 213–14
skin conditions
acne, 33
caused by Bad Energy, 33
sleep
artificial light and circadian disruption, 19, 186–88, 199–200, 200–
201, 205–8, 299

committing to additional Good Energy habits, 297
consistency, 198–200, 205
deprivation, 18, 186, 191–98
and glucose levels, 104–5, 196–97
Good Energy baseline quiz, 271–72
and hunger, 193–94
impact on cognitive ability, 195–96
insomnia, 204
obstructive sleep apnea (OSA), 194
quality, 198, 205
social jet lag, 198–99
teenagers’ sleep needs, 68
using a sleep tracker, 106–7, 205
social connections, 255–56
Sophia (nasal and sinus problems) case study, xv–xvi, 7
step counts, 107–8
Stolen Focus (Hari), 238–39, 256
stress
allostatic load, 264
chronic, 17, 246

Good Energy baseline quiz, 275–76
hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenal (HPA) axis, 35
impact on glucose, 35, 104, 245–46
impact on health, 243–46
from trauma, 246–47
stroke, 48–49
subcutaneous fat, 85
sugar
artificial sweeteners and natural nonnutritive sweeteners, 181
consumption by children, 69
refined added sugar, 170–71, 283
suicidal ideation, 35–36, 45
sunlight
in the first hour of the day, 207, 298
health benefits of, 189–91, 207–8, 298
and mood, 191
as the source of most food energy, 188
support and accountability, 281–82
sympathetic nervous system (SNS), 244
symptoms compared to lab results, 78–79

T
taurine, 159
technology
bio-observability, 77–78, 111–13
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
food-logging apps, 106, 279
meditation apps, 251, 297
reducing device usage, 256
screens, 206, 299
wearables, 75–78, 99–113, 249, 279–81
temperature
body temperature, 218, 224
brown fat, 224–26
cold exposure, 224–27, 299
committing to additional Good Energy habits, 299
Good Energy baseline quiz, 274
heat exposure, 226–27, 299
thermogenesis, 217–18

thermoneutrality, 19, 224
therapy, counseling, and coaching, 248–49, 256–58
thylakoids, 126
time, alone or unstructured, 255
Tiny Habits (Fogg), 294–95
toxins and pollutants
bisphenol A (BPA), 229–30
dioxins, 231
Good Energy baseline quiz, 276–78
GRAS (generally recognized as safe) designation, 228–29
heavy metals, 233
impact on mitochondria, 18–19
obesogens, 212, 228
organophosphate pesticides, 232–33
parabens, 230
perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS), 232
phthalates, 230
plastics, 233
polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs), 231–32
recommendations, 235–36

synthetic chemicals, 227–33
triclosan, 230–31
water contamination, 141, 233–34, 300
trauma, 246–47
triclosan, 230–31
triglycerides
author’s levels, 81
impact of alcohol on, 81
impact of exercise on, 223
levels, 80–82
triglyceride-to-HDL ratio, 86–88

U
uric acid, 92–93, 128
urolithin A, 122

V
values, establishing your, 267–68
vinegar, 181–82
visceral fat, 85–86
vitamin B₃ (niacin), 156, 158
vitamin C, 134, 160
vitamin D, 95, 157
vitamin E, 156, 159

W
Wahls, Terry, 39
waist circumference, 85–86, 223
Walker, Matthew, 195
walking, 182, 219, 296
water, 141–42, 233–34, 300
wearables
activity trackers, 107–8, 279–80
benefits of, 99–100
for bio-observability, 77–78, 111–13
cardiovascular trackers, 108
continuous glucose monitor (CGM), 75–76, 100–105, 280–81
heart rate variability (HRV) trackers, 109–10, 249
purchasing recommendations, 280–81
sleep trackers, 106–7, 279–80
Why We Sleep (Walker), 195
writing
food journaling, 105–6, 206, 278–79

positive effects of, 253

Z
zinc, 158
A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X
Y Z

